A 2
THE YEMASSEE.
A ROMANCE OF CAROLINA.
BY THE AUTHOR OF
GUY RIVERS, MARTIN FABER, &c.
IN TWO VOLUMES.
VOL. II.
CHAPTER I.
For love and war are twins, and both are made
Of a strange passion, which misleads the sense,
And makes the feeling madness. Thus they grow,
The thorn and flower together, wounding oft,
When most seductive.
Some
men only live for great occasions. They
sleep in the calmbut awake to double life, and
unlooked-for
activity, in the tempest. They are the
zephyr in peace, the storm in war. They smile until
you think it impossible they should ever do otherwise,
and you are paralyzed when you behold the change
which an hour brings about in them. Their whole life
in public would seem a splendid deception; and as their
minds and feelings are generally beyond those of the
great mass which gathers about, and in the end depends
upon them, so they continually dazzle the vision and
distract the judgment of those who passingly observe
them. Such men become the tyrants of all the rest,
and, as there are two kinds of tyranny in the world,
they either enslave to cherish or to destroy.
Of this class was Harrison,erratic, daring, yet
thoughtful,and not to be measured by such a mind
as that of the pastor, Matthews. We have seen his
agencya leading agencyin much of the business of
the preceding narrative. It was not an agency of the
moment, but of continued exertion, the result of a due
recognition of the duties required at his hands. Nor
is this agency to be discontinued now. He is still
busy, and, under his direction and with his assistance,
the sound of the hammer, and the deep echo of the
axe, in the hands of Granger, the smith, and Hector,
were heard without intermission in the Block House,
closing rivets up, and putting all things in a state of
preparation for those coming dangers which his active
mind had predicted. He was not to be deceived by
the thousand shows which are apt to deceive others.
He looked more deeply into principles and the play
of moods in other men, than is the common habit;
and while few of the borderers estimated with him
the amount of danger and difficulty which he felt to
be at hand, he gave himself not the slightest trouble
in considering their vague speculations, to which a
liberal
courtesy might have yielded the name of opinions.
His own thoughts were sufficient for him; and while
this indifference may seem to have been the product
of an excess of self-esteem, we shall find in the sequel
that, in the present case, it arose from a strong
conviction, the legitimate result of a calm survey of
objects and actions, and a cool and deliberate judgment
upon them.
We have beheld some of his anxieties in the strong
manifestation which he gave to Occonestoga, when he
despatched the unfortunate young savage as a spy, on an
adventure which had found such an unhappy and
unlooked-for
termination. Entirely ignorant of the event, it
was with no small impatience that his employer waited
for his return during the entire night and the better
portion
of the ensuing day. The distance was not so great
between the two places, but that the fleet-footed Indian
might have readily overcome it in a night, giving him
sufficient allowance of time also for all necessary
discoveries; and, doubtless, such would have been the
case but for his ill-advised whisper in the ear of
Hiwassee, and the not less ill-advised visit to the
cottage of Matiwan. The affection of the mother for
the fugitive and outlawed son, certainly, deserved no
less; but while it demanded that regardful return,
which, amid all his errors, he fondly gave her, the
policy of the warrior was sadly foregone in that
indiscreet
proceeding. His failurethe extent yet
unknown
to Harrisonleft the latter doubtful whether to
ascribe it to his misfortune, or to treachery; and this
doubt contributed greatly to his solicitude. In spite of
the suggestions of Granger, who knew the young
warrior
of old, he could not help suspecting him of
desertion
from the English cause as a concession by which
to secure himself a reinstatement in the confidence of
his people; and this suspicion, while it led to new
preparations for the final issue, on the part of Harrison,
was fruitful at the same time of exaggerated anxiety
to his mind. To much of the drudgery of hewing and
hammering, therefore, he subjected himself with the
rest; and though cheerful in its performance, the most
casual observer could have readily seen how much
station and education had made him superior to such
employ. Having thus laboured for some time, he
proceeded
to other parts of his assumed duties, and
mounting his steed,a favourite and fine chestnut
and followed by Dugdale, who had been carefully
muzzled, he took his way in a fleet gallop through the
intricacies of the surrounding country.
The mystery was a singular one which hung over
Harrison in all that region. It was strange how
people loved himhow popular he had become, even
while in all intrinsic particulars so perfectly unknown.
He had somehow won golden opinions from all the
borderers, wilduntameable, and like the savages, as
in many cases they were; and the utmost confidence
was placed in his opinions, even when, as at this
time was the case, they happened to differ from the
general tenour of their own. This confidence, indeed,
had been partially given in the first instance, from the
circumstance of his having taken their lead suddenly,
when all were panic stricken around; and with an
audacity that looked like madness, but which in a time
of panic is good policy, had gone forth to the
encounter
with the Coosaws, a small but desperate tribe,
which had risen, without any other warning than the
war-whoop, upon the Beaufort settlement. His valour
on this occasion, obtained from the Indians themselves
the
nom de guerre
of
Coosah-moray-te
, or the
Coosaw-killer
;
and one that seems to have been well deserved,
for in that affair the tribe nearly suffered annihilation,
and but a single town, that of
Coosaw-hatchie
, or the
refuge of the Coosaws, was left them of all their
possessions
.
The poor remains of their people from that
time became incorporated with the Yemassees. His
reckless audacity, cheerful freedom, mingled at the
same time so strangely with playfulness and cool
composure
,
while exciting the strongest interest, created
the warmest regard among the foresters; and though in
all respects of residence and family utterly unknown
save to one, or at the most, to two among them
appearing
as he did, only now and then, and as suddenly
disappearingyet all were glad when he came, and
sorry when he departed. Esteeming him thus,
they gave him the command of the green jackets,
the small corps which, in that neighbourhood, the
affair of the Coosaws had first brought into something
like regular existence. He accepted this trust readily,
but freely assured his men that he might not be present
such were his labours elsewhereat all times to
discharge
the duties. Such, however, was his popularity
among them, that a qualification like this failed to
affect their choice. They took him on his own terms,
called him Captain Harrison, or, more familiarly,
captain, and never troubled themselves for a single
instant to inquire whether that were his right name or
not; though, if they had any doubts, they never
suffered
them to reach, certainly never to offend, the
ears of their commander. The pastor, rather more
scrupulous, as he thought upon his daughter, lacked
something of this confidence. We have seen how his
doubts grew as his inquiries had been baffled. The
reader, if he has not been altogether inattentive to the
general progress of the narrative, has, probably, at this
moment, a more perfect knowledge of our hero than
either of these parties.
But to return. Harrison rode into the neighbouring
country, all the settlements of which he readily
appeared
to know. His first visit in that quarter had
been the result of curiosity in part, and partly in
consequence
of some public responsibilities coming with
an official station, as by this time the reader will have
conjectured. A new and warmer interest came with
these, soon after he had made the acquaintance of the
beautiful Bess Matthews; and having involved his
own affections with that maiden, it was not long before
he found himself able to command hers. The father
of Bess objected, as the stranger was unknown, if
not nameless; but when did love ever seriously regard
the inclinations of papa? Bess loved Gabriel, and the
exhortations of the old gentleman had only the effect
of increasing a passion which grows vigorous from
restraint, and acquires obstinacy from compulsion.
But the lover went not forth on this occasion in
quest of his mistress. His labours were more
imposing
,
if less grateful. He went forth among his
troop and their families. He had a voice of warning
for all the neighbouring cottagersa warning of danger,
and an exhortation to the borderers to be in perfect
readiness for it, at the well-known signal. But his
warning was in a wordan emphatic sentence
which, once uttered, affected in no particular his usual
manner. To one and another he had the cheerful
encouragement of the brother soldierthe dry sarcasm
to the rustic gallantthe innocuous jest to the
half-won
maiden; and, with the ancient grandsire or
grandam, the exciting inquiry into old timesmerry
old England, or hilarious Irelandor of whatever
other faderland from which they might severally have
come.
This adjusted, and having prepared all minds for
events which his own so readily foresawhaving
counselled the more exposed and feeble to the shelter
of the Block House at the first sign of danger,the
lover began to take the place of the commander, and
in an hour we find him in the ancient grovethe
well-known
place of tryst, in the neighbourhood of the
dwelling of old Matthews. And she was therethe
girl of seventeenconfiding, yet blushing at her own
confidence, with an affection as warm as it was
unqualified
and pure. She hung upon his armshe sat
beside him, and the waters of the little brooklet
gushed into music as they trickled on by their feet.
The air was full of a song of lovethe birds sung
itthe leaves sighed itthe earth echoed, in many a
replication, its delicious burden, and they felt it.
There is no life, if there be no love. Love is the life
of natureall is unnatural without it.The golden
bowl has no wine, if love be not at its bottomthe
instrument
has no music if love come not with the strain.
Let me perishlet me perish, when I cease to love
when others cease to love me.
So thought the twoso felt theyand an hour of
delicious dreaming threw into their mutual souls a
linked hope, which promised not merely a future and
a lasting union to their forms, but an undecaying life
to their affections. They felt in reality that love must
be the life of heaven!
Thou unmann'st me, Bessthou dost, my Armida
the air is enchanted about thee, and the active energy
which keeps me ever in motion when away from thee,
is gone, utterly gone, when thou art nigh. Wherefore
is it so? Thou art my tyrantI am weak before
theefull of fears, Besstimid as a child in the
dark.
Full of hopes too, Gabriel, is it not? And what
is the hope if there be no fearno doubt? They
sweeten each other. I thy tyrant, indeedwhen thou
movest me as thou willest. When I have eyes only
for thy coming, and tears only at thy departure.
And hast thou these always, Bess, for such
occasions
?
Do thy smiles always hail the one, and thy
tears always follow the other?I doubt, Bess, if
always.
And wherefore doubtthou hast eyes for mine,
and canst see for thyself.
True, but knowest thou not that the lover looks
most commonly for the beauty, and not often for the
sentiment of his sweetheart's face? It is this which
A 3
they mean when the poets tell of love's blindness.
The light of thy eye dims and dazzles the gaze of
mine, and I must take the tale from thy lips
And safely thou mayst, Gabriel
May II hardly looked to find thee so consenting,
Bess exclaimed the lover, taking her response in a
signification rather at variance with that which she
contemplated, and, before she was aware, warmly
pressing her rosy mouth beneath his own.
Not sonot so confused and blushing she
exclaimed
,
withdrawing quickly from his grasp. I
meant to say
I knowI know,thou wouldst have said, I might
safely trust to the declaration of thy lipsand so I
do, Bessand want no other assurance. I am happy
that thy words were indirect, but I am better assured
as it is, of what thou wouldst have said.
Thou wilt not love me, Gabriel, that thus I favour
theethou seest how weak is the poor heart which
so waits upon thine, and wilt cease to love what is so
quickly won.
It is so pretty, thy chiding, Bess, that to have thee
go on, it were well to take another assurance from thy
lips.
Now, thou shalt notit is not right, Gabriel;
besides, my father has said
What he should not have said, and will be sorry
for saying. He has said that he knows me not, and
indeed he does not, and shall not as long as in my
thought it is unnecessary, and perhaps unwise, that I
should be known to him.
But, why not to mewhy shouldst thou keep thy
secret from me, Gabriel? Thou couldst surely trust
it to my keeping.
Ay, safely, I know, were it proper for thee to know
any thing which a daughter should of right withhold
from a father. But as I may not give my secret to
him, I keep it from thee; not fearing thy integrity, but
as thou shouldst not hold a trust without sharing thy
confidence with a parent. Trust me, ere long he shall
know all; but now, I may not tell him or thee. I may
not speak a name in this neighbourhood, where, if I
greatly err not, its utterance would make me fine
spoil for the cunning Indians, who are about some
treachery.
What, the Yemassees?
Even they, and of this I would have you speak to
your father. I would not foolishly alarm you, but go
to him. Persuade him to depart for the Block House,
where I have been making preparations for your
comfort
.
Let him only secure you all till this vessel takes
herself off. By that time we shall see how things go.
But what has this vessel to do with it, Gabriel?
A great deal, Bess, if my apprehensions are well
grounded; but the reasons are tedious by which I
come to think so, and would only fatigue your ear.
Not so, GabrielI would like to hear them, for
of this vessel, or rather of her captain, my father
knows something. He knew him well in England.
Ay! eagerly responded HarrisonI heard that,
you know; but, in reality, whatwho is he?
His name is Chorley, as you have heard him say.
My father knew him when both were young. They
come from the same part of the country. He was a
wild, ill-bred profligate, so my father said, in his
youth; unmanageable and irregularleft his parents,
and without their leave went into a ship and became a
sailor. For many years nothing was seen of him
by my father at leastuntil the other day, when, by
some means or other he heard of us, and made himself
known just before your appearance. I never saw him
to know or remember him before, but he knew me
when a child.
And do you know what he isand his vessel?
Nothing but this.He makes voyages from St.
Augustine and Cuba, and trades almost entirely with
the Spaniards in that quarter.
But why should he have no connexion here with
us of that nature, or why is he here at all if such be his
business? This is one of the grounds of my
apprehension
not
to speak of the affair of Hector, which
is enough, of itself, against him.
Ahhis crew is ignorant of the language, and
then he says, so he told us, he seeks to trade for furs
with the Indians.
Still, not enough. None of these reasons are
sufficient to keep his vessel from the landing, his men
from the shore, and himself mysteriously rambling in
the woods without offering at any object, unless it be
the smuggling of our slaves. I doubt not he comes to
deal with the Indians, but he comes as an emissary
from the Spaniards, and it is our skins and scalps he
is after, if any thing.
Speak not so, Gabriel, you frighten me.
Nay, fear not. There is no danger if we keep
our eyes open, and can get your obstinate old knot of
a father to open his.
Hush, Gabrielremember he is my father. And
she looked the rebuke which her lips uttered.
Ay, Bess, I do remember it, or I would not bother
my head five seconds about him. I should gather you
up in my arms as the Pagan of old gathered up his
domestic gods when the earthquake came, and be off
with you without long deliberating whether a father
were necessary to your happiness or not.
Speak not so lightly, Gabrielthe subject is too
serious for jest.
It is, Bessquite too serious for jest, and I do not
jest, or if I do I can't help it. I was born so, and it
comes to the same thing in the end. This is another
of his objections to me as your husband. I do not tie
up my visage when I look upon you, as if I sickened
of the thing I looked onand he well knows how I
detest
that hypocritical moral starch, with which our
would-be saints contrive to let the world see that
sunshine
is sin, and a smile of inborn felicity a defiance
thrown in the teeth of the very God that prompts it.
But my father is no hypocrite, Gabriel.
Then why hoist their colours? He is too good a
man, Bess, to be their instrument, and much I fear me
that he is. He has too much of the regular
round-head
the
genuine, never-end-the-sermon manner of
an old Noll sanctifier. I would forego a kissthe
sweetest, Bess, that thy lips could giveto persuade
the old man, your father, but for a single moment, into
a hearty, manly, honest, unsophisticated, downright
laugh.
It is true, Gabriel, he laughs not, but then he does
not frown.
Not at thee, Bessnot at thee: who could? but
he does at me, most ferociously, and his mouth puckers
up when his eye rises to mine, in all the involutions
of a pine bur. But, forgive me: it is not of this I
would speak now. I will forgive though I may not
forget his sourness, if you can persuade him into a
little precaution at the present moment. There is
danger, I am satisfied; and your situation here is an
exposed one. This sailor-friend or acquaintance of
yours, is no friend if he deal with the Spaniards of
St. Augustinecertainly an enemy, and most probably
a pirate. I suspect him to be the latter, and have my
eyes on him accordingly. As to the trade with the
Indians that he talks of, it is all false, else why should
he lie here so many days without change of position
or any open intercourse with them? and then, what
better evidence against him than the kidnapping of
Hector?
But he has changed his positionhis vessel has
moved higher up the river.
Since when?
Within the last three hours. Her movement was
pointed out by my father as we stood together on the
bluff fronting the house.
Indeedthis must be seen to, and requires
despatch
.
Come with me, Bess. To your father at once,
and say your strongest and look your sweetest. Be
twice as timid as necessary, utter a thousand fears and
misgivings, but persuade him to the shelter of the
Block House.
Where I may be as frequently as convenient in
2
the company of Master Gabriel Harrison. Is it not
so?and she looked up archly into his face. For
once the expression of his look was grave, and his
eye gazed deeply down into her own. With a sobriety
of glance not unmixed with solemnity, he spoke
Ah, Bessif I lose thee, I am myself lost! But
come with meI will see thee to the wicket,safe,
ere I leave thee, beyond the province of the
rattlesnake
.
Speak not of that, she quickly replied, with an
involuntary shudder, looking around her as she spoke,
upon the spot, just then contiguous, associated by that
scene, so deeply with her memory. He led her to the
end of the grove, within sight of her father's cottage,
and his last words at leaving her were those of urgent
entreaty, touching her removal to the Block House.
CHAPTER II.
Away, thou art the slave of a base thought,
And hast no will of truth. I scorn thee now,
With my whole soul, as once, with my whole soul,
I held thee worthy.
But
Bess Matthews was not left to solitude, though
left by her lover. A new party came upon the scene,
in the person of Hugh Grayson, emerging from the
neighbouring copse, from the cover of which he had
witnessed the greater portion of the interview between
Harrison and the maiden. This unhappy young man,
always a creature of the fiercest impulses, in a moment
of the wildest delirium of that passion for Bess which
had so completely swallowed up his better judgment,
not less than all sense of high propriety, had been
guilty, though almost unconscious at the time of the
woful error, of a degree of espionage, for which, the
moment after, he felt many rebukings of shame and
conscience. Hurried on, however, by the impetuous
impulse of the passion so distracting him, the fine
sense, which should have been an impassable barrier
rising up like a wall in the way of such an act, had
foregone its better control for the moment, and he had
lingered sufficiently long under cover to incur the
stigma, as he now certainly felt the shame, of having
played the part of a spy. But his error had its
punishment
,
even in its own progress. He had seen that
which contributed still more to increase his
mortification
,
and to imbitter his soul against the more
successful
rival, whose felicities he had beheldscarcely
able to clinch the teeth in silence which laboured all
the while to gnash in agony. With a cheek in which
shame and a purposeless fury alike showed
themselves
,
and seemed struggling for mastery, he now
came forward; and approaching the maiden, addressed
her as he did so with some common phrase of formal
courtesy, which had the desired effect of making her
pause for his coming. He steeled his quivering
muscles into something like rigidity, while a vain and
vague effort at a smile, like lightning from the cloud,
strove visibly upon his features.
It is not solitude, then, said he, that brings Miss
Matthews into the forest. Its shelterits secrecy
alone, is perhaps its highest recommendation.
What is it that you mean, Master Grayson, by
your words? replied the maiden, while something of
a blush tinged slightly the otherwise pale and lily
complexion
of her face.
Surely I have spoken nothing mysterious. My
thought is plain enough, I should think, were my only
evidence in the cheek of Miss Matthews herself.
My cheek speaks nothing for me, Master Grayson,
which my tongue should shame to utter; and if you have
spoken simply in reference to GabrielMaster
Harrison
I meanyou have been at much unnecessary
trouble
.
Methinks too, there is something in your own face
that tells of a misplaced watchfulness on your part,
where your neighbour holds no watch to be necessary.
You are right, Miss Matthewsyou are right.
There isthere should be, at leastin my face,
acknowledgment
enough of the baseness which led me as
a spy upon your pathupon
his
path! replied the
young man, while his cheek grew once more alternately
from ashes to crimson. It was base, it was unmanly
but it has had its punishmentits sufficient
punishment
,
believe mein the discovery which it has made.
I have seen that, Miss Matthews, which I would not
willingly have seen; and which the fear to see, alone,
led to the accursed survey. Pardon me, thenpity
me, pity if you canthough I can neither well pardon
nor pity myself.
I do pardon you, sirfreely pardon you, for an
error which I should not have thought it in your nature
intentionally to commit; but what to pity you for, saving
for the self-reproach which must come with your
consciousness
,
I do not so well see. Your language is
singular, Master Grayson.
Indeed! Would I could be so blind. You have
not seen, thenyou know not? Look at me, Miss
Matthewsis there no madness in my eyeson my
tonguein look, word, action? Have I not raved in
your earsnever?
No, as I live, never! responded the astonished
maiden. Speak not in this manner, Master Grayson
but leave mepermit me to retire.
Ha! you would go to him! Hear me, Bess
Matthews
.Do
you know himthis strangerthis
adventurer
this
haughty pretender, whose look is
presumption
?
Would you trust to him you know not? What
is he? Can you confide in one whom nobody speaks
forwhom nobody knows? Would you throw yourself
upon ruininto the arms of a strangea
Sir, Master Graysonthis is a liberty
License, rather, lady! The license of madness;
for I am mad, though you see it notan abandoned
madman; degraded, as you have seen, and almost
reckless of all things and thoughts, as all may see in
time. God! is it not true? True it is, and youyou,
Bess Matthewsyou are the cause.
I? replied the maiden, in unmixed astonishment.
Ay, you. Hear me. I loveI loved you, Miss
Matthewshave long loved you. We have been
together
almost from infancy; and I had thought
forgive
the vanity of that thought, Bess MatthewsI
had thought that you might not altogether have been
unkind to me. For years I had this thoughtdid you
not know it?for years I lived on in the sweet hope
the dear promise which it hourly brought mefor years
I had no life, if I had not this expectation! In an evil
hour came this strangerthis Harrisonit is not long
sinceand from that moment I trembled. It was an
instinct that taught me to fear, who had never feared
before. I saw, yet dreaded to believe in what I saw.
I suspected, and shrunk back in terror from my own
suspicions. But they haunted me like so many damned
spectres. They were everywhere around me, goading
me to madness. In my mood, under their spur, I sunk
into the spy. I became degraded,and saw allall!
I saw his lip resting upon yourswarmly,
passionately
and
yours,yours grew to its pressure, Bess
Matthews, and did not seek to be withdrawn.
No more of this, Master Graysonthou hast
thought strange and foolish things, and though they
surprise me, I forgive themI forgive thee. Thou
hadst no reason to think that I was more to thee than
to a stranger, that I could be moreand I feel not any
self-reproach, for I have done naught and said naught
which could have ministered to thy error. Thy
unwise
,
not to say thy unbecoming and unmanly curiosity,
Master Grayson, makes me the less sorry that thou
shouldst know a truth which thou findest so painful to
know.
Oh, be less proudless stern, Bess Matthews.
Thou hast taken from this haughty stranger some of
his bold assumption of superiority, till thou even
forgettest
that erring affection may have its claim upon
indulgence.
But not upon justice. I am not proudthou dost
me wrong, Master Grayson, and canst neither
understand
me nor the noble gentleman of whom thy words
are disrespectful.
And what is he, that I should respect him? Am
I not as freea man,an honest manand what is
he more,even if he be so much? Is he more ready
to do and to dare for thee?Is he stronger?Will he
fight for thee? Ha! if he will!
Thou shalt make me no game-prize, even in thy
thought, Master Graysonand thy words are less than
grateful to my ears. Wilt thou not leave me?
Disrespectful to him, indeeda proud and senseless
swaggerer, presuming upon his betters. I
Silence, sir! think what is proper to manhood, and
look that which thou art not, exclaimed the aroused
maiden, in a tone which completely startled her
companion
,
while she gathered herself up to her fullest
height, and waved him off with her hand. Go, sir
thou hast presumed greatly, and thy words are those
of the ruffian, as thy late conduct has been that of the
hireling and the spy. Thou think that I loved thee!
that I thought of a spirit so ignoble as thine;and it
is such as thou that wouldst slander and defame my
Gabriel
,he,
whose most wandering thought could never
compass the tithe of that baseness which makes up thy
whole soul. And as she spoke words of such bitter
import, her eye flashed and the beautiful lips curled in
corresponding indignation, while her entire expression
of countenance was that of a divine rebuke. The
offender trembled with convulsive and contradictory
emotions, and for a few moments after her retort had
been uttered, remained utterly speechless. He felt
the justice of her severity, though every thought and
feeling, in that instant, taught him how unequal he
was to sustain it. He had, in truth, spoken without
clear intent, and his language had been in no respect
under the dominion of reason. But he regained his
energies as he beheld her, with an eye still flashing
fire and a face covered with inexpressible dignity,
moving scornfully away. He recovered, though with a
manner wild and purposelesshis hands and eyes
lifted
imploringlyand chokingly, thus addressed her:
Leave me notnot in anger, Bess Matthews, I
implore you. I have done you wrongdone
him
wrong: with desperate rapidity he uttered the last
passageI have spoken unjustly, and like a
madman
.
But forgive me. Leave me not therefore, with
an unforgiving thought, since, in truth, I regret my error
as deeply as you can possibly reprove it.
Proud and lofty in her sense, the affections of Bess
Matthews were, nevertheless, not less gentle than
lofty. She at once turned to the speaker, and the
prayer was granted by her glance, ere her lips had
spoken.
I doI do forgive thee, Master Grayson, in
consideration
of the time when we were both children.
But thou hast said bitter words in mine ear, which thou
wilt not hold it strange if I do not over-soon forget. But
doubt not that I do forgive thee; and pray thee for thy
own sakefor thy good name, and thy duty to thyself
and to the good understanding which thou hast, and the
honourable feeling which thou shouldst have,that
thou stray not again so sadly.
I thank theeI thank thee,was all he said, as
he carried the frankly-extended hand of the maiden to
his lips, and then rushed hurriedly into the adjacent
thicket.
CHAPTER III.
Thus human reason, ever confident,
Holds its own sidehalf erring and half right,
Not tutored by a sweet humility,
That else might safely steer.
Bred
up amid privation, and tutored as much by
its necessities as by a careful superintendence, Bess
Matthews was a girl of courage, not less than of
feeling
.
She could endure and enjoy; and the two
capacities
were so happily balanced in her character, that,
while neither of them invaded the authority of the
other, they yet happily neutralized any tendency to
excess
on either side. Still, however, her susceptibilities
were great, for at seventeen the affections are not apt
to endure much provocation; and deeply distressed
with the previous scene, and with that gentleness
which was her nature, grieved sincerely at the condition
of a youth, of whom she had heretofore thought so
favourablybut not to such a degree as to warrant the
hope which he had entertained, and certainly without
having held out to it any show of encouragementshe
re-entered her father's dwelling, and immediately
proceeded
to her chamber. Though too much excited
by her thoughts to enter with her father upon the topic
suggested by Harrison, and upon which he had dwelt
with such emphasis, she was yet strong and calm
enough for a close self-examination. Had she said or
done any thing which might have misled Hugh
Grayson
?
This was the question which her fine sense of
justice, not less than of maidenly propriety, dictated
for her answer; and with that close and calm analysis
of her own thoughts and feelings, which must always
be the result of a due acquisition of just principles in
education, she referred to all those unerring standards
of the mind which virtue and common sense establish,
for the satisfaction of her conscience, against those
suggestions of doubt with which her feeling had
assailed
it, on the subject of her relations with that person.
Her feelings grew more and more composed as the
scrutiny progressed, and she rose at last from the
couch upon which she had thrown herself, with a heart
lightened at least of the care which a momentary doubt
of its own propriety had inspired.
There was another duty to perform, which also had
its difficulties. She sought her father in the
adjoining
chamber, and if she blushed in the course of the
recital, in justice to maidenly delicacy, she at least did
not scruple to narrate fully in his ears all the
particulars
of her recent meeting with Harrison, with a sweet
regard to maidenly truth. We do not pretend to say
that she dwelt upon details, or gave the questions and
repliesthe musings and the madnesses of the
conversation
for
Bess had experience enough to know
that in old ears, such matters are usually tedious
enough, and in this respect, they differ sadly from
young ones. She made no long story of the meeting,
though she freely told the whole; and with all her
warmth and earnestness, as Harrison had counselled,
she proceeded to advise the old man of the dangers
from the Indians, precisely as her lover had counselled
herself.
The old man heard, and was evidently less than
satisfied with the frequency with which the parties met.
He had not denied Bess this privilegehe was not
stern enough for that; and, possibly, knowing his
daughter's character not less than her heart, he was by
no means unwilling to confide freely in her. But still
he exhorted, in good set but general language, rather
against Harrison than with direct reference to the
intimacy
between the two. He gave his opinion on that
subject too, unfavourably to the habit, though without
uttering any distinct command. As he went on and
warmed with his own eloquence, his help-mate,an
excellent old lady, who loved her daughter too well to
see her tears and be silentjoined freely in the
discourse
,
and on the opposite side of the question: so
that, on a small scale, we are favoured with the glimpse
of a domestic flurry, a slight summer gust, which
ruffles to compose, and irritates to smooth and pacify.
Rough enough for a little while, it was happily of no
great continuance; for the old people had lived too
long together, and were quite too much dependant on
their mutual sympathies, to suffer themselves to play
long at cross purposes. In ceasing to squabble,
however
,
Mrs. Matthews gave up no point; and was too
much interested in the present subject readily to
forego
the argument upon it. She differed entirely from
her husband with regard to Harrison, and readily sided
with her daughter in favouring his pretensions. He had
a happy and singular knack of endearing himself to
most people; and the very levity which made him
distasteful to the pastor, was, strange to say, one of
the chief influences which commended him to his lady.
Bess is wrong, my dear, at length said the pastor,
in a tone and manner meant to be conclusive on the
subjectBess is wrongdecidedly wrong. We
know nothing of Master Harrisonneither of his
family nor of his pursuitsand she should not
encourage
him.
Bess is right, Mr. Matthews, responded the old
lady, with a doggedness of manner meant equally to
close the controversy, as she wound upon her fingers
from a little skreel in her lap, a small volume of the
native silk.
[1]
[1]
The culture of silk was commenced in South Carolina as far
back as the year 1702, and thirteen years before the date of this
narrative
.
It was introduced by Sir Nathaniel Johnston, then holding
the government of the province under the lords proprietors. This
gentleman, apart from his own knowledge of the susceptibility, for its
production, of that region, derived a stimulus to the prosecution of
the enterprise from an exceeding great demand then prevailing in
England for the article. The spontaneous and free growth of the
mulberry in all parts of the southern country first led to the idea
that silk might be made an important item in the improving list
of its products. For a time he had every reason to calculate upon
the entire success of the experiment, but after a while, the pursuit
not becoming immediately productive, did not consort with the
impatient
nature of the southrons, and was given overwhen perhaps
wanting but little of complete success. The experiment, however,
was prosecuted sufficiently long to show, though it did not become
an object of national importance, how much might, with proper
energy, be done towards making it such. Of late days, a new
impulse
has been given to the trial, and considerable quantities of silk
are annually made in the middle country of South Carolina.
Bess is rightCaptain Harrison is a
nice gentlemanalways so lively, always so polite,
and so pleasant.I declare, I don't see why you don't
like him, and it must be only because you love to go
against all other people.
And so, my dear, gently enough responded the
pastor, you would have Bess married to anobody
knows who or what.
Why, dear me, Johnwhat is it you don't know?
I'm sure I know every thing I want to know about the
captain. His name's Harrisonand
What more? inquired the pastor with a smile,
seeing that the old lady had finished her silk and
speech at the same moment.
Why nothing, Johnbut what we do know, you
will admit, is highly creditable to him; and so, I do
not see why you should be so quick to restrain the
young people, when we can so easily require to know
all that is necessary before we consent, or any decisive
step is taken.
But, my dear, the decisive step is taken when the
affections of our daughter are involved.
The old lady could say nothing to this, but she had
her word.
He is a nice, handsome gentleman, John.
Beauty is, that beauty does, replied the pastor in
a proverb.
Well, but John, he's in no want of substance.
He has money, good gold in plenty, for I've seen it
myselfand I'm sure that's a sight for sore eyes, after
we've been looking so long at the brown paper that
the assembly have been printing, and which they call
money. Gold now is money, John, and Captain
Harrison
always has it.
It would be well to know where it comes from,
doggedly muttered the pastor.
Oh, John, Johnwhere's all your religion? How
can you talk so? You are only vexed nowI'm
certain
that's itbecause Master Harrison won't satisfy
your curiosity.
Elizabeth!
Well, don't be angry now, John. I didn't mean
that exactly, but really you are so uncharitable. It's
neither sensible nor Christian in you. Why will you
be throwing up hills upon hills in the way of Bess'
making a good match?
I do not, Elizabeth; that is the very point which
makes me firm.
Stubborn, you mean.
Well, perhaps so, Elizabeth, but stubborn I will
be until it in shown to be a good match, and then he
may have her with all my heart. It is true, I love not
his smart speeches, and then he sometimes makes quite
too free. But I shall not mind that, if I can find out
certainly
who he is, and that he comes of good family, and
does nothing disreputable. Remember, Elizabeth, we
come of good family ourselves,old England can't
show a better; and we must be careful to do it no
discredit
by a connexion for our child.
That is all true and very sensible, Mr. Matthews,
and I agree with you whenever you talk to the point.
Now you will admit, I think, that I know when a
gentleman
is a gentleman, and when he is notand I tell
you that if Master Harrison is not a gentleman, then
give me up, and don't mind my opinion again. I
don't want spectacles to see that he comes of good
family and is a gentleman.
Yes, your opinion may be right, but if it is wrong
what then? The evil will be past remedy.
It can't be wrong. When I look upon him, I'm
certainso graceful and polite, and then his dignity
and good-breeding.
Good-breeding, indeed! and this exclamation the
pastor accompanied with a most irreverend chuckle,
which had in it a touch of bitterness. Go to your
chamber, Bess, my dear, he said, turning to his
daughter
,
who, sitting in a corner rather behind her mother,
with head turned downwards to the floor, had heard
the preceding dialogue with no little interest and
disquiet
.
She obeyed the mandate in silence, and when
she had gone, the old man resumed his exclamation.
Good-breeding, indeed! when he told me, to my
face, that he would have Bess in spite of my teeth.
The old lady now chuckled in earnest, and the
pastor's
brow gloomed accordingly.
Well, I declare, John, that only shows a
fine-spirited
fellow. Now, as I live, if I were a young man,
in the same way, and were to be crossed after this
fashion, I'd say the same thing. That I would. I
tell you, John, I see no harm in it, and my memory's
good, John, that you had some of the same spirit in
our young days.
Your memory's quite too good, Elizabeth, and the
less you let it travel back the better for both of us,
was the somewhat grave response. But I have
something to say of young HughHugh Grayson, I
mean. Hugh really loves BessI'm certain quite
as much as your Captain Harrison. Now, we know
him!
Don't speak to me of Hugh Grayson, Mr.
Matthews
for
it's no use. Bess don't care a straw for
him.
A fine, sensible young man, very smart, and likely
to do well.
A sour, proud upstartidle and sulkybesides,
he's got nothing in the world.
Has your Harrison any more?
And if he hasn't, John Matthewslet me tell you
at least, he's a very different person from Hugh
Grayson
,
besides being born and bred a gentleman.
I'd like to know, Elizabeth, how you come at that,
that you speak it so confidently.
Leave a woman alone for finding out a gentleman
bred from one that is not; it don't want study and
witnesses to tell the difference betwixt them. We
can tell at a glance.
Indeed! But I see it's of no use to talk with you
now. You are bent on having things all your own
way. As for the man, I believe you are almost as
much in love with him as your daughter. And this
was said with a smile meant for compromise; but the
old lady went on gravely enough for earnest.
And it's enough to make me, John, when you are
running him down from morning to night, though you
know we don't like it. But that's neither here nor
there. His advice is good, and he certainly means it
for our safety. Will you do as Bess said, and shall
we go to the Block House, till the Indians come quiet
again?
His advice, indeed! You help his plans
wondrously
.
Vol. II.B 3
But I see through his object if you do not.
He only desires us at the Block House, in order to be
more with Bess than he possibly can be at present.
He is always there, or in the neighbourhood.
And you are sure, John, there's no danger from
the Indians?
None, none in the world. They are as quiet as
they well can be, under the repeated invasion of their
grounds by the borderers, who are continually hunting
in their woods. By the way, I must speak to young
Grayson on the subject. He is quite too frequently
over the bounds, and they like him not.
Well, wellbut this insurrection, John?
Was a momentary commotion, suppressed instantly
by the old chief Sanutee, who is friendly to us; and
whom they have just made their great chief, or king,
in place of Huspah, whom they deposed. Were they
unkindly disposed, they would have destroyed, and not
have saved, the commissioners.
But Harrison knows a deal more of the Indians
than any body else; and then they say that Sanutee
himself drove Granger out of Pocota-ligo.
Harrison says more than he can unsay, and
pretends
to more than he can ever know; and I heed not
his opinion. As for the expulsion of Granger, I do
not believe a word of it.
I wish, John, you would not think so lightly of
Harrison. You remember he saved us when the
Coosaws
broke out. His management did every thing
then. Now, don't let your ill opinion of the man
stand in the way of proper caution. Remember,
John,your wifeyour child.
I do, Elizabeth; but you are growing a child
yourself.
You don't mean to say I'm in my dotage? said the
old lady, quickly and sharply.
No, no, not that, and he smiled for an instant
only, that your timidity did not suit your experience.
But I have thought seriously on the subject of this
threatened outbreak, and, for myself, can see nothing to
fear from the Yemassees. On the contrary, they have
not only always been friendly heretofore, but they
appear
friendly now. Several of them, as you know,
have professed to me a serious conviction of the truth
of those divine lessons which I have taught them;
and when I know this, it would be a most shameful
desertion of my duty were I to doubt those solemn
avowals which they have made, through my poor
instrumentality
,
to the Deity.
Well, John, I hope you are right, and that
Harrison
is wrong. To God I leave it to keep us from evil:
in his hands there are peace and safety.
Amen, amen! fervently responded the pastor, as
he spoke to his retiring dame, who, gathering up her
working utensils, was about to pass into the adjoining
chamber. Amen, Elizabeththough, I must say, the
tone of your expressed reliance upon God has still in
it much that is doubtful and unconfiding. Let us add
to the prayer, one for a better mood along with the
better fortune.
Here the controversy ended; the old lady, as her
husband alleged, still unsatisfied, and the preacher
himself not altogether assured in his own mind that a
lurking feeling of hostility to Harrison, rather than a just
sense of his security, had not determined him to risk
the danger from the Indians, in preference to a better
hope of security in the shelter of the Block House.
CHAPTER IV.
I must dare all myself. I cannot dare,
Avoid the danger. There is in my soul,
That which may look on death, but not on shame.
As soon as his interview was over with Bess
Matthews, Harrison hurried back to the Block House.
He there received confirmatory intelligence of what
B 2
she had told him. The strange vessel had indeed
taken up anchors and changed her position.
Availing
herself of a favouring breeze, she ascended the
river, a few miles nigher the settlements of the
Yemassees, and now lay fronting the left wing of the
pastor's cottage;the right of it, as it stood upon
the jutting tongue of land around which wound the
river, she had before fronted from below. The new
position could only have been chosen for the facility
of intercourse with the Indians, which, from the want
of a good landing on this side of the river, had been
wanting to them where she originally lay. In addition
to this intelligence, Harrison learned that which still
further quickened his anxieties. The wife of Granger,
a woman of a calm, stern, energetic disposition, who
had been something more observant than her husband,
informed him that there had been a considerable
intercourse
already between the vessel and the Indians
since her removethat their boats had been around
her constantly during the morning, and that boxes and
packages of sundry kinds had been carried from her
to the shore; individual Indians, too, had been
distinguished
walking her decks; a privilege which, it was
well known, had been denied to the whites, who had
not been permitted the slightest intercourse. All this
confirmed the already active apprehensions of
Harrison
.
He could no longer doubt of her intentions, or
of the intentions of the Yemassees; yet, how to
proceed
how
to prepareon whom to relyin what
quarter to look for the attack, and what was the
extent of the proposed insurrection;was it partial,
or general? Did it include the Indian nations
generally
twenty-eight
of which, at that time, occupied
the Carolinas, or was it confined to the Yemassees
and Spaniards? and if the latter were concerned, were
they to be looked for in force, and whether by land or
by sea? These were the multiplied questions, and to
resolve them was the great difficulty in the way of
Harrison. That there were now large grounds for
suspicion
,
he could no longer doubt; but how to proceed
in arousing the people, and whether it were necessary
to arouse the colony at large, or only that portion of it
more immediately in contact with the Indiansand
how to inform them in time for the crisis which he
now felt was at hand, and involving the fate of the
infant
colonyall depended upon the correctness of
his acquired information, and yet his fugitive spy came
not back, sent no word, and might have betrayed his
mission.
The doubts grew with their contemplation. The
more he thought of the recent Yemassee discontents,
the more he dreaded to think. He knew that this
discontent
was not confined to the Yemassee, but extended
even to the waters of the Keowee and to the Apalachian
mountains. The Indians had suffered on all sides
from the obtrusive borderers, and had been treated, he
felt conscious, with less than regard and justice by
the provincial government itself. But a little time
before, the voluntary hostages of the Cherokees had
been treated with indignity and harshness by the
assembly of Carolina; having been incarcerated in a
dungeon under cruel circumstances of privation, which
the Cherokees at large did not appear to feel in a less
degree than the suffering hostages themselves, and
were pacified with extreme difficulty. The full array
of these circumstances to the mind of Harrison,
satisfied
him of the utter senselessness of any confidence in
that friendly disposition of the natives, originally truly
felt, but which had been so repeatedly abused as to be
no longer entertained, or only entertained as a mask to
shelter feelings directly opposite in character. The
increasing consciousness of danger, and the failure
of Occonestoga, on whose intelligence he had so
greatly depended, momentarily added to his disquiet,
by leaving him entirely at a loss as to the time,
direction
,
and character of that danger which it had been
his wish and province to provide against. Half
soliloquizing
as he thought, and half addressing Granger,
who stood beside him in the upper and habitable room
of the Block House, the desire of Harrison thus found
its way to his lips.
Bad enough, Grangerand yet what to dohow to
movefor there's little use in moving without a
purpose
.
We can do nothing without intelligence, and
that we must have though we die for it. We must
seek and find out their aim, their direction, their force,
and what they depend upon. If they come alone we
can manage them, unless they scatter simultaneously
upon various points and take us by surprise, and this,
if I mistake not, will be their course. But I fear this
sailor-fellow brings them an ugly coadjutor in the
power of the Spaniard. He comes from St.
Augustine
evidently; and may bring them mena concealed
force, and this accounts for his refusal to admit any of
our people on board. The boxes too,did you mark
them well, Granger?
As well as I might, sir, from the Chief's Bluff.
And what might they contain, think you?
Goods and wares, sir, I doubt not: blankets
perhaps
Or muskets and gunpowder. Your thoughts run
upon nothing but stock in trade, and the chance of too
much competition. Now, is it not quite as likely that
those boxes held hatchets, and knives, and fire-arms?
Were they not generally of one size and shapelong,
narroweh? Did you note that?
They were, my lord, all of one size, as you
describe them. I saw that myself, and so said to
Richard, but he did not mind. Thus spoke the wife
of Granger, in reply to the question which had been
addressed to her husband.
Did you speak to me? was the stern response of
Harrison, in a tone of voice and severity not usually
employed by the speaker, accompanying his speech by
a keen penetrating glance, which, passing alternately
from husband to wife, seemed meant to go through them
both.
I did speak to you, sir,and you will forgive me
for having addressed any other than Captain
Harrison
,
she replied, composedly and calmly, though
in a manner meant to conciliate and excuse the
inadvertence
of which she had been guilty in conferring
upon him a title which in that region it seemed his
policy to avoid. Then, as she beheld that his glance
continued to rest in rebuke upon the shrinking features
of her husband, she proceeded thus
You will forgive him too, sir, I pray you; but it is
not so easy for a husband to keep any secret from his
wife, and least of all, such as that which concerns a
person who has provoked so much interest in all.
You are adroit, mistress, and your husband owes
you much. A husband does find it difficult to keep any
thing secret from his wife but his own virtues; and of
those she seldom dreams. But pray, when was this
wonderful revelation made to you?
You were known to me, sir, ever since the
Foresters
made you captain, just after the fight with the
Coosaws at Tulifinnee Swamp.
Indeed! was the reply; well, my good dame, you
have had my secret long enough to keep it now. I
am persuaded you can keep it better than your
husband
.
How now, Granger! you would be a politician
too, and I am to have the benefit of your counsels, and
you would share mine. Is't not soand yet, you would
fly to your chamber, and share them with a tongue,
which, in the better half of the sex, would wag it on
every wind, from swamp or sea, until all points of the
compass grew wiser upon it.
Why, captain, replied the trader, half stupidly,
half apologeticallyMoll is a close body enough.
So is not Moll's worser half, was the reply. But
no more of this folly. There is much for both of us
to do, and not a little for you if you will do it.
Speak, sir, I will do much for you, captain.
And for good pay. This it is. You must to the
Yemasseesto Pocota-ligosee what they do, find
out what they design, and look after Occonestogaare
you ready?
It were a great risk, captain.
Why, true, and life itself is a risk. We breathe
not an instant without hazard of its loss, and a
plumstone
,
to an open mouth at dinner, is quite as perilous
as the tenth bullet. Sleep is a risk, and one presses
not his pillow o'nights, without a prayer against
eternity before morning. Show me the land where
we risk nothing, and I will risk all to get there.
It's as much as my life's worth, captain.
Psha! we can soon count up that. Thou art
monstrous fond of thy carcass, now, and by this I
know thou art growing wealthy. We shall add to thy
gains, if thou wilt go on this service. The assembly
will pay thee well, as they have done before. Thou
hast not lost by its service.
Nothing, sirbut have gained greatly. In moderate
adventure, I am willing to serve them now; but not in
this. The Yemassees were friendly enough then, and
so was Sanutee. It is different now, and all the
favour I could look for from the old chief, would be a
stroke of his hatchet, to save me from the fire-torture.
But why talk of detection? I do not desire that
thou shouldst allow thyself to be taken. Think you,
when I go into battle, the thought of being shot ever
troubles me? no! If I thought that, I should not
perhaps
go. My only thought is how to shoot others;
and you should think, in this venture, not of your own,
but the danger of those around you. You are a good
Indian hunter, and have practised all their skill. Take
the swamp, hug the treeline the thicket, see and
hear, nor shout till you are out of the wood. There's
no need to thrust your nose into the Indian kettles.
It might be done, captain; but if caught, it would
be so much the worse for me. I can't think of it, sir.
Caught indeed! A button for the man who prefers
fear rather than hope. Will not an hundred pounds
teach thee reason? Look, man, it is here with thy
wifewill that not move thee to it?
Not five hundred, captain,not five hundred,
replied the trader, decisively. I know too well the
danger, and shan't forget the warning which old Sanutee
gave me. I've seen enough of it to keep me back;
and though I am willing to do a great deal, captain, for
you as well as the assembly, without any reward, as I
have often done before,for you have all done a great
deal for me,yet it were death, and a horrible death,
for me to undertake this. I must notI do not say I
will notbut in truth I cannotI dare not.
Thus had the dialogue between Harrison and the
trader gone on for some time, the former urging and
the latter refusing. The wife of the latter all the
while had looked on and listened in silence, almost
unnoticed
by either, but her countenance during the
discussion
was full of eloquent speech. The colour in
her cheeks now came and went, her eye sparkled, her
lip quivered, and she moved to and fro with emotion
scarcely suppressed, until her husband came to his
settled conclusion not to go, as above narrated, when
she boldly advanced between him and Harrison, and
with her eye settling scornfully upon him, where he
stood, she thus addressed him:
Now out upon thee, Richard, for a mean spirit.
Thou wouldst win money only when the game is easy
and all thine own. Hast thou not had the pay of the
assembly, time upon time, and for little risk? and
because
the risk is now greater, wilt thou hold back like
a man having no heart? I shame to think of that thou
hast spoken. But the labour and the risk thou fearest
shall be mine. I fear not the savagesI know their
arts and can meet them, and so couldst thou, Granger,
did thy own shadow not so frequently beset thee to
scare. Give me the charge which thou hast, captain
and, Granger, touch not the pounds. Thou wilt
keep them, my lord, for other service. I will go
without
the pay.
Thou shalt not, Mollthou shalt not, cried the
trader, interposing.
But I will, Richard, and thou knowest I will when
my lips have said it. If there be danger, I have no
children to feel my want, and it is but my own life, and
even its loss may save many.
B 3
MollMoll! exclaimed the trader, half entreating,
half commanding in his manner, but she heeded him
not.
And now, my lord, the duty. What is to be done?
Harrison looked on as she spoke, in wonder and
admiration
,
then replied, warmly seizing her hand as he
did so.
Now, by heaven, woman, but thou hast a soula
noble, strong, manly soul, such as would shame
thousands
of the more presumptuous sex. But thy husband
has said right in this. Thou shalt not go, and thy
words have well taught me that the task should be
mine own.
What! my lord! exclaimed both the trader and
his wifethou wilt not trust thy person in their
hands?
Nocertainly not. Not if I can help itbut
whatever be the risk that seems so great to all, I should
not seek to hazard the lives of others, where my own
is as easily come at, and where my own is the greater
stake. So, Granger, be at rest for thyself and wife.
I put thyself first in safety, where I know thou
wishest it. For theethou art a noble woman, and
thy free proffer of service is indeed good service
this hour to me, since it brings me to recollect my own
duty. The hundred pounds are thine, Granger!
My lord!
No lording, manno more of that, but hear me.
In a few hours and with the dusk I shall be off. See
that you keep good watch when I am gone, for the
Block House will be the place of retreat for our
people
in the event of commotion, and will therefore most
likely be a point of attack with the enemy. Several
have been already warned, and will doubtless be here
by night. Be certain you know whom you admit.
Grimstead and Grayson, with several of the foresters,
will come with their families, and with moderate
caution
you can make good defence. No more. Thus
counselling, and directing some additional preparations
to the trader and his wife, he called for Hector, who
a moment after made his appearance, as if hurried
away from a grateful employ, with a mouth greased
from ear to ear, and a huge mass of fat bacon still
clutched tenaciously between his fingers.
Hector!
Sa, mossa.
Hast fed Dugdale to-day?
Jist done feed 'em, mossa.
See that you give him nothing moreand get the
horse in readiness. I go up the river-trace by the
night.
He done, mossa, as you tell me: and the black
retired to finish the meal, in the enjoyment of which
he had been interrupted. At dusk, under the direction
of his master, who now appeared gallantly mounted
upon his noble steed, Hector led Dugdale behind him
to the entrance of a little wood, where the river-trace
began upon which his master was going. Alighting
from his horse, Harrison played for a few moments
with the strong and favourite dog, and thrusting his
hand, among other things, down the now-and-then
extended
jaws of the animal, he seemed to practise a
sport to which he was familiar. After this, he made
the negro put Dugdale's nose upon the indented track,
and then instructed him, in the event of his not
returning
by the moon-rise, to unmuzzle and place him upon
the trace at the point he was leaving. This done,
he set off in a rapid gait, Dugdale vainly struggling to
go after him.
CHAPTER V.
School that fierce passion down, ere it unman,
Ere it o'erthrow thee. Thou art on a height
Most perilous, and beneath thee spreads the sea,
And the sterm gathers.
Leaving
Bess Matthews, as we have seen, under
the influence of a fierce and feverish spirit, Hugh
Grayson
,
as if seeking to escape the presence of a pursuing
and painful thought, plunged deep and deeper into the
forest, out of the pathway, though still in the direction
of his own home. His mind was now a complete
chaos, in which vexation and disappointment, not to
speak of self-reproach, were active principles of
misrule
.
He felt deeply the shame following upon the act
of espionage of which he had been guilty, and though
conscious that it was the consequence of a momentary
paroxysm that might well offer excuse, he was
nevertheless
too highly gifted with sensibility not to reject
those suggestions of his mind which at moments sought
to extenuate it. Perhaps, too, his feeling of
abasement
was not a little exaggerated by the stern and
mortifying rebuke which had fallen from the lips of that
being whose good opinion had been all the world to
him. With these feelings at work, his mood was in
no sort enviable; and when at nightfall he reached the
dwelling of his mother, it was in a condition of mind
which drove him, a reckless savage, into a corner of the
apartment opposite that in which sat the old dame
croning over the pages of the sacred volume. She
looked up at intervals and cursorily surveyed, in brief
glances, the features of her son, whose active mind
and feverish ambition, warring as they ever did against
that condition of life imposed upon him by the
necessities
of his birth and habitation, had ever been an
object of great solicitude to his surviving parent. He
had been her pet in his childhood--her pride as he
grew older, and began to exhibit the energies and
graces of a strongly-marked and highly original, though
unschooled intellect. Not without ambition and an
appreciation of public honours, the old woman could
not but regard her son as promising to give elevation
to the name of his then unknown family; a hope not
entirely extravagant in a part of the world in which the
necessities of life were such as to compel a sense of
equality in all; and, indeed, if making an inequality
anywhere, making it in favour rather of the bold and
vigorous plebeian, than of the delicately-nurtured and
usually unenterprising scion of aristocracy. Closing
the book at length, the old lady turned to her son, and
without remarking upon the peculiar unseemliness, not
to say wildness, of his appearance, she thus addressed
him:
Where hast thou been, Hughey, boy, since noon?
Thy brother and thyself both from homeI have felt
lonesome, and really began to look for the Indians that
the young captain warned us of.
Still the captain--nothing but the captain. Go
where I may, he is in my sight, and his name within
my ears. I am for ever haunted by his presence.
His shadow is on the wall, and before me, whichever
way I turn.
And does it offend thee, Hughey, and wherefore?
He is a goodly gentleman, and a gracious, and is so
considerate. He smoothed my cushion when he saw
it awry, and so well, I had thought him accustomed to
it all his life. I see no harm in him.
I doubt not, mother. He certainly knows well
how to cheat old folks not less than young ones into
confidence. That smoothing of thy cushion makes
him in thy eyes for ever.
And so it should, my son, for it shows
consideration
.
What could he hope to get from an old woman
like me, and wherefore should he think to find means
to pleasure me, but that he is well-bred, and a
gentleman
?
4
Ay, that is the word, mother--he is a gentleman--
who knows, a lord in disguise--and is therefore
superior to the poor peasant who is forced to dig his
roots for life in the unproductive sands. Wherefore
should his hands be unblistered, and mine a sore?
Wherefore should he come, and with a smile and silly
speech win his way into people's hearts, when I, with
a toiling affection of years, and a love that almost
grows into a worship of its object, may not gather a
single regard from any? Has nature given me life for
this? Have I had a thought given me, bidding me
ascend the eminence and look down upon the multitude,
only for denial and torture? Wherefore is this cruelty,
this injustice? Can you answer, motherdoes the
Bible tell you any thing on this subject?
Be not irreverent, my son, but take the sacred
volume more frequently into your own hands if you
desire an answer to your question. Why, Hughey, are
you so perverse? making yourself and all unhappy
about you, and still fevering with every thing you see.
That is the question, mother, that I asked you
but now. Why is it? Why am I not like my brother,
who looks upon this Harrison as if he were a god,
and will do his bidding, and fetch and carry for him
like a spaniel? I am not so--yet thou hast taught us
both--we have known no other teaching. Why does
he love the laughter of the crowd, content to send up
like sounds with the many, when I prefer the solitude,
or if I go forth with the rest, go forth only to dissent
and to deny, and to tutor my voice into a sound that
shall be unlike any of theirs? Why is all this?
Nay, I know not, yet so it is, Hughey. Thou wert
of this nature from thy cradle, and wouldst reject the
toy which looked like that of thy brother, and quarrel
with the sport which he had chosen.
Yet thou wouldst have me like himbut I would
rather perish with my own thoughts in the gloomiest
dens of the forest, where the sun comes not; and
better, far better that it were sofar better, he
exclaimed
,
moodily.
What say'st thou, Hugheywhy this new sort of
language? what has troubled thee? inquired the old
woman, affectionately.
Mother, I am a slavea dogan accursed thing,
and in the worst of bondageI am nothing.
How!
I would be, and I am not. They keep me down
they refuse to hearthey do not heed me, and with a
thought of command and a will of power in me, they yet
pass me by, and I must give way to a bright wand and a
gilded chain. Even here in these woods, with a poor
neighbourhood, and surrounded by those who are
unhonoured
and unknown in society, theythe slaves
that they are!they seek for artificial forms, and
bind themselves with constraints that can only have a
sanction in the degradation of the many. They yield
up the noble and true attributes of a generous nature,
and make themselves subservient to a name and a
markthus it is that fathers enslave their children;
and but for this, our lords proprietors, whom God in
his mercy take to himself, have dared to say, even in
this wild land not yet their own, to the people who
have battled its dangersye shall worship after our
fashion, or your voices are unheard. Who is the
tyrant in this?not the rulernot the rulerbut those
base spirits who let him rule,those weak and
unworthy
,
who, taking care to show their weaknesses, have
invited the oppression which otherwise could have no
head. I would my thoughts were theirsor, and
perhaps
it were betterI would their thoughts were
mine.
God's will be done, my sonbut I would thou
hadst this content of dispositionwithout which there
is no happiness.
Content, motherhow idle is that thought. Life
itself is discontenthope, which is one of our chief
sources of enjoyment, is discontent, since it seeks that
which it has not. Content is a sluggard, and should be
a slavea thing to eat and sleep, and perhaps to dream
of eating and sleeping, but not a thing to live.
Discontent
is the life of enterprise, of achievement, of
gloryay, even of affection. I know the preachers
say not this, and the cant of the books tells a
different
story; but I have thought of it, mother, and I know!
Without discontenta serious and unsleeping
discontent
life
would be a stagnant stream as untroubled as
the back water of the swamps of Edistoh, and as full
of the vilest reptiles.
Thou art for ever thinking strange things, Hugh,
and different from all other people, and somehow I can
never sleep after I have been talking with thee.
Because I have thought for myself, motherin the
woods, by the watersand have not had my mind
compressed into the old time-mould with which the
pedant shapes the sculls of the imitative apes that
courtesy considers human. My own mind is my
teacher, and perhaps my tyrant. It is some
satisfaction
that I have no other. It is some satisfaction that
I may still refuse to look out for idols such as Walter
loves to seek and worship--demeaning a name and
family which he thus can never honour.
What reproach is this, Hughey? Wherefore art
thou thus often speaking unkindly of thy brother?
Thou dost wrong him.
He wrongs me, mother, and the name of my father,
when he thus for ever cringes to this captain of yours--
this Harrisonwhose name and image mingle in with
his every thought, and whom he thrusts into my senses
at every word which he utters.
Let not thy dislike to Harrison make thee
distrustful
of thy brother. Beware, Hughey--beware, my son,
thou dost not teach thyself to hate where nature would
have thee love!
Would I could--how much more happiness were
mine! Could I hate where now I lovecould I
exchange
affections, devotion, a passionate worship, for
scorn, for hate, for indifference,--any thing so it be
change! and the youth groaned at the conclusion of
the sentence, while he thrust his face buried in his
hands against the wall.
Thou prayest for a bad spirit, Hugh; and a temper
of sinhear now, what the good book says, just where
I have been reading; and she was about to read, but
he hurriedly approached and interrupted her--
Does it say why I should have senses, feelings,
faculties of mind, moral, person, to be denied their
aim, their exercise, their utterance? Does it say why
I should live, for persecution, for shame, for shackles?
If it explain not this, mother,read notI will not
hearlook! I shut my earsI will not hear even thy
voiceI am deaf, and would have thee dumb!
Hugh, responded the old woman, solemnly
have I loved thee or not?
Wherefore the question, mother? he returned,
with a sudden change from passionate and tumultuous
emotion, to a more gentle and humble expression.
I would know from thy own lips, that thou
thinkest
me worthy only of thy unkind speech, and look,
and gesture. If I have not loved thee well, and as my
son, thy sharp words are good, and I deserve them;
and I shall bear them without reproach or reply.
Madness, mother, dear motherhold me a
madman
,
but not forgetful of thy lovethy too much love
for one so undeserving. It is thy indulgence that
makes me thus presuming. Hadst thou been less kind,
I feel that I should have been less daring.
Ah! Hugh, thou art wrestling with evil, and thou
lovest too much its embracebut stay,thou art not
going forth again to-night?she asked, seeing him
about to leave the apartment.
Yes, yesI must, I must go.
Where, I pray
To the woodsto the woods. I must walkout
of sightin the airI must have fresh air, for I choke
strangely.
Sick, Hughey,my boystay, and let me get thee
some medicine.
No, no,not sick, dear mother; keep me not back
fear not for meI was never betternever better.
And he supported her, with an effort at moderation,
back to her chair. She was forced to be satisfied with
the assurance, which, however, could not quiet.
Thou wilt come back soon, Hughey, for I am all
alone, and Walter is with the captain.
The captain!ay, ay, soon enough, soon enough,
and as he spoke he was about to pass from the door of
the apartment, when the ill-suppressed sigh which she
uttered as she contemplated in him the workings of a
passion too strong for her present power to suppress,
arrested his steps. He turned quickly, looked back
for an instant, then rushed towards her, and kneeling
down by her side, pressed her hand to his lips, while
he exclaimed--
Bless me, mother--bless your sonpray for him,
too--pray that he may not madden with the wild
thoughts and wilder hopes that keep him watchful and
sometimes make him wayward.
I do, HugheyI do, my son. May God in his
mercy bless thee, as I do now!
He pressed her hand once more to his lips and
passed from the apartment.
CHAPTER VI.
What have I done to thee, that thou shouldst lift
Thy hand against me? Wherefore wouldst thou strike
The heart that never wrong'd thee?
'Tis a lie,
Thou art mine enemy, that evermore
Keep'st me awake o' nights. I cannot sleep,
While thou art in my thought.
Flying
from the house, as if by so doing he might
lose the thoughts that had roused him there into a
paroxysm of that fierce passion which too much
indulgence
had made habitual, he rambled, only half
conscious
of his direction, from cluster to cluster of the
old trees, until the seductive breeze of the evening,
coming up from the river, led him down into that
quarter. The stream lay before him in the shadow of
night, reflecting clearly the multitude of starry eyes
looking down from the heavens upon it, and with but a
slight ripple, under the influence of the evening breeze,
crisping its otherwise settled bosom. How different
from histhat wanderer! The disappointed lovethe
vexed ambitionthe feverish thirst for the unknown,
perhaps for the forbidden, increasing his agony at every
stride which he took along those quiet waters. It was
here in secret places, that his passion poured itself
forthwith the crowd it was all kept down by the
stronger pride, which shrunk from the thought of
making its feelings public property. With them he was
simply cold and forbidding, or perhaps recklessly and
inordinately gay. This was his policy. He well
knew how great is the delight of the vulgar mind
when it can search and tent the wound which it
discovers
you to possess. How it delights to see the
victim writhe under its infliction, and, with how much
pleasure its ears drink in the groans of suffering,
particularly
the suffering of the heart. He knew that men
are never so well content, once apprized of the sore,
as when they are probing it; unheeding the wincings,
or enjoying them with the same sort of satisfaction
with which the boy tortures the kittenand he
determined
,
in his case at least, to deprive them of that
gratification. He had already learned how much we
are the sport of the many, when we become the
victims of the few.
The picture of the night around him was not for
such a mood. There is a condition of mind necessary
for the due appreciation of each object and enjoyment,
and harmony is the life-principle, as well of man as
of nature. That quiet stream, with its sweet and
sleepless murmurthose watchful eyes, clustering in
capricious and beautiful groups above, and peering
down, attended by a thousand frail glories, into the
mirrored waters beneaththose bending trees, whose
matted arms and branches, fringing in the river, made
it a hallowed home for the dreaming solitarythey
chimed not in with that spirit, which, now ruffled by
crossing currents, felt not, saw not, desired not their
influences. At another time, in another mood, he had
worshipped them; now, their very repose and softness,
by offering no interruption to the train of his own wild
musings, rather contributed to their headstrong growth.
The sudden tempest had done the workthe storm
precedes a degree of quiet which in ordinary nature
is unknown.
Peace, peacegive me peace! he cried, to the
elements. The small echo from the opposite bank, cried
back to him, in a tone of soothing, peacebut he
waited not for its answer. Wherefore do I ask? he
murmured to himself, and what is it that I ask?
Peace, indeed! Repose, ratherrelease, escapea free
release from the accursed agony of this still pursuing
thought. Is life peace, even with love attained, with
conquest, with a high hope realizedwith an ambition
secure in all men's adoration! Peace, indeed! Thou
liest, thou life! thou art an imbodied lie,wherefore
dost thou talk to me of peace? Ye elements, that
murmur
on in falsehood,stars and suns, streams, and ye
gnarled monitorsye are all false. Ye would sooth,
and ye excite, lure, encourage, tempt, and deny.
The peace of life is insensibilitythe suicide of mind
or affection. Is that a worse crime than the murder
of the animal? Impossible. I may not rob the heart of
its passionthe mind of its immortality; and the death
of matter is absurd. Ha! there is but one to carebut
one,and she is old. A yeara monthand the loss
is a loss no longer. There is too much light here for
that. Why need these stars seewhy should any see,
or hear, or know? When I am silent they will shine
--and the waters rove on, and she--she will be not
less happy that I come not between her and. A
dark spot--gloomy and still, where the groan will
have no echo, and no eye may trace the blood which
streams from a heart that has only too much within it.
Thus soliloquizing, in the aberration of intellect,
which was too apt to follow a state of high excitement
in the individual before us, he plunged into a small,
dark cavity of wood, lying not far from the river road,
but well concealed, as it was partly under the
contiguous
swamp. Here, burying the handle of his bared
knife in the thick ooze of the soil upon which he
stood, the sharp point upwards, and so placed that it
must have penetrated, he knelt down at a brief space
from it, and, with a last thought upon the mother whom
he could not then forbear to think upon, he strove to
pray. But he could notthe words stuck in his
throat, and he gave it up in despair. He turned to the
fatal weapon, and throwing open his vest, so as to free
the passage to his heart of all obstructions, with a
swimming and indirect emotion of the brain, he prepared
to cast himself, from the spot where he knelt, upon its
unvarying edge, but at that moment came the quick
tread of a horse's hoof to his ear; and with all that
caprice which must belong to the mind which, usually
good, has yet even for an instant purposed a crime not
less foolish than foul, he rose at once to his feet. The
unlooked-for sounds had broken the spell of the scene
and situation; and seizing the bared weapon, he
advanced
to the edge of the swamp, where it looked down
upon the road which ran alongside. The sounds
rapidly increased in force; and at length, passing
directly along before him, his eye distinguished the
outline of a person whom he knew at once to be
Harrison
.
The rider went by, but in a moment after,
the sounds had ceased. His progress had been
arrested
,
and with an emotion, strange and still seemingly
without purpose, and for which he did not seek to
account, Grayson changed his position, and moved
along the edge of the road to where the sounds of the
horse had terminated. His fingers clutched the knife,
bared for a different purpose, with a strange sort of
ecstasy. A sanguinary picture of triumph and of terror
rose up before his eyes; and the leaves and the trees,
to his mind, seemed of the one hue, and dripping with
gouts of blood. The demon was full in every thought.
A long train of circumstances and their concomitants
crowded upon his mental visioncircumstances of
strife, concealment, future successdeep, long-looked
for enjoymentand still, with all, came the beautiful
image of Bess Matthews
Thus the one passion subject makes of all,
And slaves of the strong sense
There was a delirious whirla rich, confused
assemblage
of the strange, the sweet, the wild, in his spirit,
that in his morbid condition was a deep delight; and
without an effort to bring order to the adjustment of
this confusion, as would have been the case with a
well-regulated mindwithout a purpose, in his own
view, he advanced cautiously and well concealed
behind
the trees, and approached towards the individual
whom he had long since accustomed himself only to
regard as an enemy. Concealment is a leading
influence
of crime with individuals not accustomed to
refer all their feelings and thoughts to the control
of just principles, and the remoteness and the silence,
the secrecy of the scene, and the ease with which the
crime could be covered up, were among the moving
causes which prompted the man to murder, who had a
little before meditated suicide.
Harrison had alighted from his horse, and was then
busied in fastening his bridle to a swinging branch of
the tree under which he stood. Having done this, and
carefully thrown the stirrups across the saddle, he left
him, and sauntering back a few paces to a spot of
higher ground, he threw himself, with the composure
of an old hunter, at full length upon the long grass,
which tufted prettily the spot he had chosen. This
done, he sounded merrily three several notes upon the
horn which hung about his neck, and seemed then to
await the coming of another.
The blast of the horn gave quickness to the
approach
of Hugh Grayson, who had been altogether
unnoticed by Harrison; and he now stood in the
shadow of a tree, closely observing the fine, manly
outline, the graceful position, and the entire symmetry
of his rival's extended person. He saw, and his
passions
grew more and more tumultuous with the
survey
.
His impulses became stronger as his increasing
thoughts grew more strange. There was a feeling of
strife, and a dream of blood in his fancyhe longed
for the one, and his eye saw the othera rich,
attractive
,
abundant stream, pouring, as it were, from the
thousand arteries of some overshadowing tree. The
reasoning powers all grew silentthe moral faculties
were distorted with the survey; and the feelings were
only so many winged arrows goading him on to evil.
For a time, the guardian consciencethat high
standard
of moral education, without which we cease to be
human, and are certainly unhappybattled stoutly;
and taking the shape of a thought, which told him
continually
of his mother, kept back, nervously restless,
the hand which clutched the knife. But the fierce
passions grew triumphant, with the utterance of a
single name from the lips of Harrison,that of Bess,
linked with the tenderest epithets of affection.
With a fierce fury as he heard it, Grayson sprung forth
from the tree, and his form went heavily down upon
the breast of the prostrate man.
Ha! assassin, what art thou? and he struggled
manfully with the assailant, whereforewhat wouldst
thou?speak!
Thy bloodthy blood! was the only answer, as
the knife was uplifted.
Horrible! but thou wilt fight for it, murderer, was
the reply of Harrison, while, struggling with
prodigious
effort, though at great disadvantage from the
close-pressed form of Grayson, whose knee was upon
his breast, he strove with one hand, at the same
moment
to free his own knife from its place in his bosom,
while aiming to ward off with the other the stroke of
his enemy. The whole affair had been so sudden, so
perfectly unlooked-for by Harrison, who, not yet in
the Indian country, had not expected danger, that he
could not but conceive that the assailant had mistaken
him for another. In the moment, therefore, he
appealed
to him.
Thou hast erred, stranger. I am not he thou
seekest.
Thou liest, was the grim response of Grayson.
Ha! who art thou?
Thy enemyin life, in death, through the past,
and for the long future, though it be endless,still
thine enemy. I hateI will destroy thee. Thou
hast lain in my paththou hast darkened my hope
thou hast doomed me to eternal wo. Shalt thou have
what thou hast denied me? Shalt thou live to win
where I have lost? NoI have thee. There is no
aid for thee. In another moment, and I am revenged.
Diedie like a dog, since thou hast doomed me to
live, and to feel like one. Die!
The uplifted eyes of Harrison beheld the blade
descending in the strong grasp of his enemy. One
more effort, one last struggle, for the true mind never
yields. While reason lasts, hope lives, for the natural
ally of human reason is hope. But he struggled in
vain. The hold taken by his assailant was
unrelaxing
that
of iron; and the thoughts of Harrison,
though still he struggled, were strangely mingling
with the prayer, and the sweet dream of a passion,
now about to be defrauded of its joys for everbut,
just at the moment when he had given himself up as
utterly lost, the grasp of his foe was withdrawn. The
criminal had relentedthe guardian conscience had
resumed her sway in time for the safety of both the
destroyer and his victim. And what a revulsion of
feeling and of sense! How terrible is passionhow
terrible in its approachhow more terrible in its
passage
and departure! The fierce madman, a moment
before ready to drink a goblet-draught from the heart
of his enemy, now trembled before him, like a leaf
half detached by the frost, and yielding at the first
breathings of the approaching zephyr. Staggering
back as if himself struck with the sudden shaft of
death, Grayson sunk against the tree from which he
had sprung in his first assault, and covered his hands
in agony. His breast heaved like a wave of the ocean
when the winds gather in their desperate frolic over
its always sleepless bosom; and his whole frame was
rocked to and fro, with the moral convulsions of his
spirit. Harrison rose to his feet the moment he had
been released, and with a curiosity not unmingled with
caution, approached the unhappy man.
What! Master Hugh Grayson! he exclaimed
naturally enough, as he found out who he was, what
has tempted thee to this madnesswherefore?
Ask me notask me notin mercy, ask me not.
Thou art safe, thou art safe. I have not thy blood
upon my hands; thank God for that. It was her
blessing that saved theethat saved me; oh, mother,
how I thank thee for that blessing. It took the
madness
from my spirit in the moment when I would have
struck thee, Harrison, even with as fell a joy as the
Indian strikes in battle. Gothou art safe.Leave
me, I pray thee. Leave me to my own dreadful
thoughtthe thought which hates, and would just now
have destroyed thee.
But wherefore that thought, Master Grayson?
Thou art but young to have such thoughts, and shouldst
take counseland why such should be thy thoughts
of me, I would know from thy own lips, which have
already said so much that is strange and unwelcome.
Strange, dost thou say, exclaimed the youth with
a wild grin, not strangenot strange. But gogo
leave me, lest the dreadful passion come back. Thou
didst wrong methou hast done me the worst of
wrongs, though, perchance, thou knowest it not. But
it is over nowthou art safe. I ask thee not to
forgive
,
but if thou wouldst serve me, Master
Harrison
Speak! said the other, as the youth paused.
If thou wouldst serve me,think me thy foe, thy
deadly foe; one waiting and in mood to slay, and so
thinking, as one bound to preserve himself at all
hazard
,
use thy knife upon my bosom now, as I would
Vol. II.C 5
have used mine upon thee. Strike, if thou wouldst
serve me. And he dashed his hand upon the bared
breast violently as he spoke.
Thou art mad, Master Grayson,to ask of me to
do such folly. Hear me but a while
But the other heard him not,he muttered to himself
half incoherent words and sentences.
First suicidemiserable wretch,and then, God
of Heaven! that I should have been so nigh to
murder
,
and he sobbed like a child before the man he had
striven to slay, until pity had completely taken the
place of every other feeling in the bosom of Harrison.
At that moment the waving of a torch-light appeared
through the woods at a little distance. The criminal
started as if in terror, and was about to fly from the
spot, but Harrison interposed and prevented him.
Stay, Master Graysongo not. The light comes
in the hands of thy brother, who is to put me across
the river. Thou wilt return with him, and may thy
mood grow gentler, and thy thoughts wiser. Thou
hast been rash and foolish, but I mistake not thy
nature
,
which I hold meant for better things.I regard
it not, therefore, to thy harm; and to keep thee from
a thought which will trouble thee more than it can
harm me now, I will crave of thee to lend all thy aid
to assist thy mother from her present habitation, as
she has agreed, upon the advice of thy brother and
myself. Thou wast not so minded this morning, so
thy brother assured me; but thou wilt take my word
for it that the remove has grown essential to her safety.
Walter will tell thee all. In the meanwhile, what has
passed between us we hold to ourselves; and if, as
thou hast said, thou hast had wrong at my hands, thou
shalt have right at thy quest, when other duties will
allow.
Enough, enough! cried the youth in a low tone
impatiently, as he beheld his brother, carrying a torch,
emerge from the cover.
How now, Master Walterthou hast been
sluggard
,
and but for thy younger brother, whom I find a
pleasant gentleman, I should have worn out
good-humour
in seeking for patience.
What, Hugh here! Walter exclaimed, regarding
his brother with some astonishment, as he well knew
the dislike in which he held Harrison.
Ay, said the latter, and he has grown more
reasonable
since morning, and is now,if I so understand
himnot unwilling to give aid in thy mother's remove.
But comelet us awaywe have no time for the fire.
Of the horse, thy brother will take chargekeep him
not here for me, but let him bear thy mother to the
Block House. She will find him gentle. And now,
Master Graysonfarewell! I hope to know thee
better
on my return, as I desire thou shalt know me.
Come.
Concealed in the umbrage of the depending
shrubbery
,
a canoe lay at the water's edge, into which
Harrison
leaped, followed by the elder Grayson. They
were soon offthe skiff, like a fairy bark, gliding
almost noiselessly across that Indian river. Watching
their progress for a while, Hugh Grayson lingered,
until the skiff became a speck, then, with strangely
mingled feelings of humiliation and satisfaction,
leaping
upon the steed which had been given him in
charge, he took his way to the dwelling of his mother.
CHAPTER VII.
Be thy teeth firmly set; the time is come
To rend and trample. We are ready all,
All, but the victim.
At
dark, Sanutee, Ishiagaska, Enoree-Mattee, the
prophet, and a few others of the Yemassee chiefs and
leaders, having the same decided hostilities to the
Carolinians, met at the lodge of Ishiagaska, in the
town of Pocota-ligo, and discussed their further
preparations
C 2
at some length. The insurrection was at
hand. All the neighbouring tribes, without an
exception
,
had pledged themselves for the common object,
and the greater number of those extending over
Georgia
and Florida, were also bound in the same dreadful
contract. The enemies of the settlement, in this
conspiracy
,
extended from Cape Fear to the mountains of
Apalachy, and the disposable force of the Yemassees,
under this league, amounted to at least six thousand
warriors. These forces were gathering at various points
according to arrangement, and large bodies from sundry
tribes had already made their appearance at
Pocota-ligo
,
from which it was settled the first blow should be
given. Nor were the Indians, thus assembling,
bowmen
merely. The Spanish authorities of St.
Augustine
,
who were at the bottom of the conspiracy, had
furnished them with a considerable supply of arms,
and the conjecture of Harrison rightly saw in the
boxes transferred by Chorley the seaman to the
Yemassees
,
those weapons of massacre which the policy
of the Carolinians had withheld. These, however,
were limited to the forest nobilitythe several chiefs
bound in the war;to the commons, a knife or
tomahawk
was the assigned, and, perhaps, the more truly
useful present. A musket, at that period, in the hands
of the unpractised savage, was not half so dangerous
as a bow. To these warriors we must add the
pirate
Chorleya desperado in every sense of the word,
a profligate boy, a vicious and outlawed mandaring,
criminal, and only engaging in the present adventure
in the hope of the spoil and plunder which he hoped
from it. In the feeble condition of the infant colony
there was no great risk in his present position.
Without
vessels of war of any sort, and only depending
upon the mother country for such assistance,
whenever
a French or Spanish invasion took place, while
British aid was in the neighbourhood, the province
was lamentably defenceless. The visit of Chorley, in
reference to this weakness, had been admirably
well-timed
.
He had waited until the departure of the
Swallow, the English armed packet, which
periodically
traversed the ocean with advices from the
sovereign
to the subject. He then made his appearance,
secure from that danger, and, indeed, if we may rely
upon the historians of the period, almost secure from
any other; for we are told that in their wild abodes,
the colonists were not always the scrupulous moralists
which another region had made them. They did not
scruple at this or that sort of trade, so long as it was
profitable; and Chorley, the pirate, would have had no
difficulty, as he well knew by experience, so long as
he avoided any overt performance, forcing upon the
public sense a duty, which many of the people were
but too well satisfied when they could avoid. It did
not matter to many among those with whom he pursued
his traffic, whether or not the article which they
procured
at so cheap a rate had been bought with blood
and the strong hand. It was enough that the goods
were to be had when wanted, of as fair quality, and
fifty per cent cheaper than those offered in the
legitimate
course of trade. To sum up all in little, our
European ancestors were, in many respects, monstrous
great rascals.
Chorley was present at this interview with the
insurrectionary
chiefs of Yemassee, and much good counsel
he gave them. The meeting was preparatory, and
here they prepared the grand
mouvement
, and settled the
disposition of the subordinates. Here they arranged
all those small matters of etiquette beforehand, by which
to avoid little jealousies and disputes among their
auxiliaries
;
for national pride, or rather the great glory of
the clan, was as desperate a passion with the southern
Indians, as with the yet more breechless highlanders.
Nothing was neglected in this interview which, to the
deliberate mind, seemed necessary to success; and
they were prepared to break up in order to the general
assemblage of the people, to whom the formal and
official
announcement was to be given, when Ishiagaska
recalled them to a matter which, to that fierce Indian,
seemed much more important than any. Chorley
looked on the animated glancethe savage grin,and
though he knew not the signification of the words, he
yet needed no interpreter to convey to him the purport
of his speech.
The dog must smell the blood, or he tears not the
throat. Ha! shall not the War-Manneyto have a
feast?
Sanutee looked disquieted but said nothing, while
the eye of Ishiagaska followed his glance and seemed
to search him narrowly. He spoke again, approaching
the well-beloved:
The Yemassee hath gone on the track of the Swift
Foot, and the English has run beside him. They have
taken a name from the pale-face and called him brother.
Brother is a strong word for Yemassee, and he must
taste of his blood, or he will not hunt after the English.
The War-Manneyto would feast upon the heart of a
pale-face, to make strong the young braves of
Yemassee
.
It is goodlet the War-Manneyto have the feast
upon the heart of the English! exclaimed the prophet,
and such seeming the general expression, Sanutee
yielded, though reluctantly. They left the lodge, and
in an hour a small party of young warriors, to whom,
in his wild, prophetic manner, Enoree-Mattee had
revealed
the requisitions of the God he served, went forth
to secure an English victim for the dreadful
propitiatory
sacrifice they proposed to offer, in the hope of
success, to the Indian Moloch.
This done, the chiefs distributed themselves among
the several bands of the people and their allies,
stimulating
by their arguments and eloquence, the fierce
spirit which they now laboured to evoke in storm and
tempest. We leave them to return to Harrison.
The adventure he was now engaged in was
sufficiently
perilous. He knew the danger, and also felt
that there were particular responsibilities in his case
which increased it greatly. With this consciousness
came a proportionate degree of caution. He was
shrewd to a proverb among those who knew him
practised considerably in Indian manuvrehad been
with them in frequent conflict, and could anticipate
their artswas resolute as well as daring, and with
much of their circumspection, at the same time, had
learned skilfully to imitate the thousand devices of
stratagem and concealment which make the glory of
the Indian brave. Having given as fair a warning as
was in his power to those of his countrymen most
immediately
exposed to the danger, he was less reluctant
to undertake the adventure. But had he been
conscious
of the near approach of the time fixed on by the
enemy for the explosioncould he have dreamed that
it was so extensive and so near at hand, his attitude
would have been very different indeed. But this was
the very knowledge for the attainment of which he had
taken his present journey. The information sought
was important in determining upon the degree of effort
necessary to the defence.
It was still early evening, when the canoe of
Grayson
,
making into a little cove about a mile and a half
below Pocota-ligo, enabled Harrison to land. With a
last warning to remove as quickly as possible, and to
urge as many more as he could to the shelter of the
Block House, he left his companion to return to the
settlement; then plunging into the woods, and carefully
making a sweep out of his direct course, in order to
come in upon the back of the Indian town, so as to
avoid as much as practicable the frequented paths, he
went fearlessly upon his way. For some time,
proceeding
with slow and heedful step, he went on without
interruption, yet not without a close scrutiny into every
thing he saw. One thing struck him, however, and
induced unpleasant reflection. He saw that many of
the dwellings which he approached were without fires,
and seemed deserted. The inhabitants were gonehe
met with none; and he felt assured that a popular
gathering
was at hand or in progress. For two miles of
his circuit he met with no sign of human beings; and
he had almost come to the conclusion that Pocota-ligo,
which was only a mile or so farther, would be equally
barren, when suddenly a torch flamed across his path,
and with an Indian instinct he sunk back into the
shadow of a tree, and scanned curiously the scene
before
him. The torch grew into a blaze in a hollow of
the wood, and around the fire he beheld, in various
positions
,
some fifteen or twenty warriors, making a small
war encampment. Some lay at length, some squat,
like a toad, and all gathered around the friendly blaze
which had just been kindled in time to prevent him
from running headlong into the midst of them. From
the shadow of the tree, which perfectly concealed him,
he could see, by the light around which they clustered,
not only the forms but the features of the warriors;
and he soon made them out to be the remnant of his
old acquaintance, the Coosawswho, after the dreadful
defeat which they sustained at his hands in the forks
of Tulifinnee, found refuge with the Yemassees, settled
the village of Coosaw-hatchie, and being too small in
number to call for the further hostility of the
Carolinians
,
were suffered to remain in quiet. But they
harboured
a bitter malice towards their conquerors, and the
call to the field against their ancient enemies was the
sweetest boon which could be proffered to their hearts.
With a curious memory which recalled vividly his past
adventure with the same people, he surveyed their
diminutive persons, their small, quick, sparkling eyes,
the dusky, but irritably red features, and the querulous
upward turn of the nosea most distinguishing feature
with this clan, showing a feverish quarrelsomeness of
disposition, and a want of becoming elevation in
purpose
.
Harrison knew them well, and his intimacy had
cost them dearly. It was probable, indeed, that the
fifteen or twenty warriors then grouped before him
were all that they could send into the fieldall that
had survived, women and children excepted, the severe
chastisement which had annihilated them as a nation.
But what they lacked in number they made up in
valoura fierce, sanguinary people, whose habits of
restlessness and love of strife were a proverb even
among their savage neighbours, who spoke of a
malignant
manone more so than usual,as having a
Coosaw's tooth. But a single warrior of this party was
in possession of a musket, a huge, cumbrous weapon,
of which he seemed not a little proud. He was
probably
a chief. The rest were armed with bow and
arrow, knife, and, here and there, a hatchet. The huge
club stuck up conspicuously among them, besmeared
with coarse paint, and surmounted with a human scalp,
instructed Harrison sufficiently as to the purpose of
the party. The war-club carried from hand to hand,
and in this way transmitted from tribe to tribe, from
nation to nation, by their swiftest runners, was a mode
of organization not unlike that employed by the Scotch,
for a like object, and of which the muse of Scott has
so eloquently sung. The spy was satisfied with the
few glances which he had given to this little party;
and as he could gather nothing distinctly from their
language, which he heard imperfectly, and as
imperfectly
understood, he cautiously left his place of
concealment
,
and once more darted forward on his journey.
Digressing from his path as circumstances or prudence
required, he pursued his course in a direct line towards
Pocota-ligo; but had not well lost sight of the fire of
the Coosaws, when another blaze appeared in the track
just before him. Pursuing a like caution with that
already given, he approached sufficiently nigh to
distinguish
a band of
Sewees
, something more numerous
than the Coosaws, but still not strong, encamping in
like manner around the painted club, the common
ensign
of approaching battle. He knew them by the
number of shells which covered their garments, were
twined in their hair, and formed a peculiar and favourite
ornament to their persons, while at the same time,
declaring their location. They occupied one of the
islands which still bear their namethe only relics
of a nation which had its god and its glories, and
believing
in the Manneyto and a happy valley, can have
no complaint that their old dwellings shall know them no
more. The Sewees resembled the Coosaws in their
general expression of face, but in person they were
C 3
taller and more symmetrical, though slender. They
did not exceed thirty in number.
The precautions of Harrison were necessarily
increased
,
as he found himself in such a dangerous
neighbourhood, but still he felt nothing of
apprehension
.
He was one of those men, singularly constituted,
in whom hope becomes a strong exciting principle,
perpetually stimulating confidence and encouraging
adventure
into a forgetfulness of risk and general
disregard
to difficulty and opposition. On he went, until
at the very entrance to the village he came upon an
encampment of the Santees, a troop of about fifty
warriors. These he knew by their greater size and
muscle, being generally six feet or more in height, of
broad shoulders, full, robust front, and forming not less
in their countenances, which were clear, open and
intelligent
,
than in their persons, a singular and marked
contrast
to the Sewees and Coosaws. They carried, along
with the bow, anotherand in their hands a more
formidable
weapona huge mace, four or five feet in
length, of the heaviest wood, swelling into a huge
lump at the remote extremity, and hanging by a thong
of skin or sinews around their necks. A glance was
enough to show their probable number, and desiring no
more, Harrison sunk away from further survey, and
carefully avoiding the town, on the skirts of which he
stood, he followed in the direction to which he was
led by a loud uproar and confused clamour coming from
it. This was the place of general encampment, a little
above the village, immediately upon the edge of the
swamp from which the river wells, being the sacred
ground of Yemassee, consecrated to their several
Manneytos of war, peace, punishment, and general
powerwhich contained the great tumulus of
Pocota-ligo
,
consecrated by a thousand awful sacrifices, for a
thousand years preceding, and already known to us as
the spot where Occonestoga, saved from perdition, met
his death from the hands of his mother.
CHAPTER VIII.
Battle-god Manneyto
Here's a scalp, 'tis a scull,
This is blood, 'tis a heart,
Scalp, scull, blood, heart,
'Tis for thee, Manneyto'tis for thee, Manneyto
They shall make a feast for thee,
Battle-god Manneyto.
Yemassee War-Hymn
.
The
preparatory rites of battle were about to take
place around the tumulus. The warriors were about
to propitiate the Yemassee God of Warthe
Battle-Manneyto
and
the scene was now, if possible, more
imposing than ever. It was with a due solemnity that
they approached the awful rites with which they
invoked
this stern principledoubly solemn, as they
could not but feel that the existence of their nation
was the stake at issue. They were prostratethe
thousand warriors of Yemasseetheir wives, their
childrentheir faces to the ground, but their eyes
upward
,
bent upon the cone of the tumulus, where
a faint flame, dimly flickering under the breath of the
capricious winds, was struggling doubtfully into
existence
.
Enoree-Mattee the prophet stood in anxious
attendancethe only person in the neighbourhood of
the firefor the spot upon which he stood was holy.
He moved around it, in attitudes now lofty, now
grotesque
now
impassioned and now humbledfeeding
the flame at intervals as he did so with fragments of
wood, which had been consecrated by other rites, and
sprinkling it at the same time with the dried leaves of
the native and finely odorous vanella, which diffused
a grateful perfume upon the gale. All this time he
muttered a low, monotonous chant, which seemed an
incantationnow and then, at pauses in his song,
turning
to the gathered multitude, over whose heads, as
they lay in thick groups around the tumulus, he
extended
his arms as if in benediction. The flame
all this while gathered but slowly, and this was matter
of discontent to both prophet and people; for the
gathering of the fire was to indicate the satisfaction
of the Manneyto with their proposed design. While
its progress was doubtful, therefore, a silence entirely
unbroken, and full of awe, prevailed throughout the
crowd. But when it burst forth, growing and
gathering
seizing
with a ravenous rapidity upon the sticks
and stubble with which it had been suppliedlicking
the long grass as it progressed, and running down the
sides of the tumulus, until it completely encircled the
gorgeously decorated form of Enoree-Mattee as with a
wreath of firewhen it sent its votive and odorous smoke
in a thick, direct column, up to the heavensa single,
unanimous shout, that thrilled through and through the
forest, even as the sudden uproar of one of its own
terrible hurricanes, burst forth from that now
exhilarated
assembly, while each started at once to his feet,
brandished his weapons with a fierce joy, and all
united in that wild chorus of mixed strife and
adoration
,
the battle-hymn of their nation:
Sangarrah-me, Yemassee,
Sangarrah-meSangarrah-me
Battle-god Manneyto,
Here's a scalp, here's a scull,
This is blood, 'tis a heart,
Scalp, scull, blood, heart,
'Tis for thee, battle-god,
'Tis to make the feast for thee,
Battle-god, battle-god.
And as they repeated the fierce cry of onset, the
war-whoop of the Yemassees, another shout in chorus
followed from the great mass of the people beyond.
This cry, carried onwards by successive groups
previously
stationed for that purpose, was announced to
the various allies in their different encampments, and
was equivalent to a permission of the Yemassee god
that they should appear, and join in the subsequent
ceremoniala ceremonial which now affected them
equally with the Yemassees.
They came at length, the great body of that fierce
but motley gathering. In so many clans, each marched
apart, with the distinct emblem of its tribe. There
came the subtle and the active Coosaw, with his small
flaming black eye, in which gathered the most
malignant
fires. A stuffed rattlesnake in coil, with protruded
fang, perched upon a staff, formed their emblem, and
no bad characteristic, for they were equally fearless
and equally fatal with that reptile. Then came the
Combahee and the Edistoh, the Santee and the Seratee
the two latter kindred tribes bearing huge clubs,
which they wielded with equal strength and agility, in
addition to the knife and bow. Another and another
cluster forming around, completed a grouping at
once imposing and unique,each body, as they
severally
came to behold the sacred fire, swelling upwards
from the mound, precipitating themselves upon the
earth where first it met their sight. The prophet still
continued his incantations, until, at a given signal,
when Sanutee, as chief of his people, ascended the
tumulus, and bending his form reverently as he did
so, approached him to know the result of his auguries.
The appearance of the old chief was haggard in the
extremehis countenance bore all the traces of that
anxiety which, at such a moment, the true patriot
would be likely to feeland a close eye might discern
evidences of a deeper feeling working at his heart,
equally vexing and of a more personal nature. Still
his manner was firm and nobly commanding. He
listened to the words of the prophet, which were in
their own language. Then advancing in front, the
chief delivered his response to the people. It was
auspiciousManneyto had promised them success
against their enemies, and their offerings had all been
accepted. He required but another, and that the
prophet assured them was at hand. Again the shout
went up to heaven, and the united warriors clashed
their weapons, and yelled aloud the triumph which
they anticipated over their foes.
6
In a neighbouring copse, well concealed by the
thicket, lay the person of Harrison. From this spot
he surveyed the entire proceedings. With the aid of
their numerous fires, he calculated their numbers and
the different nations engaged, whose emblems he
generally
knew, and listened impatiently for some
evidences
of their precise intention; but as they spoke only
in their own, or a mixed language of the several tribes,
he almost despaired of any discovery of this kind,
which would serve him much, when a new party
appeared
upon the scene, in the person of Chorley the
captain of the sloop. He appeared dressed in a
somewhat
gaudy uniforma pair of pistols stuck in his
belta broad short sword at his side, and dagger
and, though evidently in complete military array,
without
having discarded the rich golden chain, which
hung suspended ostentatiously from his thick, short,
bull-shaped neck. The guise of Chorley was Spanish,
and over his head, carried by one of his seamen in a
group of twenty of them, which followed him, he bore
the flag of Spain, and this confirmed Harrison in all
his apprehensions. He saw that once again the
Spaniard was about to strike the colony, in assertion
of an old claim put in by his monarch to all the
country
then in the possession of the English, northward
as far as Virginia, and to the southwest the entire
range, including the Mississippi and some even of the
territory beyond it, in the vague vastness of
geographical
imaginings at that period. In support of this
claim, which, under the existing circumstances of
European convention, the Spanish monarch could not
proceed to urge by arms in any other mannerthe two
countries being then at peace at homethe governor
of the one colony, that of Spain, was suffered and
instigated to do that which his monarch immediately
dared not; and from St. Augustine innumerable inroads
were daily projected into Georgia and the Carolinas,
penetrating with their Indian allies, in some instances
almost to the gates of Charlestown. The Carolinians
were not idle, and similar inroads were made upon
Florida; the two parents looking quietly on the strife
of the colonies, as it gratified the national animosity
of either nation, who, seeming quiet enough at home,
yet mutually contributed to the means of annoyance
and defence, as their colonies severally needed them.
This sort of warfare had been continued almost from
the commencement of either settlement, and the result
was a system of foray into the enemy's province from
time to timenow of the Spaniards, and now of the
Carolinians.
Harrison was soon taught to see by the evidence
before him, that the Spaniard on the present occasion
had more deeply matured his plans than he had ever
anticipated; and thattaking advantage of the known
discontents among the Indians, and of that unwise
cessation
of watchfulness, which too much indicated the
confiding nature of the Carolinians, induced by a term
of repose, protracted somewhat longer than usualhe
had prepared a mine which he fondly hoped, and with
good reason, would result in the utter extermination
of the intruders, whom they loved to destroy, as on
one sanguinary occasion their own inscription phrased
it, not so much because they were Englishmen, but
because they were heretics. His success in the
present adventure, he felt assured, and correctly,
would place the entire province in the possession, as
in his thought it was already in the right, of his most
Catholic Majesty.
Captain Chorley, the bucanier and Spanish
emissary
,
for, in those times and that region, the two
characters
were not always unlike, advanced boldly into the
centre of the various assemblage. He was followed
by twenty stout seamen, the greater part of his crew.
These were armed chiefly with pikes and cutlasses.
A few carried pistols, a few muskets; but, generally
speaking, the larger arms seemed to have been
regarded
as unnecessary, and perhaps inconvenient, in
an affair requiring despatch and secrecy. As he
approached
,
Sanutee descended from the mound and
advanced
towards him, with a degree of respect, which,
while it was marked and gracious, subtracted nothing
from the lofty carriage and the towering dignity
which at the same time accompanied it. In a few
words of broken English, he explained to Chorley
sundry of their present and future proceedings
detailed
what was required of him, in the rest of the
ceremony; and having made him understand, which
he did with some difficulty, he reascended the mound,
resuming his place at the side of the prophet, who,
all the while, as if without noticing any thing going
on around, had continued those fearful incantations to
the war-god, which seemed to make of himself a
victim
;
for his eye glared with the light of madness
his tongue hung forth between his clinched teeth,
which seemed every moment, when parting and
gnashing, as if about to sever it in two, while the
slaver
gathered about his mouth in thick foam, and all his
features were convulsed. At a signal which he gave,
while under this fury, a long procession of women,
headed by Malatchie, the executioner, made their
appearance
from behind the hill, and advanced into the
area. In their arms six of them bore a gigantic figure,
rudely hewn out of a tree, with a head so carved as
in some sort to resemble that of a man. The hatchet
and fire had chopped out the face, if such it may be
called, and by means of one paint or another, it had
been stained into something like expression. The
scalp of some slaughtered enemy was stuck upon the
scull, and made to adhere, with pitch extracted from
the pine. The body, from the neck, was left unhewn.
This figure was stuck up in the midst of the assembly,
in the sight of all, while the old women danced in
wild contortions around it, uttering, as they did so, a
thousand invectives in their own wild language.
They charged it with all offences comprised in their
system of ethics. It was a liar, and a thiefa traitor,
and cheata murderer, and without a Manneytoin
short, in a summary of their ownthey called it
EnglishEnglishEnglish. Having done this,
they receded, leaving the area clear of all but the
unconscious
image which they had so denounced, and sinking
back behind the armed circle, they remained in silence.
Previously taught in what he was to do, Chorley now
advanced alone, and striking a hatchet full in the face
of the assembly, he cried aloud to the warriors around,
Hark, at this English dog! I strike my hatchet
in his scull. Who will do thus for the King of
Spain? Malatchie acted as interpreter in the present
instance, and the words had scarcely fallen from his
lips, when Chinnabar, a chief of the Coosaws, his
eyes darting fire, and his whole face full of malignant
delight, rushed out from his clan, and seizing the
hatchet, followed up the blow by another, which sunk
it deeply into the unconscious block, crying aloud, as
he did so, in his own language,
The Coosaw,ha! look, he strikes the scull of
the English! and the fierce war-whoop of Coosaw
Sangarrah-me, followed up the speech.
So strikes the Cherah!Cherah-hah,
Cherahme
!
cried the head warrior of that tribe, following
the example of the Coosaw, and flinging his hatchet
also in the scull of the image. Another and another,
in like manner came forward, each chief,
representing
a tribe or nation, being required to do so, showing
his assent to the war; until, in a moment of pause,
believing that all were done, Chorley reapproached,
and baring his cutlass as he did so, with a face full of
the passion which one might be supposed to exhibit,
when facing a deadly and a living foe, with a single
stroke he lodged the weapon so deeply into the wood,
that for a while its extrication was doubtfulat the
same time exclaiming fiercely,
And so strikes Richard Chorley, not for Spain, nor
France, nor Indiannot for any body, but on his own
logfor his own wrong, and so would he strike again
if the necks of all England lay under his arm.
A strong armed Santee, who had impatiently waited
his turn while Chorley spoke, now came forward with
his cluba monstrous mace, gathered from the swamps,
under the stroke of which the image went down
prostrate
.
Its fall was the signal for a general shout and
tumult among the crowd, scarcely quieted, as a new
incident was brought in to enliven a performance,
which, though of invariable exercise among the
primitive
Indians, preparatory to all great occasions like
the present, was yet too monotonous not to need, in the
end, some stirring variation.
CHAPTER IX.
And war is the great Moloch; for his feast,
Gather the human victims he requires,
With an unglutted appetite. He makes
Earth his grand table, spread with winding-sheets,
Man his attendant, who, with madness fit,
Serves his own brother up, nor heeds the prayer,
Groaned by a kindred nature, for reprieve.
Blood
makes the taste for bloodwe teach the
hound to hunt the victim, for whose entrails he acquires
an appetite. We acquire such tastes ourselves from
like indulgences. There is a sort of intoxicating
restlessness in crime that seldom suffers it to stop at
a solitary excess. It craves repetitionand the relish
so expands with indulgence, that exaggeration becomes
essential to make it a stimulant. Until we have
created this appetite, we sicken at its bare
contemplation
.
But once created, it is impatient of employ,
and it is wonderful to note its progress. Thus, the
young Nero wept when first called upon to sign the
warrant commanding the execution of a criminal. But
the ice once broken, he never suffered it to close
again. Murder was his companionblood his
banquet
his
chief stimulant licentiousnesshorrible
licentiousness
.
He had found out a new luxury.
The philosophy which teaches this, is common to
experience all the world over. It was not unknown
to the Yemassees. Distrusting the strength of their
hostility to the English, the chief instigators of the
proposed insurrection, as we have seen, deemed it
necessary to appeal to this appetite, along with a
native superstition. Their battle-god called for a
victim, and the prophet promulgated the decree. A
chosen band of warriors were despatched to secure a
white man; and in subjecting him to the fire-torture,
the Yemassees were to feel the provocation of that
thirsting impulse which craves a continual renewal of
its stimulating indulgence. Perhaps one of the most
natural and necessary agents of man, in his progress
through life, is the desire to destroy. It is this which
subjects the enemyit is this that prompts him to
adventure
which
enables him to contend with danger,
and to flout at deathwhich carries him into the
interminable
forests, and impels the ingenuity into
exercise
,
which furnishes him with a weapon to contend
with its savage possessors. It is not surprising, if,
prompted by dangerous influences, in our ignorance,
we pamper this natural agent into a disease, which
preys at length upon ourselves.
The party despatched for this victim had been
successful
.
The peculiar cry was heard indicating their
success; and as it rung through the wide area, the
crowd gave way and parted for the new comers, who
were hailed with a degree of satisfaction, extravagant
enough, unless we consider the importance generally
attached to their enterprise. On their procuring this
victim alive, depended their hope of victory in the
approaching conflict. Such was the prediction of the
prophetsuch the decree of their god of warand
for the due celebration of this terrible sacrifice, the
preparatory ceremonies had been delayed.
They were delayed no longer. With shrill cries
and the most savage contortions, not to say convulsions
of body, the assembled multitude hailed the
entre
of
the detachment sent forth upon this expedition. They
had been eminently successful; having taken their
captive, without themselves losing a drop of blood.
Upon this, the prediction had founded their success.
Not so the prisoner. Though unarmed he had fought
desperately, and his enemies were compelled to wound
in order to secure him. He was only overcome by
numbers, and the sheer physical weight of their
crowding bodies.
They dragged him into the ring, the war-dance all
the time going on around him. From the copse, close
at hand, in which he lay concealed, Harrison could
distinguish, at intervals, the features of the captive.
He knew him at a glance, as a poor labourer, named
Macnamara, an Irishman, who had gone jobbing
about, in various ways, throughout the settlement. He
was a fine-looking, fresh, muscular mannot more
than thirtyand sustaining well, amid that fierce
assemblage, surrounded with foes, and threatened with
a torture to which European ingenuity could not often
attain, unless in the Inquisitoral dungeons, the fearless
character which is a distinguishing feature with his
countrymen. His long, black hair, deeply saturated
and matted with his blood, which oozed out from
sundry bludgeon-wounds upon the head, was wildly
distributed in masses over his face and forehead. His
full, round cheeks, were marked by knife-wounds,
also the result of his fierce defence against his captors.
His hands were bound, but his tongue was unfettered;
and as they danced and howled about him, his eye
gleamed forth in fury and derision, while his words
were those of defiance and contempt.
Ayscreech and scream, ye red divilsye'd be
after seeing how a gintleman would burn in the fire,
would ye, for your idification and delight. But its not
Tedd Macnamara, that your fires and your arrows will
scare, ye divils; so begin, boys, as soon as ye've a
mind to, and don't be too dilicate in your doings.
He spoke a language, so far as they understood it,
perfectly congenial with their notion of what should
become
a warrior. His fearless contempt of death, his
haughty defiance of their skill in the arts of torture
his insolent abusewere all so much in his favour.
They were proofs of the true brave, and they found,
under the bias of their habits and education, an added
pleasure in the belief, that he would stand well the
torture
,
and afford them a protracted enjoyment of it.
His execrations, poured forth freely as they forced him
into the area, were equivalent to one of their own
death-songs, and they regarded it as his.
He was not so easily compelled in the required
direction
.
Unable in any other way to oppose them, he
gave them as much trouble as he could, and in no way
sought to promote his locomotion. This was good
policy, perhaps, for this passive resistancethe most
annoying of all its forms,was not unlikely to bring
about an impatient blow, which might save him from
the torture. In another case, such might have been
the result of the course taken by Macnamara; but
now, the prophecy was the object, and though roughly
handled enough, his captors yet forbore any excessive
violence. Under a shower of kicks, cuffs, and blows
from every quarter, the poor fellow, still cursing them
to the last, hissing at and spitting upon them, was
forced to a tree; and in a few moments tightly lashed
back against it. A thick cord secured him around the
body to its overgrown trunk, while his hands, forced
up in a direct line above his head, were fastened to
the tree with withesthe two palms turned outwards,
nearly meeting, and so well corded as to be perfectly
immovable.
A cold chill ran through all the veins of Harrison,
and he grasped his knife with a clutch as tenacious as
that of his fast-clinched teeth, while he looked, from his
place of concealment, upon these dreadful preparations
for the Indian torture. The captive was seemingly less
sensible of its terrors. All the while, with a tongue
that seemed determined to supply, so far as it might,
the forced inactivity of all other members, he shouted
forth his scorn and execrations.
The pale-face will sing his death-song,in his
own language cried a young warrior.
Ay, ye miserable red nagers,ye don't frighten
Tedd Macnamara now so aisily, he replied, though
without comprehending what they said, yet complying
as it were with their demand; for his shout was now
a scream, and his words were those of exulting
superiority
.
It aint your bows and your arrows, ye nagers,
nor your knives, nor your hatchets, that's going to
make Teddy beg your pardon, and ax for your marcies.
I don't care for your knives, and your hatchets, at all
at all, ye red divils. Not Iby my faith, and my own
ould father, that was Teddy before me.
They took him at his word, and their preparations
were soon made for the torture. A hundred torches
of the gummy pine were placed to kindle in a
neighbouring
firea hundred old women stood ready to
employ them. These were to be applied as a sort of
cautery, to the arrow and knife-wounds which the
more youthful savages were expected, in their sports,
to inflict. It was upon their captives in this manner,
that the youth of the nation was practised. It was in
this school that the boys were prepared to become
mento inflict pain as well as to submit to it. To
these two classes,for this was one of the peculiar
features of the Indian torture,the fire-sacrifice, in its
initial penalties, was commonly assigned; and both of
them were ready at hand to commence it. How beat
the heart of Harrison with conflicting emotions, in the
shelter of the adjacent bush, as he surveyed each step
in the prosecution of these horrors.
They began. A dozen youth, none over sixteen,
came forward and ranged themselves in front of the
prisoner.
And what for do ye face me down after that sort,
ye little red negers? cried the sanguine prisoner.
They answered him with a whoopa single shriek
and the face paled then, with that mimicry of war, of
the man, who had been fearless throughout the real strife,
and amid the many terrors which preceded it. The
whoop was followed by a simultaneous discharge of all
their arrows, aimed, as would appear from the result,
only at those portions of his person which were not vital.
This was the common exercise, and their adroitness
was wonderful. They placed the shaft where they
pleased. Thus, the arrow of one penetrated one
palm, while that of another, almost at the same instant,
was driven deep into the other. One cheek was
grazed by a third, while a fourth scarified the opposite.
A blunted shaft struck him full in the mouth, and
arrested, in the middle his usual execrationYou
bloody red nagers, and there never were fingers of a
hand so evenly separated one from the other, as those
of Macnamara, by the admirably-aimed arrows of
those embryo warriors. But the endurance of the
captive was proof against all their torture; and while
every member of his person attested the felicity of
their aim, he still continued to shout his abuse, not
only to his immediate assailants, but to the old
warriors
,
and the assembled multitude, gathering around,
and looking composedly onnow approving this or
that peculiar hit, and encouraging the young beginner
with a cheer. He stood all, with the most unflinching
fortitude, and a courage that, extorting their freest
admiration
,
was quite as much the subject of cheer with
the warriors as were the arrow-shots which sometimes
provoked its exhibition.
At length, throwing aside the one instrument, they
came forward with the tomahawk. They were far
more cautious with this fatal weapon, for, as their
present object was not less the prolonging of their
own exercises than of the prisoner's tortures, it was
their wish to avoid wounding fatally or even severely.
Their chief delight was in stinging the captive into
an exhibition of imbecile and fruitless anger, or
terrifying
him into ludicrous apprehensions. They had no
hope of the latter source of amusement from the
firmness
of the victim before them; and to rouse his
impotent
rage, was the study in their thought.
With words of mutual encouragement, and boasting,
garrulously enough, each of his superior skill, they
strove to rival one another in the nicety of their aim
and execution. The chief object was barely to miss
the part at which they aimed. One planted the
tomahawk
in the tree so directly over the head of his captive,
as to divide the huge tuft of hair which grew massively
in that quarter; and great was their exultation and
loud their laughter, when the head thus jeoparded, very
naturally, under the momentary impulse, was writhed
about from the stroke, just at the moment when another,
aimed to lie on one side of his cheek, clove the ear
which it would have barely escaped had the captive
continued immoveable. Bleeding and suffering as he
must have been with such infliction, not a solitary groan
however escaped him. The stout-hearted Irishman
continued to defy and to denounce his tormentors in
language which, if only partially comprehended by his
enemies, was yet illustrated with sufficient animation
by the fierce light gleaming from his eye with a blaze
like that of madness, and in the unblenching firmness
of his cheek.
And what for do ye howl, ye red-skinned divils, as
if ye never seed a jontleman in your born days before?
Be aisy, now, and shoot away with your piinted sticks,
ye nagers,shoot away and be cursed to ye; sure it
isn't Tedd Macnamara that's afeard of what ye can do,
ye divils. If it's the fun ye're after now, honeys,the
sport that's something likewhy, put your knife over
this thong, and help this dilicate little fist to one of the
bit shilalahs yonder. Do now, pretty crathers, do
and see what fun will come out of it. Ye'll not be
after loving it at all at all, I'm a thinking, ye monkeys,
and ye alligators, and ye red nagers, and them's the
best names for ye, ye ragamuffin divils that ye are.
There was little intermission in his abuse. It kept
due pace with their tortures, which, all this time,
continued
.
The tomahawks gathered around him on every
side; and each close approximation of the instrument
only called from him a newer sort of curse. Harrison
admired, with a sympathy in favour of such indomitable
nerve, which more than once prompted him to rush forth
desperately in his behalf. But the madness of such a
movement was too obvious, and the game proceeded
without interruption.
It happened, however, as it would seem in
compliance
with a part of one of his demands, that one of the
tomahawks, thrown so as to rest betwixt the two
uplifted
palms of the captive, fell short, and striking the
hide, a few inches below, which fastened his wrists to
the tree, entirely separated it, and gave freedom to his
arms. Though still incapable of any effort for his
release, as the thongs tightly girdled his body, and
were connected on the other side of the tree, the
fearless
sufferer, with his emancipated fingers, proceeded
to pluck from his hands, amid a shower of darts, the
arrows which had penetrated them deeply. These,
with a shout of defiance, he hurled back towards his
assailants, they answering in similar style with another
shout and a new discharge of arrows, which penetrated
his person in every direction, inflicting the greatest
pain, though carefully avoiding any vital region. And
now, as if impatient of their forbearance, the boys were
made to give way, and each armed with her hissing
and resinous torch, the old women approached, howling
and dancing, with shrill voices and an action of body
frightfully demoniac. One after another they rushed
up to the prisoner, and with fiendish fervour, thrust the
blazing torches to his shrinking body, wherever a knife,
an arrow, or a tomahawk had left a wound. The
torture
of this infliction greatly exceeded all to which he
had been previously subjected; and with a howl, the
unavoidable acknowledgment forced from nature by the
extremity of pain, scarcely less horrible than that which
they unitedly sent up around him, the captive dashed
out his hands, and grasping one of the most forward
among his unsexed tormentors, he firmly held her with
one hand, while with the other he possessed himself
of the blazing torch she bore. Hurling her backward,
in the next moment, among the crowd of his enemies,
with a resolution from despair, he applied the torch to
the thongs which bound him to the tree, and while his
garments shrivelled and flamed, and while the flesh
blistered and burned with the terrible application,
resolute
as desperate, he maintained it on the spot, until the
withes crackled, blazed, and separated.
Vol. II.D 7
His limbs were freea convulsion of joy actually
rushed through his heart, and he shouted with a new
tone, the result of a new and unimagined sensation.
He leaped forward, and though the flames grasped and
gathered in a thick volume, rushing from his waist to
his extremities, completely enveloping him in their
embrace, they offered no obstacle to the fresh impulse
which possessed him. He bounded onward, with that
over-head-and-heel evolution which is called the
somerset
,
and which carried him, a broad column of
fire, into the very thickest of the crowd. They gave
way to him on every sidethey shrunk from that living
flame, which mingled the power of the imperial
element
with the will of its superior, man. Panic-stricken
for a few moments at the novel spectacle, they shrunk
away on either hand before the blazing body, and offered
no obstacle to his flight.
But the old warriors now took up the matter. They
had suffered the game to go on as was their usage, for
the tutoring of the youthful savage in those arts which
are to be the employment of his life. But their own
appetite now gave them speed, and they soon gathered
upon the heels of the fugitive. Fortunately, he was
still vigorous, and his hurts were those only of the
flesh. His tortures only stimulated him into a daring
disregard of any fate which might follow, and, looking
once over his shoulder, and with a halloo not unlike
their own whoop, Macnamara bounded forward directly
upon the coppice which concealed Harrison. The
latter saw his danger from this approach, but it was
too late to retreat. He drew his knife and kept close
to the cover of the fallen tree alongside of which he
had laid himself down. Had the flying Macnamara
seen this tree so as to have avoided it, Harrison might
still have maintained his concealment. But the
fugitive
,
unhappily, looked out for no such obstruction. He
thought only of flight, and his legs were exercised at
the expense of his eyes. A long-extended branch,
shooting from the tree, interposed, and he saw it not.
His feet were suddenly entangled, and he fell between
the arm and the trunk of the tree. Before he could
rise or recover, his pursuers were upon him. He had
half gained his feet, and one of his hands, in promoting
this object, rested upon the tree itself, on the opposite
side of which Harrison lay quiet, while the head of
Macnamara was just rising above it. At that moment
a tall chief of the Seratees, with a huge club, dashed
the now visible scull down upon the trunk. The blow
was fatalthe victim uttered not even a groan, and
the spattering brains were driven wide, and into the
upturned face of Harrison.
There was no more concealment for him after that,
and starting to his feet, in another moment his knife
was thrust deep into the bosom of the astonished
Seratee
before he had resumed the swing of his
ponderous
weapon. The Indian sunk back, with a single
cry, upon those who followed himhalf paralyzed,
with himself, at the new enemy whom they had
conjured
up. But their panic was momentary, and the
next instant saw fifty of them crowding upon the
Englishman
.
He placed himself against a tree, hopeless,
but determined to struggle to the last. But he was
surrounded in a momenthis arms pinioned from
behind
,
and knives from all quarters glittering around
him, and aiming at his breast. What might have been
his fate under the excitement of the scene and
circumstances
could well be said; for, already, the brother
chief of the Seratee had rushed forward with his
uplifted
mace, and as he had the distinct claim to
revenge
,
there was no interference. Fortunately,
however
,
for the captive, the blow was stricken aside and
intercepted by the huge staff of no less a person than
the prophet.
He is minethe ghost of Chaharattee, my brother,
is waiting for that of his murderer. I must hang
his teeth on my neck, was the fierce cry, in his own
language, of the surviving Seratee, when his blow was
thus arrested. But the prophet had his answer in a
sense not to be withstood by the superstitious savage.
Does the prophet speak for himself or for
Manneyto
?
D 2
Is Manneyto a woman that we may say,
Wherefore thy word to the prophet? Has not
Manneyto
spoken, and will not the chief obey? Lo! this
is our victim, and the words of Manneyto are truth.
He hath said one victimone English for the
sacrifice
,and
but one before we sing the battle-song
before we go on the war-path of our enemies. Is not
his word truth? This blood says it is truth. We
may not slay another, but on the red trail of the
English
.
The knife must be drawn and the tomahawk
lifted on the ground of the enemy, but the land of
Manneyto is holy, save for his sacrifice. Thou must
not strike the captive. He is captive to the
Yemassee
.
He is the captive to the brown lynx of Seratee
is he not under his club? was the fierce reply.
Will the Seratee stand up against Manneyto?
Hear! That is his voice of thunder, and see, the eye
which he sends forth in the lightning!
Thus confirmed in his words by the solemn
auguries
to which he referred, and which, just at that
moment
came, as if in fulfilment and support of his
decision
,
the Seratee obeyed, while all around grew silent
and serious. But he insisted that, though compelled
to forbear his blood, he was at least his captive. This,
too, the prophet denied. The prisoner was made such
upon the sacred ground of the Yemassees, and was,
therefore, doubly their captive. He was reserved for
sacrifice to the Manneyto at the conclusion of their
present enterprise, when his doom would add to the
solemnity of their thanksgiving for the anticipated
victory.
CHAPTER X.
Cords for the warriorhe shall see the fray
His arm shall share nota worse doom than death,
For him whose heart, at every stroke, must bleed
Whose fortune is the stake, and yet denied
All throw to win it.
The
war-dance was begun in the presence of the
prisoner. He looked down upon the preparations for
a conflict, no longer doubtful, between the savages
and his people. He watched their movements, heard
their arrangements, saw their direction, knew their
design
,
yet had no power to strike in for the succour or
the safety of those in whom only he lived. What
were his emotions in that survey? Who shall describe
them?
They began the war-dance, the young warriors, the
boys, and womenthat terrible but fantastic whirl
regulated by occasional strokes upon the uncouth
drum and an attenuated blast from the more flexible
native bugle. That dance of deatha dance, which,
perfectly military in its character, calling for every
possible position or movement common to Indian
strategy, moves them all with an extravagant sort of
grace; and if contemplated without reference to the
savage purposes which it precedes, is singularly
pompous
and imposing; wild, it is true, but yet exceedingly
unaffected and easy, as it is one of the most familiar
practices of Indian education. In this way, by
extreme
physical exercise, they provoke a required
degree
of mental enthusiasm. With this object the
aborigines
have many kinds of dances, and others of
even more interesting character. Among many of
the tribes these exhibitions are literally so many
chronicles. They are the only records, left by
tradition
,
of leading events in their history which they
were instituted to commemorate. An epoch in the
national progressa new discoverya new
achievement
was frequently distinguished by the invention of a
dance or game, to which a name was given significant
of the circumstance. Thus, any successful hunt, out
of their usual routine, was imbodied in a series of
evolutions or the gathering for a feast, exhibiting
frequently
in sport, what had really taken place. In
this way, handed from tribe to tribe, and from
generation
to generation, it constituted a portion, not merely
of the history of the past, but of the education of the
future. This education fitted them alike for the two
great exercises of most barbarians,the battle and the
chase. The weapons of the former were also those
of the latter pursuit, and the joy of success in either
object was expressed in the same manner. The dance
and song formed the beginning, as they certainly made
the conclusion of all their adventures; and whether in
defeat or victory, there was no omission of the
practice
.
Thus we have the song of warof scalp-taking
of victoryof death, not to speak of the thousand
various forms by which their feelings were expressed
in the natural progress of the seasons. These songs,
in most cases, called for corresponding dances, and the
Indian warrior, otherwise seeming rather a machine
than a mortal, adjusted, on an inspiring occasion, the
strain of the prophet and the poet, to the wild and
various
action of the Pythia. The elements of all
uncultivated
people are the same. The early Greeks, in
their stern endurance of torment, in their sports and
exercises, were exceedingly like the North American
savages. The Lacedmonians went to battle with
songs and dances; a similar practice obtained among
the Jews; and one peculiarity, alike, of the Danes and
Saxons, was to usher in the combat with wild and
discordant
anthems.
The survey was curious to Harrison, but it was also
terrible. Conscious as he was, not merely of his own,
but of the danger of the colony, he could not help
feeling
the strange and striking romance of his situation.
Bound to a treehelpless, hopelessa stranger, a
prisoner, and destined to the sacrifice. The thick
night around hima thousand enemies, dark, dusky,
fierce savages, half intoxicated with that wild physical
action which has its drunkenness, not less than wine.
Their wild distortionstheir hell-enkindled eyes, their
barbarous sports and weaponsthe sudden and
demoniac
shrieks from the womenthe occasional burst
of song, pledging the singer to the most diabolical
achievements, mingled up strangely in a discord which
had its propriety, with the clatter of the drum, and the
long melancholy note of the bugle. And then, that
high tumulus, that place of scullsthe bleached bones
of centuries past peering through its sides, and
speaking
for the abundant fulness of the capacious
mansion-house
of death within. The awful scene of torture,
and the subsequent unscrupulous murder of the heroic
Irishmanthe presence of the gloomy prophet in
attendance
upon the sacred fire, which he nursed
carefully
upon the moundthe little knot of chiefs,
consisting
of Sanutee, Ishiagaska, and others, not to
speak of the Spanish agent, Chorleyin close council
in his sight, but removed from hearingthese, and the
consciousness of his own situation, while they brought
to his heart an added feeling of hopelessness, could
not fail to awaken in his mind a sentiment of wonder
and admiration, the immediate result of his excited
thoughts and fancy.
But the dance was over at a signal from the prophet.
He saw that the proper feeling of excitation had been
attained. The demon was aroused, and, once aroused,
was sleepless. The old women waved their torches
and rushed headlong through the woodsshouting
and shriekingwhile the warriors, they struck their
knives and hatchets into the neighbouring trees, giving
each the name of an Englishman, and howling out the
sanguinary promise of the scalp-song, at every stroke
inflicted upon the unconscious trunk.
Sangarrah-me,Sangarrah-me, Yemassee
, was the
cry of each chief to his particular division; and as they
arranged themselves under their several commands,
Harrison was enabled to form some idea of the
proposed
destination of each party. To Ishiagaska and
Chorley, he saw assigned a direction which he readily
conjectured would lead them to the Block House, and
the settlement in the immediate neighbourhood. This
was also to be inferred from the connexion of Chorley
with the command of Ishiagaska, as it was not
reasonable
to suppose that the former would desire any duty
carrying him far from his vessel. To another force
the word Coosaw sufficiently indicated Beaufort as the
point destined for its assault; and thus party after
party was despatched in one direction or another, until
but a single spot of the whole colony remained
unprovided
with an assailant,and that was Charlestown.
The reservation was sufficiently accounted for, as
Sanutee, and the largest division of the Yemassees,
remained
unappropriated. The old chief had reserved
this, the most dangerous and important part of the
adventure
,
to himself. A shrill cryan unusual sound
broke upon the silence, and the crowd was gone in
that instant;all the warriors, with Sanutee at their
head. The copse concealed them from the sight of
Harrison, who, in another moment, found himself
more closely grappled than before. A couple of
tomahawks
waved before his eyes in the glare of the
torches borne in the hands of the warriors who secured
him. No resistance could have availed him, and
cursing his ill fortune, and suffering the most
excruciating
of mental griefs as he thought of the progress
of the fate which threatened his people, he made a
merit of necessity, and offering no obstacle to their
will, he was carried to Pocota-ligobound with thongs
and destined for the sacrifice which was to follow
hard upon their triumph. Such was the will of the
prophet of Manneyto, and ignorance does not often
question the decrees of superstition.
Borne back with the crowd, Harrison entered
Pocota-ligo
under a motley guard and guidance. He had
been intrusted to the care of a few superannuated old
warriors, who were deemed sufficient for the service
of keeping him a prisoner; but they were numerously
attended. The mob of the Yemasseesfor they had
their mobs as well as the more civilizedconsisted
of both sexes; and when we reflect upon the usual
estimation placed upon women by all barbarous
people
,
we shall not be surprised to know that, on the
present occasion, the sex were by far the most noisy
if not the most numerous. Their criessavage and
sometimes indecent gesturestheir occasional
brutality
,
and the freedom and frequency with which they
inflicted
blows upon the captive as he approached them
on his way to prison, might find, with no little
appropriateness
,
a choice similitude in the blackguardism
of the Eleusinian mysteriesthe occasional exercises
of a far more pretending people than that under our
eye. They ran, many of them, with torches waving
wildly above their heads, on each side of the prisoner,
some urging him with blows and stripes, less
dangerous
,
it is true, than annoying. Many of them, in their
own language, poured forth all manner of strains
chiefly of taunt and battle, but frequently of
downright
indecency. And here we may remark, that it is
rather too much the habit to speak of the Indians, at
home and in their native character, as sternly and
indifferently
coldpeople after the fashion of the elder
Cato, who used to say that he never suffered his wife
to embrace him, except when it thunderedadding, by
way of jest, that he was therefore never happy except
when Jupiter was pleased to thunder. We should be
careful not to speak of them as we casually see
them,when, conscious of our superiority, and
unfamiliar
with our language, they are necessarily taciturn,
as it is the pride of an Indian to hide his
deficiencies
.
With a proper policy, which might greatly
benefit
upon circulation, he conceals his ignorance in
silence
.
In his own habitation, uninfluenced by drink or
any form of degradation, and unrestrained by the
presence
of superiors, he is sometimes even a jester
D 3
delights in a joke, practical or otherwise, and is not
scrupulous about its niceness or propriety. In his
council he is fond of speakingglories in long talks,
and, as he grows old, if you incline a willing ear, even
becomes garrulous. Of course, all these habits are
restrained by circumstance. He does not chatter
when he fights or hunts, and when he goes to make a
treaty, never presumes to say more than he has been
taught by his people.
The customary habit of the Yemassees was not
departed from on the present occasion. The mob
had nothing of forbearance towards the prisoner, and
they showed but little taciturnity. Hootings and
howlings
shriekings
and shoutingsconfused cries
yells of laughterhisses of scornhere and there a
fragment of song, either of battle or ridicule,
gathering
,
as it were, by a common instinct, into a chorus of
fifty voicesmost effectually banished silence from
her usual night dominion in the sacred town of
Pocota-ligo
.
In every dwellingfor the hour was not yet
latethe torch blazed brightlythe entrances were
thronged with their inmates, and not a tree but gave
shelter to its own peculiar assemblage. Curiosity to
behold a prisoner, destined by the unquestionable will
of the prophet to the great sacrifice which gave
gratitude
to the Manneyto for the victory which such a
pledge was most confidently anticipated to secure,
led them forward in droves; so that, when Harrison
arrived in the centre of the town, the path became
almost entirely obstructed by the dense and still
gathering
masses pressing upon them. The way, indeed,
would have been completely impassable but for the
hurrying torches carried forward by the attending
women; who, waving them about recklessly over the
heads of the crowd, distributed the melted gum in
every direction, and effectually compelled the more
obtrusive to recede into less dangerous places.
Thus marshalled, his guards bore the captive
onward
to the safe-keeping of a sort of block house
a thing of logs, rather more compactly built than was
the wont of Indian dwellings usually, and without any
aperture save the single one at which he was forced
to enter. Not over secure, however, as a prison, it
was yet made to answer the purpose, and what it
lacked in strength and security was, perhaps, more
than supplied in the presence of the guard put upon it.
Thrusting their prisoner, through the narrow entrance,
into a damp apartment, the earthen floor of which was
strewn with pine trash, they secured the door with
thongs on the outside, and with the patience of the
warrior, they threw themselves directly before it.
Seldom making captives unless as slaves, and the
punishments of their own people being usually of a
summary character, will account for the want of skill
among the Yemassees in the construction of their
dungeon
.
The present answered all their purposes,
simply
,
perhaps, because it had answered the purposes of
their fathers. This is reason enough, in a thousand
respects, with the more civilized. The prison-house
to which Harrison was borne, had been in existence
a century.
CHAPTER XI.
Why, this is magic, and it breaks his bonds,
It gives him freedom.
Harrison
was one of those true philosophers who
know always how to keep themselves for better times.
As he knew that resistance, at that moment, must
certainly
be without any good result, he quietly enough
suffered himself to be borne to prison. He neither
halted nor hesitated, but went forward, offering no
obstacle, with as much wholesome good-will and
compliance
as if the proceeding was perfectly agreeable
to him. He endured, with no little show of patience,
all the blows and buffetings so freely bestowed upon
him by his feminine enemies; and if he did not
altogether
smile under the infliction, he at least took good
care to avoid any ebullition of anger, which, as it was
there impotent, must necessarily have been a
weakness
,
and would most certainly have been entirely
thrown away. Among the Indians, this was by far the
better policy. They can admire the courage, though
they hate the possessor. Looking round amid the
crowd, Harrison thought he could perceive many
evidences
of this sentiment. Sympathy and pity he also
made out, in the looks of a few. One thing he did
certainly observea generous degree of forbearance,
as well of taunt as of buffet, on the part of all the better
looking among the spectators. Nor did he deceive
himself. The insolent portion of the rabble formed a
class especially for such purposes as the present; and
to them, its duties were left exclusively. The
forbearance
of the residue looked to him like kindness,
and with the elasticity of his nature, hope came with
the idea.
Nor was he mistaken. Many eyes in that
assembly
looked upon him with regard and commiseration.
The firm but light tread of his stepthe upraised,
unabashed, the almost laughing eyethe free play into
liveliness of the muscles of his mouthsometimes
curled into contempt, and again closely compressed, as
in defiancetogether with his fine, manly form and
even carriagewere all calculated to call for the
respect
,
if for no warmer feeling, of the spectators.
They all knew the bravery of the
Coosah-moray-te
, or
the Goosaw-killermany of them had felt his
kindness
and liberality, and but for the passionate
nationality
of the Indian character, the sympathy of a few
might, at that moment, have worked actively in his
favour, and with the view to his release.
There was one in particular, among the crowd,
who regarded him with a melancholy satisfaction. It
was Matiwan. As the whole nation had gathered to
the sacred town, in which, during the absence of the
warriors, they found shelter, she was now a resident
of Pocota-ligo. One among, but not of the rabble, she
surveyed the prisoner with an emotion which only
the heart of the bereaved mother may define. How
like, she muttered to herself in her own language
how like to the boy Occonestoga. And as she
thought thus, she wondered if Harrison had a mother
over the great waters. Sympathy has wings as well
as tears, and her eyes took a long journey in
imagination
to that foreign land. She saw the mother of the
captive with a grief at heart like her own; and her
own sorrows grew deeper at the survey. Then came
a strange wish to serve that pale motherto save her
from an anguish such as hers: then she looked upon the
captive, and her memory grew active; she knew him
she had seen him before in the great town of the
pale-faceshe appeared a chief among them, and so
had been called by her father, the old warrior Etiwee,
who, always an excellent friend to the English, had
taken her, with the boy Occonestogathen a mere
boyon a visit to Charlestown. She had there seen
Harrison, but under another name. He had been kind
to her fatherhad made him many presents, and the
beautiful little cross of red coral, which, without
knowing
any thing of its symbolical associations, she had
continued to wear in her bosom, had been the gift of
him who was now the prisoner to her people. She
knew him through his disguiseher father would have
knownwould have saved himhad he been living.
She had heard his doom denounced to take place on
the return of the war-party:she gazed upon the
manly form, the noble features, the free, fearless
carriageshe thought of Occonestogaof the pale
mother of the Englishmanof her own bereavement
and of a thousand other things belonging naturally to
the same topics. The more she thought, the more her
heart grew softened within herthe more aroused her
brainthe more restless and unrestrainable her spirit.
She turned away from the crowd as the prisoner
was hurried into the dungeon. She turned away in
anguish
of heart, and a strange commotion of thought.
8
She sought the shelter of the neighbouring wood,
and rambled unconsciously, as it were, among the old
forests. But she had no peaceshe was pursued by
the thought which assailed her from the first. The
image of Occonestoga haunted her footsteps, and she
turned only to see his bloody form and gashed head for
ever at her elbow. He looked appealingly to her, and
she then thought of the English mother over the waters.
He pointed in the direction of Pocota-ligo, and she
then saw the prisoner, Harrison. She saw him in the
dungeon, she saw him on the tumulusthe flames
were gathering around hima hundred arrows stuck
in his person, and she beheld the descending hatchet,
bringing him the
coup de grace
. These images were
full of terror, and their contemplation still more
phrensied
her intellect. She grew strong and fearless with
the desperation which they brought, and rushing through
the forest, she once more made her way into the
heart of Pocota-ligo.
The scene was changed. The torches were either
burnt out or decaying, and scattered over the ground.
The noise was overthe crowd dispersed and gone.
Silence and sleep had resumed their ancient empire.
She trod, alone, along the great thoroughfare of the
town. A single dog ran at her heels, baying at
intervals
;
but him she hushed with a word of unconscious
soothingignorant when she uttered it. There were
burning feelings in her bosom, at variance with reason
at variance with the limited duty which she owed
to societyat variance with her own safety. But
what of these? There is a holy instinct that helps
us, sometimes, in the face of our common standards.
Humanity is earlier in its origin, and holier in its claims
than society. She felt the one, and forgot to obey the
other.
She went forward, and the prison-house of the
Englishman
,
under the shelter of a father-oakthe growth
of a silent centuryrose dimly before her. Securely
fastened with stout thongs on the outside, the door was
still farther guarded by a couple of warriors lying upon
the grass before it. One of them seemed to sleep
soundly, but the other was wakeful. He lay at length,
however, his head upraised, and resting upon one of
his palmshis elbow lifting it from the ground. The
other hand grasped the hatchet, which he employed
occasionally in chopping the earth just before him.
He was musing rather than meditative, and the action
of his hand and hatchet, capricious and fitful, indicated
a want of concentration in his thought. This was in
her favour. Still there was no possibility of present
approach unperceived; and to succeed in a
determination
only half-formed in her bosom, and in fact,
undesigned
in her head, the gentle but fearless woman
had resource to some of those highly ingenious arts,
so well known to the savage, and which he borrows in
most part from the nature around him. Receding,
therefore, to a little distance, she carefully sheltered
herself in a small clustering clump of bush and brush,
at a convenient distance for her purpose, and proceeded
more definitely to the adjustment of her design.
Meanwhile, the yet wakeful warrior looked round
upon his comrade, who lay in a deep slumber between
himself and the dungeon entrance. Fatigue and
previous
watchfulness had done their work with the veteran.
The watcher himself began to feel these influences
stealing upon him, though not in the same degree,
perhaps, and with less rapidity. But, as he looked
around, and witnessed the general silence, his ear
detecting with difficulty the drowsy motion of the
zephyr among the thick branches over head, as if that
slept alsohis own drowsiness crept more and more
upon his senses. Nature is thronged with sympathies,
and the undiseased sense finds its kindred at all hours
and in every situation.
Suddenly, as he mused, a faint chirp, that of a single
cricket, swelled upon his ear from the neighbouring
grove. He answered it, for great were his imitative
faculties. He answered it, and from an occasional
note, it broke out into a regular succession of
chirpings
,
sweetly timed, and breaking the general silence
of the night with an effect utterly indescribable,
except
to watchers blessed with a quick imagination.
To these, still musing and won by the interruption, he
sent back a similar response; and his attention was
suspended, as if for some return. But the chirping died
away in a click scarcely perceptible. It was succeeded,
after a brief interval, by the faint note of a mock-bird
a sudden note, as if the minstrel, starting from sleep,
had sent it forth unconsciously, or, in a dream, had
thus given utterance to some sleepless emotion. It
was soft and gentle as the breathings of a flower.
Again came the chirping of the cricketa broken
straincapricious in time, and now seeming near at
hand, now remote and flying. Then rose the
whizzing
hum, as of a tribe of bees suddenly issuing from
the hollow of some neighbouring tree; and then, the
clear, distinct tap of the woodpeckeronce, twice,
and thrice. Silence, then,and the burden of the
cricket was resumed, at the moment when a lazy stir
of the breeze in the branches above him seemed to
solicit the torpor from which it occasionally started.
Gradually, the successive sounds, so natural to the
situation, and so grateful and congenial to the ear of
the hunter, hummed his senses into slumber. For a
moment, his eyes were half re-opened, and he looked
round vacantly upon the woods, and upon the dying
flame of the scattered torchesand then upon his fast
sleeping comrade. The prospect gave additional
stimulant
to the dreamy nature of the influences growing
about and gathering upon him. Finally, the trees danced
away from before his visionthe clouds came down
close to his face; and, gently accommodating his arm
to the support of his dizzy and sinking head, he
gradually
and unconsciously sunk beside his companion,
and, in a few moments, enjoyed a slumber as oblivious.
CHAPTER XII.
'Tis freedom that she brings him, but the pass
Is leaguered he must 'scape through. Foemen watch,
Ready to strike the hopeless fugitive.
With
the repose to slumber of the warriorthe
cricket and the bee, the mock-bird and the woodpecker,
at once, grew silent. A few moments only had elapsed,
when, cautious in approach, they made their
simultaneous
appearance from the bush in the person of
Matiwan
.
It was her skill that had charmed the spirit of
the watcher into sleep, by the employment of
associations
so admirably adapted to the spirit of the scene.
With that ingenuity which is an instinct with the
Indians, she had imitated, one after another, the various
agents, whose notes, duly timed, had first won, then
soothed, and then relaxed and quieted the senses of
the prison-keeper. She had rightly judged in the
employment
of her several arts. The gradual beatitude
of mind and lassitude of body, brought about with
inevitable certainty, when once we have lulled the
guardian watchers of the animal, must always precede
their complete unconsciousness; and the art of the
Indian, in this way, is often employed, in cases of
mental excitation and disease, with a like object. The
knowledge of the power of soothing, sweet sounds over
the wandering mind, possessed, as the Hebrew strongly
phrased it, of devils, was not confined to that people,
nor to the melodious ministerings of their David.
The Indian claims for it a still greater influence, when,
with a single note, he bids the serpent uncoil from his
purpose, and wind unharmingly away from the bosom
of his victim.
She emerged from her place of concealment with a
caution which marked something more of settled
purpose
than she had yet exhibited. She approached in
the dim, flickering light, cast from the decaying torches
which lay scattered without order along the ground. A
few paces only divided her from the watchers, and she
continued to approach, when one of them turned with
a degree of restlessness, which led her to apprehend
that he had awakened. She sunk back like a shadow,
as fleet and silently, once more into the cover of the
brush. But he still slept. She again approachedand
the last flare of the torch burning most brightly before,
quivered, sent up a little gust of flame, and then went
out, leaving her only the star-light for her farther
guidance. This light was imperfect, as the place of
imprisonment lay under a thickly branching tree, and
her progress was therefore more difficult. But, with
added difficulty, to the strong mood, comes added
determination. To this determination the mind of
Matiwan brought increased caution; and treading with
the lightness of some melancholy ghost, groping at
midnight among old and deserted chambers of the
heart, the Indian woman stepped onward to her
purpose
over a spot as silent, if not so desolate. Carefully
placing her feet so as to avoid the limbs of the
sleeping
guardwho lay side by side and directly across
the door-waya design only executed with great
difficulty, she at length reached the door; and drawing
from her side a knife, she separated the thick thongs
of skin which had otherwise well secured it. In
another moment she was in the centre of the
apartment
and in the presence of the captive.
He lay at length, though not asleep, upon the damp
floor of the dungeon. Full of melancholy thought,
and almost prostrate with despair, his mind and
imagination continued to depict before his eyes the
thousand forms of horror to which savage cruelty was
probably, at that very moment, subjecting the form
most dear to his affections, and the people at large,
for whose lives he would freely have given up his own.
He saw the flames of their desolationhe heard the
cries of their despair. Their blood gushed along
before his eyes, in streams that spoke to him
appealingly
,
at least, for vengeance. How many veins, the
dearest in his worship, had been drained perchance
to give volume to their currents. The thought was
horrible, the picture too trying and too terrible for the
contemplation of a spirit, which, fearless and firm,
was yet gentle and affectionate. He covered his eyes
with his extended palms, as if to shut from his
physical
what was perceptible only to his mental vision.
A gust aroused him. The person of Matiwan was
before him, a dim outline, undistinguishable in feature
by his darkened and disordered sight. Her voice, like
a murmuring water lapsing away among the rushes,
fell soothingly upon his senses. Herself half
dreaming
for
her proceeding had been a matter rather of
impulse than premeditationthe single word, so gently
yet so clearly articulated, with which she broke in
upon the melancholy musings of the captive, and first
announced her presence, proved sufficiently the
characteristic
direction of her own maternal spirit.
Occonestoga!
Who speaks? was the reply of Harrison, starting
to his feet, and assuming an attitude of defiance and
readiness, not less than doubt; for he had now no
thought but that of fight, in connexion with the
Yemassees
.
Who speaks?
Ha! and in the exclamation, we see the restored
consciousness which taught her that not Occonestoga,
but the son of another mother, stood before her.
Ha! the Coosah-moray-te shall go, she said, in
broken English.
Whowhat is this? responded the captive, as he
felt rather than understood the kindness of the tones
that met his ear; and he now more closely approached
the speaker.
Hush,she placed her hand upon his wrist, and
looked to the door with an air of anxietythen
whisperingly
,
urged him to caution.
Big warriorstomahawksthey lie in the grass
for the English.
And who art thou,woman? Is it freedomlife?
cut the cords, quick, quicklet me feel my liberty.
And as she busied herself in cutting the sinews that
tightly secured his wrists, he scarcely forbore his show
of impatience.
I am freeI am free. I thank thee, Godgreat,
good Father, this is thy providence! I thankI praise
thee! And thouwho art thou, my preserverbut
wherefore ask? Thou art
It is Matiwan! she said humbly.
The wife of Sanuteehow shall I thankhow
reward thee, Matiwan!
Matiwan is the woman of the great chief, Sanutee
she makes free the English, that has a look and a
tongue like the boy Occonestoga.
And where is he, Matiwanwhere is the young
warrior? I came to see after him, and it is this brought
me into my present difficulty.
Take the knife, Englishtake the knife. Look!
the blood is on the hand of Matiwan. It is the blood
of the boy.
Woman, thou hast not slain himthou hast not
slain the child of thy bosom!
Matiwan saved the boy, she said proudly.
Then he lives.
In the blessed valley with the Manneyto. He will
build a great lodge for Matiwan.
Give me the knife.
He took it hurriedly from her grasp, supposing
her delirious, and failing utterly to comprehend the
seeming contradiction in her language. She handed
it to him with a shiver as she gave it up; then, telling
him to follow, and at the same time pressing her hand
upon his arm by way of caution, she led the way to
the entrance, which she had carefully closed after her
on first entering. With as much, if not more caution
than before, slowly unclosing it, she showed him, in
the dim light of the stars, the extended forms of the
two keepers. They still slept, but not soundly; and
in the momentary glance which she required the
captive to take, with all Indian deliberateness, she
seemed desirous of familiarizing his glance with the
condition of the scene, and with all those difficulties
in the aspect of surrounding objects with which he
was probably destined to contend. With the strong
excitement of renewed hope, coupled with his
consciousness
of freedom, Harrison would have leaped
forward; but she restrained him, and just at that
moment, a sudden, restless movement of one of the
sleepers warned them to be heedful. Quick as thought,
in that motion, Matiwan sunk back into the shadow
of the dungeon, closing the door with the same
impulse
.
Pausing, for a few moments, until the renewed
and deep breathings from without reassured her, she
then again led the way; but, as she half opened the
door, turning quietly, she said in a whisper to the
impatient
Harrison,
The chief of the Englishthe pale mother loves
him over the water?
She does, Matiwanshe loves him very much.
And the chiefhe keeps her here pointing to
her heart.
Alwaysdeeply. I love her too, very much.
It is good. The chief will go on the watershe
will go to the mother that loves him. She will sing
like a green bird for him, when the young corn comes
out of the ground. So Matiwan sings for Occonestoga.
Go, Englishbut look!for the arrow of Yemassee
runs along the path.
He pressed her hand warmly, but his lips refused all
other acknowledgment. A deep sigh attested her own
share of feeling in those references which she had
made to the son in connexion with the mother. Then,
once more unclosing the entrance, she stepped
fearlessly
and successfully over the two sleeping sentinels.
He followed her, but with less good fortune.
Whether
it was that he saw not distinctly in that unaccustomed
light, and brushed one of the men with his foot, or
whether
he had been restless before, and only in an imperfect
slumber just then broken, may not now be said; but at
that inauspicious moment he awakened. With
waking
comes instant consciousness to the Indian, who
differs in this particular widely from the negro. He
knew his prisoner at a glance, and grappled him, as he
lay, by the leg. Harrison, with an instinct quite as
ready, dashed his unobstructed heel into the face of the
warrior, and though released, would have followed up
his blow by a stroke from his uplifted and bared knife;
but his arm was held back by Matiwan. Her instinct
was gentler and wiser. In broken English, she bade
him fly for his life. His own sense taught him in an
instant the propriety of this course, and before the
aroused Indian could recover from the blow of his
heel, and while he strove to waken his comrade, the
Englishman bounded down, with a desperate speed,
along the great thoroughfare leading to the river.
The warriors were soon at his heels, but the generous
mood of Matiwan did not rest with what she had
already done. She threw herself in their way, and
thus gained him some little additional time. But they
soon put her aside, and their quick tread in the
pathway
taken by the fugitive warned him to the exercise
of all his efforts. At the same time he coolly
calculated
his course and its chances. As he thought thus
he clutched the knife given him by Matiwan, with an
emotion of confidence which the warrior must always
feel, having his limbs, and grasping a weapon with
which his hand has been familiar. At least, thought
he, fiercely,they must battle for the life they take.
They gain no easy prey. Thus did he console
himself
in his flight with his pursuers hard behind him.
In his confidence he gained new strength; and thus
the well-exercised mind gives strength to the body
which it informs. Harrison was swift of foot, also,
few of the whites were better practised or more
admirably
formed for the events and necessities of forest
life. But the Indian has a constant exercise which
makes him a prodigy in the use of his legs. In a
journey of day after day, he can easily outwind any
horse. Harrison knew this,but then he thought of
his knife. They gained upon him, and, as he clutched
the weapon firmly in his grasp, his teeth grew tightly
fixed, and he began to feel the rapturous delirium
which prefaces the desire for the strife. Still the
river was not far off, and though galled at the necessity
of flight, he yet felt what was due to his people, at
that very moment, most probably, under the stroke of
their savage butchery. He had no time for individual
conflict, in which nothing might be done for them.
The fresh breeze now swelled up from the river, and
re-encouraged him.
Could I gain that, he muttered to himself,
could I gain that, I were safe. Of God's surety, I may.
A look over his shoulder, and a new start. They
were behind him, but not so close as he had thought.
Coolly enough he bounded on, thinking aloud:
They cannot touch, but they may shoot. Well
if they do, they must stop, and a few seconds more
will give me a cover in the waters. Let them shoot
let them shoot. The arrow is better than the stake;
and thus muttering to himself, but in tones almost
audible
to his enemies, he kept his way with a heart
something lighter from his momentary effort at
philosophy
.
He did not perceive that his pursuers had
with them no weapon but the tomahawk, or his
consolations
might have been more satisfactory.
In another moment he was upon the banks of the
river; and there, propitiously enough, a few paces
from the shore, lay a canoe tied to a pole that stood
upright in the stream. He blessed his stars as he
beheld it, and pausing not to doubt whether a paddle
lay in its bottom or not, he plunged incontinently
forward
,
wading almost to his middle before he reached
it. He was soon snug enough in its bottom, and had
succeeded in cutting the thong with his knife when
the Indians appeared upon the bank. Dreading their
arrows, for the broad glare of the now rising moon
gave them sufficient light for their use had they been
provided with them, he stretched himself at length
along the bottom of the boat, and left it to the current,
which set strongly downward. But a sudden plunge
into the water of one and then the other of his pursuers,
left him without the hope of getting off so easily. The
danger came in a new shape, and he properly rose to
meet it. Placing himself in a position which would
enable him to turn readily upon any point which they
might assail, he prepared for the encounter. One of
the warriors was close upon himswimming lustily,
and carrying his tomahawk grasped by the handle in
his teeth. The other came at a little distance, and
promised soon to be up with him. The first pursuer
at length struck the canoe, raised himself sufficiently
on the water for that purpose, and his left hand grasped
one of the sides, while the right prepared to take the
hatchet from his jaws. But with the seizure of the
boat by his foe came the stroke of Harrison. His
knife drove half through the hand of the Indian, who
released his grasp with a howl that made his
companion
hesitate. Just at that instant a third plunge
into the water, as of some prodigious body, called for the
attention of all parties anew. The pursuers now
became
the fugitives, as their quick senses perceived a
new and dangerous enemy in the black mass surging
towards them, with a power and rapidity which taught
them the necessity of instant flight, and with no half
effort. They well knew the fierce appetite and the
tremendous jaws of the native alligator, the American
crocodile,one of the largest of which now came
looming towards them. Self-preservation was the
word. The captive was forgotten altogether in their
own danger; and swimming with all their strength, and
with all their skill, in a zigzag manner, so as to compel
their unwieldy pursuer to make frequent and sudden
turns in the chase, occasionally pausing to splash the
water with as much noise as possiblea practice
known to discourage his approach when not
over-hungry
they
contrived to baffle his pursuit, and half
exhausted, the two warriors reached and clambered up
the banks, just as their ferocious pursuer, close upon
their heels, had opened his tremendous jaws, with an
awful compass, ready to ingulf them. They were
safe, though actually pursued even upon the shore for a
brief distance by the voracious and possibly half-starved
monster. But so was he safetheir captive. Paddling
as well as he could with a broken flap-oar lying in the
bottom of the boat, he shaped his course to strike at a
point as far down the river as possible, without nearing
the pirate craft of Chorley. In an hour, which seemed
to him an age, he reached the opposite shore, a few
miles from the Block House, not much fatigued, and
in perfect safety.
CHAPTER XIII.
'Tis an unruly mood, that will not hear,
In reason's spite, the honest word of truth
Such mood will have its punishment, and time
Is never slow to bring it. It will come.
Let
us somewhat retrace our steps, and go back to
the time, when, made a prisoner in the camp of the
Yemassees, Harrison was borne away to Pocota-ligo,
a destined victim for the sacrifice to their god of
victory
.
Having left him, as they thought, secure, the
war-party, consisting, as already described, of
detachments
from a number of independent, though
neighbouring
nations, proceeded to scatter themselves over the
country. In small bodies, they ran from dwelling to
dwelling with the utmost rapidityin this manner, by
simultaneous attacks, everywhere preventing any thing
like union or organization among the borderers. One
or two larger parties were designed for higher
enterprises
,
and without permitting themselves to be drawn
aside to these smaller matters, pursued their object
with Indian inflexibility. These had for their object
the surprise of the towns and villages; and so great
had been their preparations, so well conducted their
Vol. II.E 9
whole plan of warfare, that six thousand warriors had
been thus got together, and, burning and slaying, they
had made their way, in the progress of this
insurrection
,
to the very gates of Charlestownthe chief,
indeed the only town, of any size or strength, in the
colony. But this belongs not to the narrative
immediately
before us.
Two parties of some force took the direction given
to our story, and making their way along the river
Pocota-ligo, diverging for a few miles on the European
side, had, in this manner, assailed every dwelling and
settlement in their way to the Block House. One of
these parties was commanded by Chorley, who, in
addition
to his seamen, was intrusted with the charge of
twenty Indians. Equally savage with the party which
he commanded, the path of this
rusian
was traced in
blood. He offered no obstacle to the sanguinary
indulgence
,
on the part of the Indians, of their habitual
fury in war; but rather stimulated their ferocity by
the indulgence of his own. Unaccustomed, however,
to a march through the forests, the progress of the
seamen was not so rapid as that of the other party
despatched on the same route; and many of the
dwellings
,
therefore, had been surprised and sacked some
time before the sailor commander could make his
appearance
.
The Indian leader who went before him
was Ishiagaska, one of the most renowned warriors of
the nation. He, indeed, was one of those who,
making
a journey to St. Augustine, had first been seduced
by the persuasions of the Spanish governor of that
stationa station denounced by the early Carolinians,
from the perpetual forays upon their borders, by land
and sea, issuing from that quarteras another
Sallee
.
He had sworn fidelity to the King of Spain while
there, and from that point had been persuaded to visit
the neighbouring tribes of the Creek, Apalatchie,
Euchee, and Cherokee Indians, with the war-belt, and
a proposition of a common league against the English
settlementsa proposition greedily accepted, when
coming with innumerable presents of hatchets, knives,
nails, and gaudy dresses, furnished by the Spaniards,
who well knew how to tempt and work upon the
appetites
and imagination of the savages. Laden with
similar presents, the chief had returned home, and with
successful industry had succeeded, as we have seen,
aided by Sanutee, in bringing many of his people to a
similar way of thinking with himself. The frequent
aggressions of the whites, the cheats practised by some
of their traders, and other circumstances, had strongly
co-operated to the desired end; and with his desire
satisfied, Ishiagaska now headed one of the parties
destined to carry the war to Port Royal Island,
sweeping
the track of the Pocota-ligo settlements in his
progress, and at length uniting with the main party of
Sanutee before Charlestown.
He was not slow in the performance of his mission;
but, fortunately for the English, warned by the counsels
of Harrison, the greater number had taken timely
shelter in the Block House, and left but their empty
dwellings to the fury of their invaders. Still, there
were many not so fortunate; and plying their way
from house to house in their progress, with all the
stealth and silence of the eat, the Indians drove their
tomahawk into many of the defenceless cotters who
came imprudently to the door in recognition of the
conciliating demand which they made for admission.
Once in possession, their aim was indiscriminate
slaughter, and one bed of death not unfrequently
comprised
the forms of an entire familyhusband, wife,
and children. Sometimes they fired the dwelling into
which caution denied them entrance, and as the inmates
fled from the flames, stood in watch and shot them down
with their arrows. In this way, sparing none, whether
young or old, male or female, the band led on by
Ishiagaska
appeared at length at the dwelling of the pastor.
Relying upon his reputation with the Indians, and indeed
unapprehensive of any commotion, for he knew nothing
of their arts of deception, we have seen him steadily
skeptical, and almost rudely indifferent to the advice
of Harrison. Regarding the cavalier in a light
somewhat
E 2
equivocal, it is more than probable that the
source of the counsel was indeed the chief obstacle,
with him, in the way of its adoption. Be that as it
may, he stubbornly held out in his determination to
abide where he was, though somewhat staggered in
his confidence, when, in their flight from their own
more exposed situation to the shelter of the Block
House, under Harrison's counsel, the old dame
Grayson
,
with her elder son, stopped at his dwelling. He
assisted the ancient lady to alight from her horse, and
helped her into the house for refreshments, while her
son busied himself with the animal.
Why, what's the matter, dame? What brings you
forth at this late season? To my mind, at your time
of life, the bed would be the best place, certainly,
was the address of the pastor as he handed her some
refreshment.
Oh, sure, parson, and its a hard thing for such as
me to be riding about the country on horseback at any
time, much less at nightthough to be sure Watty
kept close to the bridle of the creature, which you
see is a fine one, and goes like a cradle.
Well, but what brings you out?you have not told
me that, yet. Something of great moment, doubtless.
What, you haven't heard? Hasn't the captain
told you? Well, that's strange! I thought you'd be
one of the first to hear it all,seeing that all say he
thinks of nobody half so much as of your young lady
there. Ah! my dearwell, you needn't blush now,
nor look down, for he's a main fine fellow, and you
couldn't find a better in a long day's journey.
The pastor looked grave, while the old dame, whose
tongue always received a new impulse when she met
her neighbours, ran on in the most annoying manner.
She stopped at last, and though very readily
conjecturing
now the occasion of her flight, he did not conceive
it improper to renew his question.
Well, as I said, it's all owing to the captain's
advice
Captain
Harrison, you knowa sweet
gentleman
that, as ever lived. He it washe came to me
this morning, and he went to all the neighbours, and
looked so seriousyou know he don't often look serious
but he looked so serious as he told us all about the
savagesthe Yemassees, and the Coosawshow they
were thinking to rise and tomahawk us all in our beds;
and then he offered to lend me his horse, seeing I had
no creature, and it was so good of himfor he knew
how feeble I was, and his animal is so gentle and easy.
And so, with this wild story, he has made you
travel over the country by night, when you should
be in your bed. It is too badthis young man
takes quite too many liberties.
Why, how now, parsonwhat's the to-do betwixt
you and the captain? asked the old lady in
astonishment
.
Nonenothing of any moment, was the grave
reply. I only think that he is amusing himself at
our expense, with a levity most improper, by
alarming
the country.
My!and you think the Indians don't mean to
attack and tomahawk us in our beds?
That is my opinion, dameI see no reason why
they should. It is true, they have had some difficulties
with the traders of late, but they have been civil to us.
One or more have been here every day during the
last week, and they seemed then as peaceably disposed
as ever. They have listened with much patience to
my poor exhortations, and, I flatter myself, with profit
to their souls and understandings. I have no
apprehensions
myself; though, had it been left to Bess and
her mother, like you, we should have been all riding
through the woods to the Block House, with the
pleasure
of riding back in the morning.
Bless me! how you talkwell, I never thought
to hear so badly of the captain. He did seem so
good a gentleman, and was so sweetly spoken.
Don't mistake me, dame,I have said nothing
unfavourable
to the character of the gentlemannothing
bad of him. I know little about him, and this is one
chief objection which I entertain to a greater intimacy.
Another objection is that wild and indecorous levity, of
which he never seems to divest himself, and which I
think has given you to-night a fatiguing and
unnecessary
ramble.
Well, if you think so, I don't care to go farther,
for I don't expect to be at all comfortable in the Block
House. So, if you can make me up a truck here
Surely, dame,Bess, my dear
But the proposed arrangement was interrupted by
Walter Grayson, who just then appeared, and who
stoutly protested against his mother's stopping short of
the original place of destination. The elder Grayson
was a great advocate for Captain Harrison, who
imbodied
all his ideal of what was worthy and
magnificent
,
in whom his faith was implicitand he did
not scruple to dilate with praiseworthy eloquence upon
the scandal of such a proceeding as that proposed.
You must not think of it, mother. How will it
look? Besides, I'm sure the captain knows what's
right, and wouldn't say what was not certain. It's
only a mile and a bitand when you can make sure,
you must not stop short.
But, Watty, boythe parson says it's only the
captain's fun, and we'll only have to take a longer ride
in the morning if we go on further to-night.
The son looked scowlingly upon the pastor, as he
responded:
Well, perhaps the parson knows better than any
body else; but give me the opinion of those whose
business
it is to know. Now, I believe in the captain
whenever fighting's going on, and I believe in the
parson
whenever preaching's going onso as it's fighting
and not preaching now, I don't care who knows it, but
I believe in the captain, and I won't believe in the
parson. If it was preaching and not fighting, the parson
should be my man.
Now, Watty, don't be disrespectful. I'm sure the
parson must be right, and so I think we had all better
stay here when there's no use in going.
Well now, mother, I'm sure the parson's wrong,
and if you stay, it will only be to be tomahawked and
scalped.
Why alarm your mother with such language, young
man? You are deceivedthe Yemassees were never
more peaceable than they are at presentMatthews
here broke in, but commanded little consideration from
the son, and almost provoked a harsh retort:
I say, Parson Matthewsone man knows one thing,
and another man anotherbut, curse me, if I believe
in the man that pretends to know every thing. Now
fighting's the business, the very trade as I may say of
Captain Harrison, of the Foresters, and I can tell you,
if it will do you any good to hear, that he knows better
how to handle these red-skins than any man in
Granville
county, let the other man come from whatever
quarter he may. Now preaching's your trade, though
you can't do much at it, I think; yet, as it is your trade,
nobody has a right to meddleit's your business, not
mine. But, I say, parsonI don't think it looks
altogether
respectful to try and undo, behind his back, the
trade of another; and I think it little better than
backbiting
for any one to speak disreputably of the captain,
just when he's gone into the very heart of the nation,
to see what we are to expect, and all for our benefit.
Grayson was mightily indignant, and spoke his mind
freely. The parson frowned and winced at the rather
novel and nowise sparing commentary, but could say
nothing precisely to the point beyond what he had said
already. Preaching, and not fighting, was certainly
his profession; and, to say the least of it, the previous
labours of Harrison among the Indians, his success,
and knowledge of their habits and character, justified
the degree of confidence in his judgment, upon which
Grayson so loudly insisted, and which old Matthews
so sturdily withheld. A new speaker now came
forward
,
however, in the person of Bess Matthews, who,
without the slightest shrinking, advancing from the side
of her mother, thus addressed the last speaker:
Where, Master Grayson, did you say Captain
Harrison
had gone?
Ah, Miss Betsey, I'm glad to see you. But you
may well ask, for it's wonderful to me how any body
can undervalue a noble gentleman just at the very time
he's doing the best, and risking his own life for us all.
Who knows but just at this moment the Yemassees
are scalping him in Pocota-ligo, for its there he is gone
to see what we may expect.
You do not speak certainly, Master Graysonit is
only your conjecture? was her inquiry, while the lip
of the maiden trembled, and the colour fled hurriedly
from her cheek.
Ay, but I do, Miss Betsey, for I put him across the
river myself, and it was then he lent me the horse for
mother. Yes, there he is, and nobody knows in what
difficultyfor my part, I'm vexed to the soul to hear
people running down the man that's doing for them
what they can't do for themselves, and all only for the
good-will of the thing, and not for any pay.
Nobody runs down your friend, Mr. Grayson.
Just the same thingbut you may talk as you think
proper; and if you don't choose to go, you may stay.
I don't want to have any of mine scalped, and so,
mother, let us be off.
The old woman half hesitated, and seemed rather
inclined once more to change her decision and go with
her son, but happening to detect a smile upon the lips
of the pastor, she grew more obstinate than ever, and
peremptorily declared her determination to stay where
she was. Grayson seemed perfectly bewildered, and
knew not what to say. What he did say seemed
only to have the effect of making her more dogged in
her opposition than ever, and he was beginning to
despair
of success, when an influential auxiliary appeared
in the person of his younger brother. To him the elder
instantly appealed, and a close observer might have
detected another change in the countenance of the old
dame at the approach of her younger son. The
features
grew more feminine, and there was an expression
of conscious dependance in the lines of her cheek and
the half parted lips, which necessarily grew out of the
greater love which she bore to the one over the other
child.
And what do you say, Hughey, my son? inquired
the old dame, affectionately.
What have I said, mother? was the brief response.
And we must go to the Block House, Hughey?
Did we not set out to go there?
But the parson thinks there is no danger, Hughey.
That is, doubtless, what he thinks. There are
others having quite as much experience, who think
there is danger, and as you have come so far, it will
not be much additional trouble to go farther and to a
place of safety. Remember my fatherhe thought
there was no danger, and he was scalped for it.
The young man spoke gravely and without hesitation,
but with a manner the most respectful. His words
were conclusive with his mother, whose jewel he
unquestionably
was, and his last reference was
unnecessary
.
Drawing the strings of her hat, with a half
suppressed sigh, she prepared to leave a circle
somewhat
larger and consequently somewhat more cheerful
than that to which she had been accustomed. In the
meantime, a little by-play had been going on between
the elder brother and Bess Matthews, whose
apprehensions
,
but poorly concealed, had been brought into
acute activity on hearing of the precarious adventure
which her lover had undertaken. This dialogue,
however, was soon broken by the departure of Dame
Grayson, attended by her elder son, the younger
remaining
behind, much against the desire of the anxious
mother, though promising soon to follow. Their
departure
was succeeded by a few moments of profound
and somewhat painful silence, for which each of the
parties had a particular reason. The pastor, though
obstinately bent not to take the counsel given by
Harrison
,
was yet not entirely satisfied with his
determination
;
and the probability is, that a single
circumstance
occurring at that time, so as to furnish a
corresponding authority from another, might have
brought about a change in his decision. His lady was
E 3
a taciturn body, who said little then, but looked much
discontent; and Bess, who was too much absorbed
with the voluntary exposure of her lover to the ferocity
of those whom he esteemed enemies, kept her thoughts
entirely from the subject of their late discussion.
Young Grayson, too, had his peculiar cause of disquiet,
and, with a warm passion, active yet denied, in his
heartand a fierce mood for ambition, kept within
those limits which prescription and social artifice so
frequently wind, as with the coil of the constrictor,
around the lofty mind and the upsoaring spirit, keeping
it down to earth, and chaining it in a bondage as
degrading
as it is unnaturalhe felt in no humour to break
through the restraints which fettered the goodly
company
about him. Still, the effort seemed properly
demanded of him, and referring to the common
movement
,
he commenced the conversation by regretting,
with a commonplace phraseology, the prospect held
forth, so injurious to the settlement by any
approaching
tumult among the Indians. The old pastor
fortified his decision not to remove, by repeating his
old confidence in their quiet:
The Indians, said he, have been and are quiet
enough. We have no reason to anticipate assault now.
It is true, they have the feelings of men, and as they
have been injured by some of our traders, and perhaps
by some of our borderers, they may have cause of
complaint, and a few of them may even be desirous
of revenge. This is but natural. But, if this were
the general feeling, we should have seen its proofs
before now. They would seek it in individual
enterprises
,
and would strike and slay those who wronged
them. Generally speaking, they have nothing to
complain
of; for, since that excellent man, Charles Craven,
has been governor, he has been their friend, even in
spite of the assembly, who, to say truth, have been
nowise
sparing of injustice wherever the savage has been
concerned. Again, I say, I see not why we should
apprehend danger from the Yemassees at this moment.
As if himself satisfied with the force of what he had
said, the pastor threw himself back in his chair, and
closed his eyes and crossed his hands in that starched
and canting manner, quite too common among a class
of professional worshippers, and in which
self-complaisance
makes up quite as much of the feature as
sincerity of devotion. Grayson replied briefly:
Yet there are some evidences which should not
be disregarded. Sanutee, notoriously friendly as he
has been to us, no longer visits ushe keeps carefully
away, and when seen, his manner is restrained, and
his language any thing but cordial. Ishiagaska, too,
has been to St. Augustine, brought home large presents
for himself and other of the chiefs, and has paid a visit
to the Creeks, the Apalatchies, and other tribes
besides bringing home with him Chigilli, the celebrated
Creek war-chief, who has been among the Yemassees
ever since. Now, to say the least of it, there is much
that calls for attention in the simple intercourse of
foes so inveterate hitherto as the Spaniards and
Yemassees
.
Greater foes have not often been known,
and this new friendship is therefore the more
remarkable
;
conclusive, indeed, when we consider the
coldness
of the Yemassees towards us just as they have
contracted this new acquaintance; the fury with which
they revolutionized the nation, upon the late treaty for
their lands, and the great difficulty which Sanutee had
in restraining them from putting our commissioners to
death.
Ah, that was a bad business, but the fault was on
our side. Our assembly would inveigle with the
young chiefs, and bribe them against the will of the
old, though Governor Craven told them what they
might expect, and warned them against the measure.
I have seen his fine letter to the assembly on that very
point.
We differ, Mr. Matthews, about the propriety of
the measure, for it is utterly impossible that the whites
and Indians should ever live together and agree. The
nature of things is against it, and the very difference
between the two, that of colour, perceptible to our
most ready sentinel, the sight, must always constitute
them an inferior caste in our minds. Apart from this,
an obvious superiority in arts and education must soon
force upon them the consciousness of their inferiority.
When this relationship is considered, in connexion
with the uncertainty of their resources and means of
life, it will be seen that, after a while, they must not
only be inferior, but they must become dependant.
When this happens, and it will happen with the
diminution
of their hunting lands, circumscribed, daily,
more and more, as they are by our approaches, they
must become degraded and sink into slavery and
destitution
.
A few of them have become so now, and
one chief cause of complaint among the Yemassees,
is the employment by our people of several of their
warriors to carry messages and hunt our runaway
slavesboth of them employments, which their own
sense readily informs them, are necessarily degrading
to their character, and calculated to make them a
nation
of mercenaries. To my mind, the best thing we
can do for them is to send them as far as possible from
contact with our people.
What! and deny them all the benefits of our
blessed religion?
By no means, sir. The old apostles would have
gone along with, or after them. Unless the vocation
of the preacher be very much changed in times
present
from times past, they will not, therefore, be denied
any of the benefits of religious education.
The answer somewhat silenced the direction of our
pastor's discourse, who, though a very well meaning,
was yet a very sleek and highly providential person;
and, while his wits furnished no ready answer to this
suggestion, he was yet not prepared himself for an
utter remove from all contact with civilization, and the
good things known to the economy of a Christian
kitchen. As he said nothing in reply, Grayson
proceeded
thus:
There is yet another circumstance upon which
I have made no remark, yet which seems important
at this moment of doubt, and possibly of danger. This
guarda costa, lying in the river for so many days,
without any intercourse with our people, and
seemingly
with no object, is at least singular. She is
evidently
Spanish; and the report is, that on her way, she
was seen to put into every inlet along the coastevery
bay and creek along the riversand here we find her,
not coming to the shore, but moored in the stream,
ready to cut cable and run at a moment. What can be
her object?
You have been at some pains, Master Hugh
Grayson, I see, to get evidence; but so far as this vessel
or guarda costa is concerned, I think I may venture
to say she is harmless. As to her putting into this
creek or that, I can say nothingshe may have done
so, and it is very probable, for she comes especially
to get furs and skins from the Indians. I know her
captainat least I knew him when a boya wild
youth from my own countywho took to the sea for the
mere love of roving. He was wild, and perhaps a
little vicious, when young, and may be so now; but I
have his own word that his object is trade with the
Indians for furs and skins, as I have told you.
And why not with the whites for furs and skins?
No, sir! He needs no furs, and of this I have
evidence
enough. I had a fine parcel, which I preferred
rather to sell on the spot than send to Charlestown,
but he refused to buy from me on the most idle
pretence
.
This, more than any thing else, makes me
doubt; and, in his refusal, I feel assured there is more
than we know of. Like yourself, I have been slow to
give car to these apprehensions, yet they have forced
themselves upon me, and precaution is surely better,
even though at some trouble, when safety is the object.
My brother, from whom I have several facts of this
kind within the last hour, is himself acquainted with
much in the conduct of the Indians, calculated to
create suspicion, and from Captain Harrison he gets
the rest.
Ay, Harrison againno evidence is good without
10
him. He is everywhere, and with him a good jest is
authority enough at any time.
I love him not, sir, any more than yourself, said
Grayson, gloomily; but there is reason in what he
tells us now.
Father! said Bess, coming forward, and putting
her hand tenderly on the old man's shoulderhear
to Master Graysonhe speaks for the best. Let us
go to the Block, only for the night, or at most two or
three nightsfor Gabriel said the danger would be
soon over.
Go to, girl, and be not foolish. Remember, too, to
speak of gentlemen by their names in full, with a
master before them, or such as the law or usage gives
them. Go!
The manner in which Harrison had been referred to
by the daughter, offended Grayson not less than it did
her father, and, though now well satisfied of the
position
in which the parties stood, he could not prevent
the muscles of his brow contracting sternly, and his
eyes bending down sullenly upon her. The old lady
now put in:
Really, John, you are too obstinate. Here are all
against you, and there is so little trouble, and there
may be so much risk. You may repent when it is too
late.
You will have something then to scold about,
dame, and therefore should not complain. But all
this is exceedingly childish, and you will do me the
favour, Master Grayson, to discourse of other things,
since, as I see not any necessity to fly from those
who have been friends always, I shall, for this good
night at least, remain just where I am. For you,
wife, and you, Bess, if you will leave me, you are both
at liberty to go.
Leave you, father, exclaimed Bess, sinking on
one knee by the old man's sidespeak not unkindly.
I will stay, and if there be danger, will freely share it
with you, in whatever form it may chance to come.
You are a good girl, Bessa little timid, perhaps,
but time will cure you of that, and patting her on the
head, the old man rose, and took his way from the
house into his cottage enclosure. Some household
duties at the same moment demanding the
consideration
of the old lady in another room, she left the
young people alone together.
CHAPTER XIV.
A cruel tale for an unwilling ear,
And maddening to the spirit. But go on
Speak daggers to my soul, which, though it feels,
Thou canst not warp to wrong by injuries.
This
departure of the pastor and his lady was
productive
of some little awkwardness in those who
remained
.
For a few moments, a deathlike stillness
succeeded. Well aware that her affections for
Harrison
were known to her present companion, a
feeling
not altogether unpleasant, of maiden bashfulness,
led the eyes of Bess to the floor, and silenced her
speech. A harsher mood for a time produced a like
situation on the part of Grayson, but it lasted not long.
With a sullen sort of resolution, gathering into some
of that energetic passion as he proceeded which so
much marked his character, he broke the silence at
length with a worda single worduttered
desperately
,
as it were, and with a half choking
enunciation
:
Miss Matthews
She looked up at the sound, and as she beheld the
dark expression of his eye, the concentrated glance,
the compressed lipas if he dared not trust himself to
utter that which he felt at the same time must be
utteredshe half started, and the Sir with which
she acknowledged his address was articulated
timorously
.
Be not alarmed, Miss Matthews; be not alarmed.
I see what I would not see.I see that I am an object
rather of fear, rather of dislikedetestation it may
bethan of any other of those various feelings I would
freely give my life to inspire in your heart.
You wrong me, Master Grayson, indeed you do.
I have no such feeling like those you speak of. I do
not dislike or detest you, and I should be very sorry to
have you think so. Do not think so, I pray you.
But you fear meyou fear me, Miss Matthews,
and the feeling is much the same. Yet why should
you fear mewhat have I done, what said?
You startle me, Master Graysonnot that I fear
you, for I have no cause to fear when I have no
desire to harm. But, truth, sirwhen you look so
wildly and speak so strangely, I feel unhappy and
apprehensive, and yet I do not fear you.
He looked upon her as she spoke with something
of a smilea derisive smile.
Yet, if you knew all, Miss Matthewsif you had
seen and heard allay, even of the occurrences of the
last two hours, you would both fear and hate me.
I do not fear to hear, Master Grayson, and
therefore
I beg that you will speak out. You cannot,
surely, design to terrify me? Let me but think so, sir,
but for a moment, and you will as certainly fail.
You are strong, but not strong enough to hear,
without terror, the story I could tell you. I said you
feared, and perhaps hated memoreperhaps you
despise me. I despise myself, sincerely, deeply, for
some of my doings, of which youmy mad passion for
you, ratherhas been the cause.
Speak no more of this, Master Graysonfreely
did I forgive you that errorI would also forget it,
sir.
That forgiveness was of no availmy heart has
grown more black, more malignant than ever; and, no
need for wonder! Let your thoughts go back and
examine
,
along with mine, its history; for, though in this
search, I feel the accursed probe irritating anew at
every touch the yet bleeding wound, I am not
unwilling
that my own hand should direct it. Hear me.
We were children together, Bess Matthews.In our
infancy, in another land, we played happily together.
When we came to this, unconscious almost of our
remove, for at first we were not separated,when the
land was new, and our fathers felled the old trees and
made a cabin common, for three happy years, to them
both, we played together under the same shelter. Day
by day found us inseparate, and, at that time, mutual
dependants. Each day gave us new consciousness,
and every new consciousness taught us a most unselfish
division of our gains. I feel that such was your spirit,
Bess Matthewsdo me the justice to say, you believe
such was my spirit also.
It wasI believe it, HughMaster Grayson, I
mean.
Oh, be not so frigidsay HughHugh as of old
you used to say it, exclaimed the youth, passionately,
as she made the correction.
Such was your spirit then, Hugh, I willingly say it.
You were a most unselfish playmate. I have always
done you justice in my thought. I am glad still to
do so.
Then our school-mate lifethat camethree
months to me in the year, with old Squire Downie,
while you had all the year.I envied you that, Bess,
though I joyed still in your advantages. What was my
solace the rest of the year, when, without a feeling for
my labour, I ran the furrows, and following my father's
footsteps, dropped the grain into them?what was my
solace then? Let me answer, as perhaps you know
not. The thought of the night, when, unwearied by
all exertion, I should fly over to your cottage, and
chat with you the few hours between nightfall and
bedtime. I loved you then.That was love, though
neither of us knew it. It was not the search after the
playmate, but after the playmate's heart, that carried
me there; for my brother, with whom you played not
less than with myself,he sunk wearied to his bed,
though older and stronger than myself. I was
unfatigued
,
for I loved; and thus it is that the body,
taking its temper from the affections, is strong or weak,
bold or timid, as they warm into emotion, or freeze
with indifference. But day after day, and night after
night, I came; unrelaxing, unchanging, to watch your
glance, to see the play of your lipsto be the adoring
boy, afraid sometimes even to breathe, certainly to
speak, through fear of breaking the spell, or possibly
of offending the divinity to whom I owed so much,
and sent up feelings in prayer so devoutly.
Speak not thus extravagantly, Master Grayson, or
I must leave you.
Hughcall me Hugh, will you not? It bears me
backback to the boyhood I would I had never risen
from.
Hugh, then, I will call you, and with a true pleasure.
Ay, more, Hugh, I will be to you again the sister you
found me then; but you must not run on so idly.
Idly, indeed, Bess Matthews, when for a dearer
and a sweeter name I must accept that of sister. But
let me speak ere I madden. Time came with all his
changes. The neighbourhood thickened, we were no
longer few in number, and consequently no longer
dependant
upon one another. The worst change followed
then, Bess Matthewsthe change in you.
How, Hughyou saw no change in me. I have
surely been the same always.
No, nomany changes I saw in you. Every hour
had its change, and most of them were improving
changes. With every change you grew more beautiful;
and the auburn of your hair in changing to a deep and
glossy brown, and the soft pale of your girlish cheek
in putting on a leaf of the most delicate rose, and the
bright glance of your eye in assuming a soft and
qualifying
moisture in its expression,were all so many
exquisite changes of lovely to lovelier, and none of
them unnoticed by me. My eyes were sentinels that
slept not when watching yours. I saw every change,
however unimportanthowever unseen by others! Not
a glancenot a featurenot a tonenot an
expression
did I leave unstudied; and every portraiture,
indelibly
fixed upon my memory, underwent comparison
in my lingering reflection before slumbering at night.
Need I tell you, that watching your person thus, your
mind underwent a not less scrupulous examination.
I weighed every sentence of your lipsevery thought
of your senseevery feeling of your heart. I could
detect the unuttered emotion in your eyes; and the
quiver of your lip, light as that of the rose when the
earliest droppings of the night dew steals into its
bosom, was perceptible to that keen glance of love
which I kept for ever upon you. How gradual then
was the change which I noted day by day. He came
at length, and with a prescience which forms no small
portion of the spirit of a true affection, I cursed him
when I saw him. You saw him too, and then the change
grew rapiddreadfully rapid, to my eyes. He won
you, as you had won me. There was an instinct in it.
You no longer cared whether I came to you or not
Nay, Hughthere you are wrong againI was
always gladalways most happy to see you.
You think so, Bess;I am willing to believe you
think sobut it is you who are wrong. I know that
you cared not whether I came or not, for on the
subject
your thought never rested for a moment, or but for
a moment. I soon discovered that you were also
important
in his sight, and I hated him the more from the
discoveryI hated him the more for loving you. Till
this day, however, I had not imagined the extent to
which you had both goneI had not feared, I had not
felt all my desolation. I had only dreamed of and
dreaded it. But when, in a paroxysm of madness, I
looked upon you and sawsaw your mutual lips
No more, Master Grayson,she interposed with
dignity.
I will notforgive me;but you know how it
maddened
me, and how I erred, and how you rebuked me.
How dreadful was that rebuke!but it did not
restrain
the errorit impelled me to a new one
What new one, Hugh?
Hear me! This man Harrisonthat I should
speak his name!that I should speak it praisefully
too!he came to our cottageshowed our danger
from the Yemassees to my mother, and would have
persuaded her to fly this morningbut I interfered
and prevented the removal. He saw my brother,
however, and as Walter is almost his worshipper, he
was more successful with him. Leaving you in a
mood little short of madness this afternoon, I hurried
home, but there I could not rest, and vexed with a
thousand dreadful thoughts, I wandered from the house
away into the woods. After a while came the tread
of a horse rapidly driving up the river-trace, and near
the spot where I wandered. The rider was Harrison.
He alighted at a little distance from me, tied his horse
to a shrub, and threw himself just before me upon the
grass. A small tree stood between us, and my
approach was unnoticed. I heard him murmuring, and
with the same base spirit which prompted me to look
down on your meeting to-day, I listened to his
language
.
His words were words of tenderness and
loveof triumphant love, and associated with your
namehe spoke of youGod curse him! as his own.
The word Gabriel fell unconsciously from the lips
of the maiden as she heard this part of the narrative.
For a moment Grayson paused, and his brow grew
black, while his teeth were compressed closely; but
as she looked up, as if impatient for the rest of his
narrative, he went on:
Then I maddened. Then I grew fiendish. I
know not whence the impulse, but it must have been
from hell. I sprang upon him, and with the energies
of a tiger and with more than his ferocity, I pinioned
him to the ground, my knee upon his breastone hand
upon his throat, and with my knife in the other
Stay!Godmansay that you slew him not!
You struck notoh! you kept back your handhe
lives! Convulsed with terror, she clasped the arm of
the speaker, while her face grew haggard with affright,
and her eyes seemed starting from their sockets.
I slew him not! he replied solemnly.
God bless youGod bless you! was all that she
could utter, as she sunk back fainting upon the floor
of the apartment.
CHAPTER XV.
Thou hast not slain her with thy cruel word,
She lives, she wakesher eyes unclose again,
And I breathe freely.
Passionate
and thoughtless, Hugh Grayson had not
calculated the consequences of his imprudent and
exciting
narrative upon a mind so sensitive. He was
now aware of his error, and his alarm at her situation
was extreme. He lifted her from the floor, and
supported
her to a seat, endeavouring, as well as he could,
with due care and anxiety, to restore her to
consciousness
.
While thus employed the pastor re-entered the
apartment, and his surprise may be imagined.
Ha! what is thiswhat have you done, Master
Grayson? Speak, sirmy child? BessBess, dear
look up. See'tis thy old father that holds and
looks on thee. Look up, my childlook up and speak
to me.
Without answering, Grayson resigned her to the
hands of the pastor, and with folded arms and a face
full of gloomy expression, stood gazing upon the scene
in silence. The father supported her tenderly, and
with a show of fervency not common to a habit which,
from constant exercise, and the pruderies of a form
of worship rather too much given to externals, had, in
progress of time, usurped dominion over a temper
originally rather passionate than phlegmatic.
Exclaiming
all the while to the unconscious girland
now and then addressing Grayson in a series of broken
sentences, the old man proved the possession of a
degree of regard for his child which might have
appeared
doubtful before. Grayson, meanwhile, stood
by,an awed and silent spectator,bitterly
reproaching
himself for his imprudence in making such a
communication, and striving, in his own mind, to forge
or force an apology, at least to himself, for the
heedlessness
which had marked his conduct.
What, Master Grayson, has been the cause of
this? Speak out, sirmy daughter is my heart, and
you have trifled with her. Beware, sir.--I am an old
man, and a professor of a faith whose essence is
peace; but I am still a man, sirwith the feelings
and the passions of a man; and sooner than my child
should suffer wrong, slight as a word, I will even throw
aside that faith and become a man of blood. Speak,
sir, what has made all this?
The youth grew firmer under such an exhortation,
for his was the nature to be won rather than
commanded
.
He looked firmly into the face of the
speaker, and his brow gathered to a frown. The old
man saw it, and saw in the confidence his glance
expressed
,
that however he might have erred, he had at
least intended no disrespect. As this conviction
came to his mind, he immediately addressed his
companion
in a different character, while returning
consciousness
in his daughter's eyes warned him also to
moderation.
I have been harsh, Master Graysonharsh, indeed,
my son; but my daughter is dear to me as the fresh
blood around my heart, and suffering with her is
soreness
and more than suffering to me. Forbear to say,
at this time--I see that she has misunderstood you, or
her sickness may have some other cause. Look--
bring me some water, my son.
My son! muttered Grayson to himself as he
proceeded
to the sideboard where stood the pitcher.
Pouring some of its contents into a glass, he
approached
the maiden, whose increasing sighs
indicated
increasing consciousness. The old man was
about to take the glass from his hands when her
unclosing
eye rested upon him. With a shriek she started
to her feet, and lifting her hand as if to prevent his
approach
,
and averting her eye as if to shut his
presence
from her sight, she exclaimed--
Away! thou cruel murderercome not nigh me
look not on metouch me not with thy hands of blood.
Touch me notaway.
God of Heaven! exclaimed Grayson, in like
horror,what, indeed have I done? Forgive me,
Miss Matthews, forgive meI am no murderer. He
livesI struck him not. Forgive me!
I have no forgivenessnone. Thou hast lifted
thy hand against God's imagethou hast sought to
slay a noble gentleman to whom thou art as nothing.
Awaylet me not look upon thee!
Be calm, Bessmy daughter. Thou dost
mistake
.
This is no murdererthis is our young friend,
thy old playmate, Hugh Grayson.
Ay! he came with that old story, of how we
played together, and spoke of his love and alland
then showed me a knife, and lifted his bloody hands
to my face, andOh! it was too horrible. And she
shivered at the association of terrible objects which
her imagination continued to conjure up.
Thou hast wrought upon her over much, Master
Grayson, and though I think with no ill intent, yet it
would seem with but small judgment.
True, sirand give me, I pray you, but a few
moments with your daughtera few moments alone,
that I may seek to undo this cruel thought which she
now appears to hold me in. But a few moments
believe meI shall say nothing unkind or offensive.
Leave me not, fathergo not outrather let him
go where I may not see him, for he has been a base
spy, and would have been a foul murderer, but that the
good spirit held back his hand.
Thou sayest rightly, Bess MatthewsI have been
base and foulbut thou sayest ungently and against
thy better nature, for I have scorned myself that I was
so. Give me leavelet thy father goturn thy head
close thine eyes. I ask thee not to look upon me,
but hear me and the quest, which I claim rather from
thy goodness than from any meritings of mine own.
There was a gloomy despondence in his looks, and
a tone of perfect
abandon
in his voice, that went to
the heart of the maiden, as, while he spoke, she
turned, and her eyes were bent upon him. Looking
steadfastly upon his face for a few moments after he
had ceased speaking, she appeared slowly to
deliberate
;
then, as if satisfied, she turned to her father, and
with a motion of her hand signified her consent.
The old man retired, and Grayson would have led her
to a seat; but rejecting his proffered aid with much
firmness, she drew a chair, and motioning him also to
one at a little distance, she prepared to hear him.
I needed not this, Miss Matthews, to feel how
deeply I had erredhow dreadfully I have been
punished
.
When you know that I have had but one stake
in lifethat I have lived but for one objectand have
lived in vain and am now denied,you will not need
to be told how completely unnecessary to my torture
and trial is the suspicion of your heart, and the
coldness
of your look and manner. I came to-night and
sought this interview, hopeless of any thing beside,
at least believing myself not altogether unworthy of
your esteem. To prove this more certainly to your
mind, I laid bare my own. I suppressed nothing
you saw my uncovered soul, and without concealment
I resolutely pointed out to you all its blotsall its
deformities
.
I spoke of my love for you, of its extent,
not that I might claim any from you in returnfor I
saw that such hope was idle; and, indeed, knowing
what I do, and how completely your heart is in the
possession of another, were it offered to me at this
moment, could I accept of it on any terms? Base as
I have been for a momentcriminal, as at another
moment I would have been, I value still too deeply
my own affections to yield them to one who cannot
make a like return, and with as few reservations. But
I told you of my love that you should find something
in its violencesay its madnessto extenuate, if not
to excuse, the errors to which it has prompted me. I
studiously declared those errors, the better to prove to
you that I was no hypocrite, and the more certainly
therefore to inspire your confidence in one who, if he
did not avoid, was at least as little willing to defend
them. I came to you for your pardon; and, unable to
win your love, I sought only for your esteem. I have
spoken.
Master Hugh GraysonI have heard you, and am
willing to believe in much that you have said; but I am
not prepared to believe that in much that you have said
you have not been practising upon yourself. You have
said you loved me, and I believe itsorry I am that
you should love unprofitably anywheremore sorry
still that I should be the unwitting occasion of a
mispent
and profitless passion. But, look closely into
yourselfinto your own thoughts, and then ask how
you have loved me? Let me answernot as a woman
not as a thinking and a feeling creaturebut as a
plaything, whom your inconsiderate passion might
practise upon at will, and move to tears or smiles, as
may best accord with a caprice that has never from
childhood been conscious of any subjection. Even
now, you come to me for my confidencemy esteem.
Yet you studiously practise upon my affections and
emotionsupon my woman weaknesses. You saw
that I loved anotherI shame not to say it, for I believe
and feel itand you watched me like a spy. You had
there no regulating principle keeping down impulse,
but with the caprice of a bad passion, consenting to a
meanness, which is subject to punishment in our very
slaves. Should I trust the man who, under any
circumstances
save those of another's good and safety,
should deserve the epithet of eaves-dropper?
Forbearforbearin mercy!
No, Master Graysonlet me not forbear. Were
it principle and not pride that called upon me to
forbear
,
Vol. II.F 11
I should obey it; but I have known you from
childhood, Hugh, and I speak to you now with all the
freedomand, believe mewith all the affection of
that period. I know your failing, and I speak to it.
I would not wound your heart, I only aim at the
amendment
of your understanding. I would give it a true
direction. I believe your heart to be in the right
placeit only wants that your mind should never
swerve from its place. Forgive me, therefore, if,
speaking what I hold to be just, I should say that
which should seem to be harsh also.
Go ongo on, Miss MatthewsI can bear it all
any thing from you.
And but small return, Master Grayson, for I have
borne much from you. Not content with the one
error, which freely I forgaveso far as forgiveness
may be yielded without amendment or repentance
you proceeded to anotherto a crime, a dark, a
dreadful
crime. You sought the life of a fellow-creature,
without provocation, and worse still, Master Grayson,
without permitting your enemy the common footing
of equality. In that one act there was malignity,
murder
,
and
No moreno morespeak it not
Cowardice!
Thou art bent to crush me quite, Bess Matthews
thou wouldst have me in the dustthy foot on my
head, and the world seeing it. This is thy triumph.
A sad one, Hugh Graysona sad onefor thou
hast thy goodthy noble qualities, wert thou not a
slave.
Slave, toomalignant, murderer, coward, slave.
Ay, to thy baser thoughts, and from these would I
free thee. With theeI believeit is but to know
the tyranny to overthrow it. Thy pride of
independence
would there be active, and in that particular
most nobly exercised. But let me proceed.
Is there more?
Yes,and thou wilt better prove thy regard for
my esteem, when thou wilt stand patiently to hear me
out. Thou didst not kill, but all the feeling of death
the death of the mindwas undergone by thy destined
victim. He felt himself under thee, he saw no hope,
he looked up in the glance of thy descending knife,
and knew not that the good mood would so soon
return
to save him from death, and thee from perdition.
In his thought thou didst slay him, though thou struck
no blow to his heart.
True, trueI thought not of that.
Yet thou camest to me, Hugh Grayson, and claimed
merit for thy forbearance. Thou wert confident,
because
thou didst not all the crime thy first criminal
spirit proposed to thee. Shall I suggest that the good
angel which interposed was thy weaknessart thou
sure that the dread of punishment, and not the feeling
of good, stayed thee not?
No! as I live,as I stand before thee, Bess
Matthews
,
thou dost me wrong. God help me, no! I
was bad enough, and base enough, without thatit
was not the low fear of the hangmannot the rope--
not the death. I am sure it was any thing but that.
I believe you; but what was it brought you to me
with all this storythe particulars at full,the
dreadful
incidents one upon the other, until thou saw'st my
agony under the uplifted knife aiming at the bosom of
one as far above thee, Hugh Grayson, in all that
makes the noble gentleman, as it is possible for
principle
to be above passion, and the love of God and
good works superior to the fear of punishment.
Where was thy manliness in this recital? Thou hast
no answer here.
Thou speakest proudly for him, Bess Matthews
it is well he stands so high in thy sight.
I forgive thee that sneer, too, Master Grayson,
along with thy malignity, thy murder, and thy
manliness
.
Be thou forgiven of allbut let us say no
more together. My regards are not with me to
bestow--they
belong to thy doings, and thou mayst
command, not solicit, whenever thou dost deserve them.
Let us speak no more together.
F 2
Cruelmost heartlessam I so low in thy sight?
See, I am at thy feettrample me in the dustI will
not shrinkI will not reproach thee.
Thou shouldst shame at this practice upon my
feelings. Thou, Hugh Graysonwith thy mind, with
thy prideshouldst not aim to do by passionate
entreaty
what thou mayst not do by sense and right
reason
.
Rise, sirthou canst not move me now. Thou
hast undone thyself in my sightthou needst not sink
at my feet to have me look down upon thee.
Had a knife gone into the heart of the young man,
a more agonizing expression could not have
overshadowed
his countenance. The firmness of the
maiden
had taught him her strength not less than his own
weakness. He felt his error, and with the mind for
which she had given him credit, he rose, with a new
determination, to his feet.
Thou art right, Miss Matthewsand in all that
has passed, mine has been the error and the wrong. I
will not ask for the regards which I should command;
but thou shalt hear well of me henceforward, and wilt
do me more grateful justice when we meet again.
I take thy promise, Hugh, for I know thy
independence
of character, and such a promise will not be
necessary now for thy good. Take my handI
forgive
thee. It is my weakness, perhaps, to do sobut
I forgive thee.
He seized her hand, which she had, with a girlish
frankness, extended to him, carried it suddenly to his
lips, and immediately left the dwelling.
CHAPTER XVI.
The storm cloud gathers fast, the hour's at hand,
When it will burst in fury o'er the land;
Yet is the quiet beautifulthe rush
Of the sweet south is all disturbs the hush,
While, like pure spirits, the pale night-stars brood
O'er forests which the Indian bathes in blood.
A brief
and passing dialogue between Grayson and
the pastor, at the entrance, partially explained to the
latter the previous history. The disposition of
Matthews
in regard to the pretensions of Grayson to his
daughter's handof which he had long been
conscious
was
rather favourable than otherwise. In this
particular, the suit of Grayson derived importance from
the degree of ill-favour with which the old gentleman
had been accustomed to consider that of Harrison.
With strong prejudices, the pastor was quite satisfied
to obey an impression, and to mistake, as with persons
of strong prejudices is frequently the case, an impulse
for an argument. Not that he could urge any thing
against the suiter who was the favourite of his child
of that he felt satisfiedbut, coming fairly under the
description of the doggerel satirist, he did not dislike
Harrison a jot less for having little reason to dislike
him. And there is something in this.
It was, therefore, with no little regret, he beheld the
departure of Grayson under circumstances so
unfavourable
to his suit. From his own, and the lips of
his daughter, alike, he had been taught to understand
that she had objections; but the emotion of Grayson,
and the openly-expressed indignation of Bess, at once
satisfied him of the occurrence of that which
effectually
excluded the hope that time might effect some
change for the better. He was content, therefore,
simply to regret what his own good sense taught him
he could not amend, and what his great regard for his
child's peace persuaded him not to attempt.
Grayson, in the meantime, hurried away under
strong excitements. He had felt deeply the denial,
but far more deeply the rebukes of the maiden. She
had searched narrowly into his inner mindhad probed
close its weaknesseshad laid bare to his own eyes
those silent motives of his conduct, which he had not
himself dared to analyze or encounter. His pride was
hurt by her reproaches, and he was ashamed of the
discoveries which she had made. Though mortified
to the soul, however, there was a redeeming principle
at work within him. He had been the slave of his
mood; but he determined, from that moment, upon the
overthrow of the tyranny. To this she had counselled
him; to this his own pride of character had also
counselled
him; and, though agonized with the defeated
hopes clamouring in his bosom, he adopted a noble
decision, and determined to be at least worthy of the
love which he yet plainly felt he could never win.
His course now was to adopt energetic measures in
preparing for any contest that might happen with the
Indians. Of this danger he was not altogether
conscious
.
He did not imagine it so near at hand, and
had only given in to precautionary measures with
regard
to his mother, in compliance with his brother's
wish, and as no great inconvenience could result from
their temporary removal. But the inflexible obstinacy
of the pastor in refusing to take the shelter of the
contiguous
Block House, led him more closely to reflect
upon the consequent exposure of Bess Matthews; and,
from thus reflecting, the danger became magnified to
his eyes. He threw himself, therefore, upon the steed
of Harrison, as soon as he reached the Block House;
and without troubling himself to explain to any one his
intentions, for he was too proud for that, he set off at
once, and at full speed, to arouse such of the
neighbouring
foresters as had not yet made their
appearance
at the place of gathering, or had been too
remotely
situated for previous warning.
The old pastor, on parting with the disappointed
youth, re-entered the dwelling, and without being
perceived
by his daughter. She stood in the middle of
the apartment, her finger upon her lips, and absorbed
in meditation as quiet as if she had never before been
disturbed for an instant; like some one of those fine
imbodiments of heavenward devotion we meet with
now and then in a Holy Family by one of the old
masters
.
He approached her, and when his presence
became
evident, she knelt suddenly before him.
Bless me, fatherdear fatherbless me, and let
me retire.
God bless you, Bessand watch over and protect
youbut what disturbs you? You are troubled.
I know not, fatherbut I fear. I fear something
terrible, yet know not what. My thoughts are all in
confusion.
You need sleep, my child, and quiet. These
excitements
and foolish reports have worried you; but a
night's sleep will make all well again. Go, nowgo
to your mother, and may the good angels keep you.
With the direction, she arose, threw her arms about
his neck, and with a kiss, affectionately bidding him
good night, she retired to her chamber, first passing
a few brief moments with her mother in the
adjoining
room. Calling to the trusty negro who
performed
such offices in his household, the pastor gave
orders for the securing of the house, and retired to his
chamber also. Julythe name of the negro
proceeded
to fasten the windows, which was done by
means of a wooden bolt; and thrusting a thick bar of
knotted pine into hooks on either side of the door, he
coolly threw himself down to his own slumbers
alongside
of it. We need scarcely add, knowing the
susceptibility
of the black in this particular, that sleep was
not slow in its approaches to the strongest tower in the
citadel of his senses. The subtle deity soon mastered
all his sentinels, and a snore, not the most scrupulous
in the world, sent forth from the flattened but
capacious
nostrils, soon announced his entire conquest
over the premises he had invaded.
But though she retired to her chamber, Bess
Matthews
in vain sought for sleep. Distressed by the
previous circumstances, and warmly excited as she
had been by the trying character of the scene through
which she had recently passed, she had vainly
endeavoured
to find that degree of quiet, which she felt
necessary to her mental not less than to her physical
repose. After tossing fruitlessly on her couch for a
fatiguing hour, she arose, and slightly unclosing the
window, the only one in her chamber, she looked
forth upon the night. It was clear, with many stars
a slight breeze bent the tree-tops, and their murmurs,
as they swayed to and fro, were pleasant to her
melancholy
fancies. How could she sleep when she thought
of the voluntary risk taken by Harrison? Where
was he thenin what danger, surrounded by what
deadly enemies?perhaps under their very knives,
and she not there to interposeto implore forto save
him. How could she fail to love so much disinterested
generosityso much valour and adventure, taken, as
with a pardonable vanity, she fondly thought, so much
for her safety and for the benefit of hers. Thus
musing
,
thus watching, she lingered at the window, looking
forth, but half conscious as she gazed, upon the thick
woods, stretching away in black masses, of those old
Indian forests. Just then, the moon rose calmly and
softly in the easta fresher breeze rising along with,
and gathering seemingly with her ascent. The river
wound partly before her gaze, and there was a long
bright shaft of lighta pure white gleam, which
even its ripples could not overcome or dissipate,
borrowed from the pale orb just then swelling above
it. Suddenly a canoe shot across the water in the
distancethen another, and anotherquietly, and with
as little show of life, as if they were only the gloomy
shades of the past generation's warriors. Not a voice,
not a whispernot even the flap of an oar, disturbed
the deep hush of the scene; and the little canoes that
showed dimly in the river from afar, as soon as they
had overshot the pale gleamy bar of the moon upon
its bosom, were no longer perceptible. Musing upon
these objects, with a vague feeling of danger, and an
oppressive sense at the same time of exhaustion,
which forbade any thing like a coherent estimate of
the thoughts which set in upon her mind like so many
warring currents, Bess left the window, and threw
herself, listlessly yet sad, upon the side of the couch,
vainly soliciting that sleep which seemed so
reluctant
to come. How slow was its progresshow long
before she felt the haze growing over her eyelids.
A sort of stupor succeededshe was conscious of the
uncertainty of her perception, and though still, at
intervals
,
the beams from the fast ascending moon
caught her eyes, they flitted before her like spiritual
forms that looked on and came but to depart. These at
length went from her entirely as a sudden gust closed
the shutter, and a difficult and not very sound slumber
came at last to her relief.
A little before this, and with the first moment of the
rise of the moon on the eastern summits, the watchful
Hector, obedient to his orders, prepared to execute the
charge which his master had given him at parting.
Releasing Dugdale from the log to which he had been
bound, he led the impatient and fierce animal down
to the river's brink, and through the tangled route only
known to the hunter. The single track, imperfectly
visible in the partial light, impeded somewhat his
progress
,
so that the moon was fairly visible by the time
he reached the river. This circumstance was
productive
of some small inconvenience to the faithful
slave, since it proved him something of a laggard in
his duty, and at the same time, from the lateness of
the hour, occasioned no little anxiety in his mind for
his master's safety. With a few words, well
understood
seemingly by the well-trained animal, he cheered
him on, and pushing him to the slight trench made by
the horse's hoof, clearly defined upon the path, and
which had before been shown him, he thrust his nose
F 3
gently down upon it, while taking from his head the
muzzle, without which he must have been a dangerous
neighbour to the Indians, for whose pursuit he had
been originally trained by the Spaniards, in a system,
the policy of which was still in part continued, or
rather, of late, revived, by his present owner.
Now, goneDugdale, be off, da's a good dog, and
look for your mossa. Dis he trackharkhark
hark, dogdis de track ob he critter. Nose 'em, old
boynose 'em well. Make yourself good nigger, for
you hab blessed mossa. Soon you go, now, better for
bote. Hark 'em, boy, hark 'em, and hole 'em fast.
The animal seemed to comprehendlooked
intelligently
up into the face of his keeper, then stooping
down, carefully drew a long breath, as he scented the
designated spot, coursed a few steps quickly around it,
and then, as if perfectly assured, sent forth a long deep
bay, and set off on the direct route with all the
fleetness
of a deer.
Da, good dog dat, dat same Dugdale. But he hab
reasonHector no gib 'em meat for noting. Spaniard
no teach 'em better, and de Lord hab mercy 'pon dem
Ingin, eff he once stick he teet in he troat. He
better bin in de fire, for he nebber leff off, long as he
kin kick. Harkda good dog, dat same Dugdale.
Wonder way mossa pick up da name for 'em; speck
he Spanishin English, he bin Dogdale.
Thus soliloquizing after his own fashion, the negro
turned his eyes in the direction of the strange vessel,
lying about a mile and a half above the bank upon
which he stood, and now gracefully outlined by the
soft light of the moon. She floated there, in the
bosom of the stream, still and silent as a sheeted
spectre, and to all appearance with quite as little life.
Built after the finest models of her time, and with a
distinct regard to the irregular pursuits in which she
was engaged, her appearance carried to the mind an
idea of lightness and swiftness which was not at
variance with her character. The fairy-like tracery
of her slender masts, her spars, and cordage,
harmonized
well with the quiet water upon which she rested
like some native bird, and with the soft and luxuriant
foliage covering the scenery around, just then coming
out from shadow into the gathering moonbeams.
While the black looked, his eye was caught by
a stir upon the bank directly opposite, and at length,
shooting out from the shelter of cane and rush which
thickly fringed a small lagune in that direction, he
distinctly
saw eight or ten large double canoes making
for the side of the river upon which he stood. They
seemed filled with men, and their paddles were moved
with a velocity only surpassed by the silence which
accompanied their use. The mischief was now
sufficiently
apparent, even to a mind so obtuse as that of the
negro; and without risking any thing by personal
delay, but now doubly aroused in anxiety for his
master
,
whose predictions he saw were about to be
verified, he took his way back to the Block House,
with a degree of hurry proportioned to what he felt
was the urgency of the necessity. It did not take
him long to reach the Block House, into which he soon
found entrance, and gave the alarm. Proceeding to
the quarter in which the wife of Granger kept her
abode, he demanded from her a knifeall the weapon
he wantedwhile informing her, as he had already
done those having charge of the fortress, of the
approaching
enemy.
What do you want with the knife, Hector?
I want 'em, missesda's allI guine after mossa.
What! the captain?why, where is he, Hector?
Speck he in berry much trouble. I must go see
arter 'em. Dugdale gone 'readyDugdale no better
sarbant dan Hector. Gib me de knife, missesdat
same long one I hab for cut he meat.
But, Hector, you can be of very little good if the
Indians are out. You don't know where to look for
the captain, and you'll tread on them as you go through
the bush.
I can't help it, missesI must go. I hab hand
and footI hab knifeI hab eye for seeI hab toot
for biteI 'trong, misses, and I must go look for
mossa. God! misses, if any ting happen to mossa,
wha Hector for do? where he guinewho be he new
mossa? I must go, missesgib me de knife.
Well, Hector, if you will go, here's what you want.
Here's the knife, and here's your master's gun. You
must take that too, said the woman.
NoI tank you for noting, misses. I no want
gun; I fraid ob 'em; he kin shoot all sides. I no like
'em. Gib me knife. I use to knifeI kin scalp dem
Injin wid knife after he own fashion. But I no use to
gun.
Well, but your master is used to it. You must
carry it for him. He has no arms, and this may save
his life. Hold it so, and there's no danger.
She showed the timid Hector how to carry the
loaded weapon so as to avoid risk to himself, and
persuaded
of its importance to his master, he ventured to
take it.
Well, dat 'noughI no want any more. I gone,
misses, I gonebut 'memberef mossa come back
and Hector loss'member, I say, I no runway
'member
dat. I scalpI drownI deadebbery ting
happen
to mebut I no runway.
With these last words, the faithful black started
upon his adventure of danger, resolute and strong, in
the warm affection which he bore his master, to
contend
with every form of difficulty. He left the
garrison
at the Block House duly aroused to the conflict,
which they were now satisfied was not far off.
CHAPTER XVII.
Oh! wherefore strike the beautiful, the young,
So innocent, unharming? Lift the knife,
If need be, 'gainst the warrior; but forbear
The trembling woman.
Let
us now return to the chamber of Bess Matthews.
She slept not soundly, but unconsciously, and heard
not the distant but approaching crySangarrah-me
Sangarrah-me! The war had begun; and in the
spirit and with the words of Yemassee battle, the thirst
for blood was universal among their warriors. From
the war-dance, blessed by the prophet, stimulated by
his exhortations, and warmed by the blood of their
human sacrifice, they had started upon the war-path in
every direction. The larger division, led on by Sanutee
and the prophet, took their course directly for
Charlestown
,
while Ishiagaska, heading a smaller party,
proceeded
to the frontier settlements upon the
Pocota-ligo
,
intending massacre along the whole line of the
white borders, including the now flourishing town
of Beaufort. From house to house, with the stealth
of a cat, he led his band to indiscriminate slaughter,
and diverging with this object from one settlement to
another, he continued to reach every dwelling-place of
the whites known to him in that neighbourhood. But
in many he had been foiled. The providential
arrangement
of Harrison, wherever, in the brief time
allowed him, he had found it possible, had rendered
their design in great part innocuous throughout that
section, and duly angered with his disappointment, it
was not long before he came to the little cottage of the
pastor. The lights had been all extinguished, and,
save on the eastern side, the dwelling lay in the
deepest
shadow. The quiet of the whole scene formed
12
an admirable contrast to the horrors gathering in
perspective
,
and about to destroy its sacred and sweet
repose for ever.
With the wonted caution of the Indian, Ishiagaska
led on his band in silence. No sound was permitted
to go before the assault. The war-whoop, with which
they anticipate or accompany the stroke of battle, was
not suffered in the present instance to prepare with a
salutary terror the minds of their destined victims.
Massacre, not battle, was the purpose, and the secret
stratagem of the marauder usurped the fierce habit of
the avowed warrior. Passing from cover to cover, the
wily savage at length approached the cottage with his
party. He stationed them around it, concealed each
under his tree. He alone advanced to the dwelling
with the stealth of a panther. Avoiding the clear
path of the moon, he availed himself, now of one and
now of another shelterthe bush, the treewhatever
might afford a concealing shadow in his approach;
and where this was wanting, throwing himself flat
upon the ground, he crawled on like a serpentnow
lying snug and immoveable, now taking a new start
and hurrying in his progress, and at last placing
himself
successfully alongside of the little white paling
which fenced in the cottage, and ran at a little
distance
around it. He parted the thong which secured
the wicket with his knife, ascended the little avenue,
and then, giving ear to every quarter of the dwelling,
and finding all still, proceeded on tiptoe to try the
fastenings of every window. The door he felt was
secureso was each window in the body of the house
which he at length encompassed, noting every aperture
in it. At length he came to the chamber where Bess
Matthews slept,a chamber forming one half of the
little shed, or addition to the main dwellingthe other
half being occupied for the same purpose by her
parents. He placed his hand gently upon the shutter,
and with savage joy he felt it yield beneath his touch.
The moment Ishiagaska made this discovery, he
silently retreated to a little distance from the dwelling,
and with a signal which had been agreed uponthe
single and melancholy note of the whip-poor-will, he
gave notice to his band for their approach. Imitating
his previous caution, they came forward individually
to the cottage, and gathering around him, under the
shadow of a neighbouring tree, they duly arranged the
method of surprise.
This done, under the guidance of Ishiagaska, they
again approached the dwelling, and a party having
been stationed at the door in silence, another party
with their leader returned to the window which was
accessible. Lifted quietly upon the shoulders of two
of them, Ishiagaska was at once upon a level with it.
He had already drawn it aside, and by the light of the
moon which streamed into the little apartment, he was
enabled with a single glance to take in its contents.
The half-slumbering girl felt conscious of a sudden
press of aira rustling sound, and perhaps a
darkening
shadow; but the obtrusion was not sufficient to
alarm into action, faculties which had been so very
much unbraced and overborne by previous exertion,
under the exciting thoughts which had so stimulated,
and afterward so frustrated them. She lay motionless,
and the wily savage descended to the floor with all the
velvet-footed stealthiness of design, surveying silently
all the while the reclining and beautiful outline of his
victim's person. And she was beautifulthe ancient
worship might well have chosen such an offering in
sacrifice to his choice demon. Never did her beauty
show forth more exquisitely than now, when murder
stood nigh, ready to blast it for ever, hurrying the sacred
fire of life from the altar of that heart which had
maintained itself so well worthy of the heaven from
whence it came. Ishiagaska looked on, but with no
feeling inconsistent with the previous aim which had
brought him there. The dress had fallen low from
her neck, and in the meek, spiritual light of the moon,
the soft, wavelike heave of the scarce living principle
within her bosom was like that of some blessed thing
susceptible of death, yet at the same time strong in
the possession of the most exquisite developments
of life. Her long tresses hung about her neck,
relieving
,
but not concealing, its snowy whiteness. One arm
fell over the side of the couch, nerveless, but soft
and snowy as the frostwreath lifted by the capricious
wind. The other lay pressed upon her bosom above
her heart, as if restraining those trying apprehensions
which had formed so large a portion of her prayers
upon retiring. It was a picture for any eye but that
of the savagea picture softening any mood but that
of the habitual murderer. It worked no change in the
ferocious soul of Ishiagaska. He looked, but without
emotion. Nor did he longer hesitate. Assisting
another of the Indians into the apartment, who passed
at once through it into the hall adjoining, the door of
which he was to unbar for the rest, Ishiagaska now
approached the couch, and drawing his knife from the
sheath, the broad blade was uplifted, shining bright
in the moonbeams, and the inflexible point bore down
upon that sweet, white round, in which all was
loveliness
,
and where was all of lifethe fair bosom, the
pure heart, where the sacred principles of purity
and of vitality had at once their abiding place. With
one hand he lifted aside the long white finger that lay
upon it, and in the next instant the blow was given;
but the pressure of his grasp, and at the same moment
the dazzling light of the moon, directed from the blade
under her very lids, brought instant consciousness to
the maiden. It was an instinct that made her grasp
the uplifted arm with a strength of despairing nature,
not certainly her own. She started with a shriek, and
the change of position accompanying her movement,
and the unlooked-for direction and restraint given to
his arm, when, in that nervous grasp, she seized it,
partially
diverted the down-descending weapon of death.
It grazed slightly aside, inflicting a wound of which
at that moment she was perfectly unconscious. Again
she cried out with a convulsive scream, as she saw
him transfer the knife from the one to the other hand.
For a few seconds her struggles were all-powerful, and
kept back for that period of time the fate which had
been so certain. But what could the frail spirit, the
soft hand, the unexercised muscles avail or achieve,
against such an enemy and in such a contest. With
another scream, as of one in a last agony,
consciousness
went from her in the conviction of the perfect
fruitlessness of the contest. With a single
apostrophe
God be mercifulfatherGabriel, save me
Gabriel
Ah!
God, Godhe cannot her eye closed,
and she lay supine under the knife of the savage.
But the first scream which she uttered had reached
the ears of her father, who had been more sleepless
than herself. The scream of his child had been
sufficient
to give renewed activity and life to the limbs of
the aged pastor. Starting from his couch, and seizing
upon a massive club which stood in the corner of his
chamber, he rushed desperately into the apartment of
Bess, and happily in time. Her own resistance had
been sufficient to give pause for this new succour, and
it ceased just when the old man, now made conscious
of the danger, cried aloud in the spirit of his faith,
while striking a blow which, effectually diverting
Ishiagaska from the maiden, compelled him to defend
himself.
Strike with me, Father of Mercies, cried the old
Puritanstrike with thy servantthou who struck
with David and with Gideon, and who swept thy waters
against Pharaohstrike with the arm of thy poor
instrument
.
Make the savage to bite the dust, while I
strikeI slay in thy name, Oh! thou avengereven
in the name of the Great Jehovah.
And calling aloud in some such apostrophe upon the
name of the Deity at every effort which he made with
his club, the old pastor gained a temporary advantage
over the savage, who, retreating from his first furious
assault to the opposite side of the couch, enabled him
to place himself alongside of his child. Without
giving himself a moment even to her restoration, with
a paroxysm that really seemed from heaven, he
advanced
upon his enemythe club swinging over his
head with an exhibition of strength that was
remarkable
in so old a man. Ishiagaska pressed thus,
unwilling
with his knife to venture within its reach, had
recourse to his tomahawk, which hurriedly he threw
at the head of his approaching assailant. But the aim
was widethe deadly weapon flew into the opposite
wall, and the blow of the club rung upon the head of
the Indian with sufficient effect, first to stagger, and
then to bring him down. This done, the old man
rushed to the window, where two other savages were
labouring to elevate a third to the entrance, and with
another sweep of his mace he defeated their design,
by crushing down the elevated person whose head
and hands were just above the sill of the window.
In their confusion, drawing to the shutter, he securely
bolted it, and then turned with all the aroused
affections
of a father to the restoration of his child.
Meanwhile, the Indian who had undertaken to
unclose
the main entrance for his companions, ignorant
of the sleeping negro before it, stumbled over him.
July, who, like most negroes suddenly awaking, was
stupid and confused, rose however with a sort of
instinct
,
and rubbing his eyes with the fingers of one
hand, he stretched out the other to the bar, and
without
being at all conscious of what he was doing,
lifted it from its socket. He was soon brought to a
sense of his error, as a troop of half naked savages
rushed through the opening, pushing him aside with a
degree of violence which soon taught him his danger.
He knew now that they were enemies; and with the
uplifted bar still in his hand, he felled the foremost of
those around himwho happened to be the fellow who
first stumbled over himand rushed bravely enough
among the rest. But the weapon he made use of
was an unwieldy one, and not at all calculated for such
a contest. He was soon taught to discover this, fatally,
when it swung uselessly around, was put aside by
one of the more wily savages, who, adroitly closing in
with the courageous negro, soon brought him to the
ground. In falling, however, he contrived to grapple
with his more powerful enemy, and down in a close
embrace they went together. But the hatchet was in
the hand of the Indian, and a moment after his fall it
crushed into the scull of the negro. Another and
another blow followed, and soon ended the struggle.
While the pulse was still quivering in his heart, and
ere his eyes had yet closed in the swimming
convulsions
of death, the negro felt the sharp blade of the
knife sweeping around his head. The conqueror was
about to complete his triumph by taking off the scalp of
his victim, as ye peel the fig when the fruit is fresh,
when a light, borne by the half dressed lady of the
pastor, appeared at the door of her chamber, giving
life to the scene of blood and terror going on in the
hall. At the same moment, followed by his daughter,
who vainly entreated him to remain in the chamber,
the pastor rushed headlong forward, wielding the club,
so successful already against one set of enemies, in
contest with another.
Go not, fathergo not, she cried earnestly, now
fully restored to the acutest consciousness, and
clinging
to him passionately all the while.
Go not, John, I pray you implored the old lady,
endeavouring to arrest him. But his impulse, under
all circumstances, was the wisest policy. He could
not hope for safety by hugging his chamber, and a bold
struggle to the lasta fearless heart, ready hand, and
teeth clinched with a fixed purposeare true reason
when dealing with the avowed enemy. A furious
inspiration
seemed to fill his heart as he went forward,
crying aloud
I fear not. The buckler of Jehovah is over his
servant. I go under the bannerI fight in the service
of God. Keep me not back, womanhas he not said
shall I misbelievehe will protect his servant. He
will strike with the shepherd, and the wolf shall be
smitten from the fold. Avoid thee, savage, avoid thee
unloose thee from thy prey. The sword of the
Lord and of Gideon!
Thus saying, he rushed like one inspired upon the
savage whose knife had already swept around the head
of the negro. The scalping of July's head was a more
difficult matter than the Indian had dreamed of, fighting
in the dark. It was only when he laid hands upon it
that he found the difficulty of taking a secure hold.
There was no war-tuft to seize upon, and the wool had
been recently abridged by the judicious scissors. He
had, accordingly, literally, to peel away the scalp by
the flesh itself. The pastor interposed just after he
had begun the operation.
Avoid thee, thou bloody Philistinegive up thy
prey. The vengeance of the God of David is upon
thee. In his name I strike, I slay.
As he shouted he struck a headlong, a heavy blow,
which, could it have taken effect, would most probably
have been fatal. But the pastor knew nothing of the
arts of war, and though on his knees over the negro,
and almost under the feet of his new assailant, the
Indian was too cunning of fence, too well practised in
strategy, to be overcome in this simple manner. With
a single jerk which completed his labour, he tore the
reeking scalp from the head of the negro, and dropping
his own at the same instant on a level with the floor,
the stroke of the pastor went clean over it; and the
assailant himself, borne forward incontinently by the
ill-advised effort, was hurried stunningly against the
wall of the apartment, and in the thick of his enemies.
In a moment they had him downthe club wrested
from his hands, and exhaustion necessarily following
such prodigious and unaccustomed efforts in so old a
man, he now lay without effort under the knives of his
captors.
With the condition of her father, all fear, all stupor,
passed away instantly from the mind of Bess Matthews.
She rushed forwardshe threw herself between them
and their victim, and entreated their knives to her heart
rather than to his. Clasping the legs of the warrior
immediately bestriding the body of the old man, with
all a woman's and a daughter's eloquence, she prayed
for pity. But she spoke to unwilling ears, and to
senses that, scorning any such appeal in their own
cases, looked upon them with sovereign contempt when
made by others. She saw this in the grim smile with
which he heard her apostrophes. His white teeth,
peering out between the dusky lips which enclosed
them, looked to her fears like those of the hungry tiger
gnashing with delight at the banquet of blood at last
spread before it. While yet she spoke, his hand tore
away from her hair a long and glittering ornament
which had confined itanother tore from her neck the
clustering necklace which could not adorn it; and the
vain fancies of the savage immediately appropriated
them as decorations for his own personher own
head-ornament being stuck most fantastically in the
long, single tuft of hairthe war-tuft, and all that is
left at that periodof him who had seized it. She
saw how much pleasure the bauble imparted, and a
new suggestion of her thought gave her a momentary
hope.
Spare himspare his life, and thou shalt have
morethou shalt have beads, and rings. Looklook,
and the jewelled ring from her finger, and another,
a sacred pledge from Harrison, were given into his
grasp. He seized them with avidity.
Goodgoodmore! cried the ferocious but
frivolous
savage, in the few words of broken English which
he imperfectly uttered in reply to hers, which he well
understood, for such had been the degree of intimacy
existing between the Yemassees and the settlers, that
but few of the former were entirely ignorant of some
portions of the language of the latter. So far,
something
had been gained in pleasing her enemy. She
rushed to the chamber, and hurried forth with a little
casket, containing a locket, and sundry other trifles
commonly found in a lady's cabinet. Her mother, in
the meanwhile, having arranged her dress, hurriedly
came forth also, provided, in like manner, with all such
jewels as seemed most calculated to win the mercy
which they sought. They gave all into his hands,
and, possibly, had he been alone, these concessions
would have saved them,their lives at least,for
these, now the spoils of the individual savage to whom
they were given, had they been found in the sack of
the house, must have been common stock with all of
them. But the rest of the band were not disposed for
mercy when they beheld such an appropriation of their
plunder, and while they were pleading with the savage
for the life of the pastor, Ishiagaska, recovered from
the blow which had stunned him, entering the
apartment
,
immediately changed the prospects of all the
party. He was inflamed to double ferocity by the
stout defence which had been offered where he had
been taught to anticipate so little; and with a fierce
cry, seizing Bess by the long hair which, from the loss
of her comb, now streamed over her shoulders, he waved
the tomahawk in air, bidding his men follow his
example
and do execution upon the rest. Another savage,
with the word, seized upon the old lady. These sights
re-aroused the pastor. With a desperate effort he
threw the knee of his enemy from his breast, and was
about to rise, when the stroke of a stick from one of
the captors descended stunningly, but not fatally, and
sent him once more to the ground.
Fatherfather!God of mercylook, mother!
they have slain himthey have slain my father! and
she wildly struggled with her captor, but without avail.
There was but a moment now, and she saw the hatchet
descending. That moment was for prayer, but the
terror was too great; for as she beheld the whirling arm
and the wave of the glittering steel, she closed her
eyes, and insensibility came to her relief, while she
sunk down under the feet of the savagea simultaneous
movement of the Indians placing both of her parents
at the same moment in anticipation of the same awful
destiny.
CHAPTER XVIII.
Captives, at midnight, whither lead you them,
Heedless of tears and pity, all unmoved
At their poor hearts' distress? Yet, spare their lives.
The
blow was stayedthe death, deemed inevitable,
was avertedthe captives lived. The descending arm
was arrestedthe weapon thrown aside, and a voice
of authority, at the most interesting juncture in the lives
of the prisoners, interposed for their safety. The new
comer was Chorley, the captain of the pirate, heading
his troop of marines, and a small additional force of
Indians. He was quite as much rejoiced as the
captives
,
that he came in time for their relief. It was not
here his policy to appear the man of blood, or to destroy,
though mercilessly destructive wherever he appeared
before. There were in the present instance many
reasons
to restrain him. The feeling of auld lang syne
alone might have had its effect upon his mood; and,
though not sufficiently potent, perhaps, for purposes of
pity in a bosom otherwise so pitiless, yet,
strengthened
by a passion for the person of Bess Matthews, it
availed happily to save the little family of the pastor.
Their safety, indeed, had been his object, and he had
hurried towards their dwelling with the first signal of
war, as he well knew the dangers to which they would
be exposed, should he not arrive in season, from the
indiscriminate fury of the savages. But the circuitous
route which he had been compelled to take, together
with the difficulties of the forest to sailors, to whom a
march through the tangled woods was something
unusual
,
left him considerably behind the party led on by
Ishiagaska. Arriving in time to save, however,
Chorley
was not displeased that he had been delayed so
long. There was a merit in his appearance at a
moment
so perilous, which promised him advantages he
had not contemplated before. He could now urge a
claim to the gratitude of the maiden, for her own and
the safety of her parents, upon which he built strongly
in his desire to secure her person, if not her heart. This,
at least, under all circumstances, he had certainly
determined
upon.
He came at the last moment, but he came in time.
He was well fitted for such a time, for he was bold and
decisive. With a muscle of iron he grasped the arm
of the savage, and thrust him back from his more
delicate
victim, while, with a voice of thunder, sustained
admirably by the close proximity of the muskets borne
by the marines, he commanded the savages to yield
their prisoners. A spear-thrust from one of his men
enforced the command, which was otherwise
disregarded
in the case of the Indian bestriding Mr.
Matthews
,
and the old pastor stood once more erect. But
Ishiagaska, the first surprise being over, was not so
disposed to yield his captives.
Will the white brother take the scalps from
Ishiagaska
?
Where was the white brother when Ishiagaska
was here? He was on the blind path in the woods
I heard him cry like the lost child for the scouts of
Ishiagaska. It was Ishiagaska who crept into the
wigwam of the white prophetlook! The white
prophet can strikethe mark of his club is on the
head of a great chiefbut not to slay. Ishiagaska has
won the Englishthey are the slaves of the Yemassee
he can take their scalpshe can drink their blood
he can tear out their hearts!
I'll be damned if he does, though, while I am here.
Fear not, Matthews, old boyand you, my beauty
birdhave no fear. You are all safehe takes my
life before he puts hands on you, by Santiago, as the
Spaniards swear. Hark ye, Ishiagaskado you
understand
what I say?
The Yemassee has ears for his brotherlet him
speak, replied the chief, sullenly.
That means that you understand me, I suppose
though it doesn't say so exactly. Well, thenlisten.
I'll take care of these prisoners, and account for them
to the Governor of Saint Augustine.
The white prophet and the women are for
Ishiagaska
.
Let our brother take his own scalps.
Ishiagaska
strikes not for the Spaniardhe is a warrior of
Yemassee.
Well, then, I will account to your people for them,
but they are my prisoners now.
Is not Ishiagaska a chief of the Yemasseesshall
the stranger speak for him to his people? Our white
brother is like a cunning bird that is lazy. He looks
out from the tree all day, and when the other bird
catches the green fly, he steals it out of his teeth.
Ishiagaska catches no fly for the teeth of the
stranger
.
Well, as you please; but, by God, you may give
them up civilly or not! They are mine now, and you
may better yourself as you can.
The brow of the Indian, stormy enough before, put
on new terrors, and without a word he rushed fiercely
at the throat of the sailor, driving forward one hand for
that purpose, while the other aimed a blow at his head
with his hatchet. But the sailor was sufficiently
familiar with Indian warfare, not less than war of most
other kinds, and seemed to have anticipated some
such assault. His readiness in defence was fully
equal to the suddenness of the assault. He adroitly
evaded the direct attack, bore back the erring weapon
with a stroke that sent it wide from the owner's hand,
and grasping him by the throat, waved him to and fro
as an infant in the grasp of a giant. The followers of
the chief, not discouraged by this evidence of
superiority
,
or by the greater number of seamen with their
white ally, rushed forward to his rescue, and the
probability
is that the affair would have been one of mixed
massacre but for the coolness of Chorley.
Meneach his man! short work, as I order.
Drop muskets, and close handsomely.
The order was obeyed with promptitude, and the
Vol. II.G
Indians were belted in, as by a hoop of iron, without
room to lift a hatchet or brandish a knife, while each
of the whites had singled out an enemy, at whose
breast a pistol was presented. The sailor captain in
the meanwhile appropriated Ishiagaska to himself,
and closely encircled him with one powerful arm,
while the muzzle of his pistol rested upon the Indian's
head. But the affair was suffered to proceed no
further
,
in this way, by him who had now the chief
management
.
The Indians were awed, and though they
still held out a sullen attitude of defiance, Chorley,
whose desire was that control of the savages
without
which he could hope to do nothing, was satisfied
of the adequacy of what he had done towards his
object
.
Releasing his own captive, therefore, with a
stentorian laugh, he addressed Ishiagaska:
That's the way, chief, to deal with the enemy.
But we are no enemies of yours, and have had fun
enough.
It is fun for our white brother, was the stern and
dry response.
Ay, what elsedevilish good fun, I saythough,
to be sure, you did not seem to think so. But I
suppose
I am to have the prisoners.
If our brother asks with his tongue, we say no
if he asks with his teeth, we say yes.
Well, I care not, damn my splinters, Ishy
whether you answer to tongue or teeth, so that you
answer as I want you. I'm glad now that you speak
what is reasonable.
Will our brother take the white prophet and the
women, and give nothing to the Yemassee? The
English buy from the Yemassee, and the Yemassee
gets when he gives.
Ay, I seeyou have learned to trade, and know
how to drive a bargain. But you forget, chief, you
have had all in the house.
Goodand the prisonersthey are scalps for
Ishiagaska. But our brother would have them for
himself, and will give his small gun for them.
The offer to exchange the captives for the pistol in
his hand, caused a momentary hesitation in the mind
of the pirate. He saw the lurking malignity in the
eye of the savage, and gazed fixedly upon him, then,
suddenly seeming to determine, he exclaimed,
Well, it's a bargain. The captives are mine, and
here's the pistol.
Scarcely had the weapon been placed in the hands
of the wily savage, than he hastily thrust it at the head
of the pirate, and crying aloud to his followers, who
echoed it lustily Sangarrah-meYemassee, he
drew the trigger. A loud laugh from Chorley was all
the response that followed. He had seen enough of
the Indian character to have anticipated the result of
the exchange just made, and gave him a pistol
therefore
which had a little before been discharged. The
innocuous effort upon his life, accordingly, had been
looked for; and having made it, the Indian, whose
pride of character had been deeply mortified by the
indignity to which the sport of Chorley had just
subjected
him, folded his arms patiently as if in waiting
for his death. This must have followed but for the
ready and almost convulsive laugh of the pirate; for
his seamen, provoked to fury by the attempt, would
otherwise undoubtedly have cut them all to pieces.
The ready laugh, however, so unlooked-forso
seemingly
out of placekept them still; and, as much
surprised
as the Indians, they remained as stationary too.
A slap upon the shoulder from the heavy hand of the
seaman aroused Ishiagaska with a start.
How now, my red brotherdidst thou think I
could be killed by such as thee? Go tothou art a
childa little boy. The shot can't touch methe
sword can't cutthe knife can't stickI have a charm
from the prophet of the Spaniards. I bought it and
a good wind, with a link of this blessed chain, and have
had no reason to repent my bargain. Those are the
priests, friend Matthewsnow you don't pretend to
such a trade. What good can your preaching do to
G 2
sailors or soldiers, when we can get such bargains for
so little?
The pastor, employed hitherto in sustaining the form
of his still but half conscious daughter, had been a
silent spectator of this strange scene. But he now,
finding as long as it lasted that the nerves of Bess
would continue unstrung, seized the opportunity
afforded
by this appeal, to implore that they might be
relieved of their savage company.
What, and you continue here? replied the sailor.
No, nothat's impossible. They would murder you
the moment I am gone.
What then are we to dowhere gowhere find
safety?'
You must go with mewith my party, alone, will
you be safe, and while on shore you must remain with
us. After that, my vessel will give you shelter.
Neverneverdear father, say nobetter that
we should die by the savage, was the whispered and
hurried language of Bess to her father as she heard
this suggestion. A portion of her speech, only, was
audible to the seaman.
What's that you say, my sweet bird of beauty
my bird of paradise?speak out, there is no danger.
She only speaks to me, captain, said the pastor,
unwilling that the only protector they now had should
be offended by an indiscreet remark.
Oh, father, that you had listened to Gabriel,
murmured
the maiden, as she beheld the preparations
making for their departure with the soldiers.
Reproach me not now, my childmy heart is sore
enough for that error of my spirit. It was a wicked
pride that kept me from hearing and doing justice to
that friendly youth.
The kind word in reference to her lover almost
banished all present fears from the mind of Bess
Matthews
;
and with tears that now relieved her, and
which before this she could not have shed, she buried
her head in the bosom of the old man.
We are friends again, Ishiagaska, extending his
hand while he spoke, was the address of the seaman to
the chief, as the latter took his departure from the
dwelling on his way to the Block House. The
proffered
hand was scornfully rejected.
Is Ishiagaska a dog that shall come when you
whistle, and put his tail between his legs when you
storm? The white chief has put mud on the head of
Ishiagaska.
Well, go and be dd, who cares? By God,
but for the bargain, and that the fellow may be useful,
I could send a bullet through his red skin with
appetite
.
A few words now addressed to his captives, sufficed
to instruct them as to the necessity of a present
movement
;
and a few moments put them in as great a
state of readiness for their departure as, under such
circumstances, they could be expected to make. The
sailor, in the meantime, gave due directions to his
followers
;
and picking up the pistol which the indignant
Ishiagaska had thrown away, he contented himself,
while reloading it, with another boisterous laugh at
the expense of the savage. Giving the necessary
orders to his men, he approached the group, and
tendered his assistance, especially to Bess Matthews.
But she shrunk back with an appearance of horror,
not surely justifiable, if reference is to be had only to
his agency on the present occasion. But the
instinctive
delicacy of maidenly feeling had been more than
once outraged in her bosom by the bold, licentious
glance which Chorley had so frequently cast upon her
charms; and now, heightened as they were by
circumstances
by
the dishevelled hair, and ill-adjusted
garmentsthe daring look of his eye was enough to
offend a spirit so delicately just, so sensitive, and so
susceptible as hers.
What, too much of a ladytoo proud, miss, to take
the arm of a sailor? Is it so, parson? Have you taught
so much pride to your daughter?
It is not pride, Master Chorley, you should know
but Bess has not well got over her fright, and it's but
natural that she should look to her father first for
protection
.
It's not pride, not dislike, believe me, was
the assiduous reply.
But there's no sense in that, nowfor what sort
of protection could you have afforded her if I hadn't
come? You'd ha' been all scalped to death, or there's
no snakes.
You say true, indeed, Master Chorley. Our only
hope was in God, who is above all,to him we look
he will always find a protector for the innocent.
And not much from him either, friend Matthews
for all your prayers would have done you little good
under the knife of the red-skins, if I had not come at
the very moment.
Trueand you see, captain, that God did send us
help at the last trying moment.
Why, that's more than my mother ever said for me,
parsonand more than I can ever say for myself.
What, Dick Chorley the messenger of God!Ha! ha!
ha!The old folks would say the devil rather, whose
messenger I have been from stem to stern, man and boy,
a matter nowbut it's quite too far to go back.
Do not, I pray, Master Chorley, said the old man,
gravelyand know, that Satan himself is God's
messenger
,
and must do his bidding in spite of his own
will.
The deuse you say. Old Nick, himself, God's
messenger
!
Well, that's new to me, and what the
Catechism
and old Meg never once taught me to believe.
But I won't doubt you, for as it's your trade, you ought to
know best, and we'll have no more talk on the subject.
Come, old boymy good Mrs. Matthews, and you, my
sweetall ready? Fall in, boysbe moving.
Where go we now, Master Chorley? inquired
the pastor.
With me, friend Matthews, was the simple and
rather stern reply of the pirate, who arranged his
troop around the little party, and gave orders to move.
He would have taken his place alongside of the
maiden
,
but she studiously passed to the opposite arm of
her father, so as to throw the pastor's person between
them. In this manner the party moved on, in the
direction
of the Block House, which the cupidity of
Chorley
hoped to find unguarded, and to which he hurried,
with as much rapidity as possible, in order to be
present at the sack. He felt that it must be full of the
valuables of all those who had sought its shelter, and
with this desire he did not scruple to compel the
captives
to keep pace with his party, as it was necessary,
before proceeding to the assault, that he should place
them in a condition of comparative safety. A small
cot lay on the banks of the river, a few miles from his
vessel, and in sight of it. It was a rude frame of
poles, covered with pine bark; such as the Indian
hunters leave behind them all over the country. To
this spot he hurried, and there, under the charge of
three marines, well armed, he left the jaded family
dreading every change of condition as full of death,
if not of other terrors even worse than deathand
with scarcely a smaller apprehension of that condition
itself. Having so done, he went onward to the work
of destruction, where we shall again come up with
him.
CHAPTER XIX.
Is all preparedall readyfor they come,
I hear them in that strange cry through the wood.
The
inmates of the Block House, as we remember,
had been warned by Hector of the probable approach
of danger, and preparation was the word in
consequence
.
But what was the preparation meant? Under
no distinct command, every one had his own favourite
idea of defence, and all was confusion in their
councils
.
The absence of Harrison, to whose direction all
parties would most willingly have turned their ears,
was now of the most injurious tendency, as it left
them unprovided with any head, and just at the moment
when a high degree of excitement prevailed against
the choice of any substitute. Great bustle and little
execution took the place of good order, calm opinion,
deliberate and decided action. The men were ready
enough to fight, and this readiness was an evil of itself,
circumstanced as they were. To fight would have
been madness thento protract the issue and gain
time was the object; and few among the defenders of
the fortress at that moment were sufficiently collected
to see this truth. In reason, there was really but
a single spirit in the Block House, sufficiently
deliberate
for the occasionthat spirit was a woman'sthe
wife of Granger. She had been the child of poverty
and privationthe severe school of that best tutor,
necessity, had made her equable and intrepid. She
had looked suffering so long in the face, that she now
regarded it without a tear. Her parents had never
been known to her, and the most trying difficulties
clung to her from infancy up to womanhood. So
exercised
,
her mind grew strong in proportion to its trials,
and she had learned, in the end, to regard them with a
degree of fearlessness far beyond the capacities of
any well-bred heir of prosperity and favouring fortune.
The same trials attended her after marriagesince the
pursuits of her husband carried her into dangers, to
which even he could oppose far less ability than
his wife. Her genius soared infinitely beyond his
own, and to her teachings was he indebted for many of
those successes which brought him wealth in after
years. She counselled his enterprises, prompted or
persuaded his proceedings, managed for him wisely
and economically; in all respects proved herself
unselfish
;
and if she did not at any time appear above
the way of life they had adopted, she took care to
maintain both of them from falling beneath ita
result
too often following the exclusive pursuit of gain.
Her experience throughout life, hitherto, served her
admirably now, when all was confusion among the
councils of the men. She descended to the court
below, where they made a show of deliberation, and,
in her own manner, with a just knowledge of human
nature, proceeded to give her aid in their general
progress
.
Knowing that any direct suggestion from a
woman, and under circumstances of strife and trial,
would necessarily offend the
amour propre
of the nobler
animal, and provoke his derision, she pursued a sort of
management which an experienced woman is usually
found to employ as a kind of familiara wily little
demon, that goes unseen at her bidding, and does her
business, like another Ariel, the world all the while
knowing nothing about it. Calling out from the crowd
one of those whom she knew to be not only the most
collected, but the one least annoyed by any
unnecessary
self-esteem, she was in a moment joined by
Grayson, and leading him aside, she proceeded to
suggest various measures of preparation and defence,
certainly the most prudent that had yet been made.
This she did with so much unobtrusive modesty, that
the worthy woodman took it for granted, all the while,
that the ideas were properly his own. She concluded
with insisting upon his taking the command.
But Nichols will have it all to himself. That's
one of our difficulties now.
What of that? You may easily manage him,
Master Grayson.
How? he asked.
The greater number of the men here are of the
`Green Jackets?'
Yes
And you are their lieutenantnext in command to
Captain Harrison, and their first officer in his
absence?
That's true
Command them as your troop exclusively, and
don't mind the rest.
But they will be offended.
And if they are, Master Grayson, is this a time to
G 3
heed their folly when the enemy's upon us? Let
them. You do with your troop without heed to them,
and they will fall into your ranksthey will work
with you when the time comes.
You are right, was the reply; and immediately
going forward with a voice of authority, Grayson,
calling
only the Green Jackets around him, proceeded to
organize them, and put himself in command, as first
lieutenant of the only volunteer corps which the parish
knew. The corps received the annunciation with a
shout, and the majority readily recognised him.
Nichols alone grumbled a little, but the minority was
too small to offer any obstruction to Grayson's
authority
,
so that he soon submitted with the rest. The
command, all circumstances considered, was not
improperly
given. Grayson, though not overwise, was
decisive, and in matters of strife, wisdom itself must
be subservient to resolution. Resolution in war is
wisdom. The new commander numbered his force,
placed the feeble and the young in the least trying
situationsassigned different bodies to different
stations
,
and sent the women and children into the upper
and most sheltered apartment. In a few moments,
things were arranged for the approaching conflict with
tolerable precision.
The force thus commanded by Grayson was small
enoughthe whole number of men in the Block
House not exceeding twenty-five. The women and
children within its shelter were probably twice that
number. The population had been assembled in great
part from the entire extent of country lying between
the Block House and the Indian settlements. From
the Block House downward to Port Royal Island, there
had been no gathering to this point; the settlers in
that section, necessarily, in the event of a like
difficulty
,
seeking a retreat to the fort on the island, which
had its garrison already, and was more secure, and
in another respect much more safe, as it lay more
contiguous to the sea. The greater portion of the
country immediately endangered from the Yemassees
had been duly warned, and none but the slow, the
indifferent
,
and the obstinate, but had taken sufficient
heed of the many warnings given them, as to have put
themselves in safety. Numbers, however, coming
under one or other of these classes, had fallen victims
to their folly or temerity in the sudden onslaught
which followed the first movement of the savages
sent among them, who, scattering themselves over the
country, had made their attack so nearly at the same
time, as to defeat any thing like unity of action in the
resistance which might be offered them.
Grayson's first care in his new command was to get
the women and children fairly out of the way. The
close upper apartment of the Block House had been
especially assigned them; and there they had
assembled
generally. But some few of the old ladies were
not to be shut up; and his own good Puritan mother
gave the busy commandant no little trouble. She
went to and fro, interfering in this, preventing that,
and altogether annoying the men to such a degree,
that it became absolutely necessary to put on a show
of sternness which it was the desire of all parties to
avoid. With some difficulty and the assistance of
Granger's wife, he at length got her out of the way,
and to the great satisfaction of all parties, she worried
herself to sleep in the midst of a Psalm, which she
croned over to the dreariest tune in her whole
collection
.
Sleep had also fortunately seized upon the
children generally, and but few, in the room assigned to
the women, were able to withstand the approaches of
that subtle magician. The wife of the trader, almost
alone, continued watchful; thoughtful in emergency,
and with a ready degree of common sense, to contend
with trial, and to prepare against it. The confused
cluster of sleeping forms, in all positions, and of all
sorts and sizes, that hour, in the apartment so
occupied
,
was grotesque enough. One figure alone, sitting
in the midst, and musing with a concentrated mind,
gave dignity to the ludicrous groupingthe majestic
figure of Mary Grangerher dark eye fixed upon the
silent and sleeping collection, in doubt and pityher
black hair bound closely upon her head, and her broad
forehead seeming to enlarge and grow with the busy
thought at work within it. Her hand, toostrange
association
rested
upon a hatchet.
Having completed his arrangements with respect to
the security of the women and children, and put them
fairly out of his way, Grayson proceeded to call a sort
of council of war for further deliberation; and having
put sentinels along the picket, and at different points
of the building, the more sage, grave men of the
garrison
proceeded to their further arrangements. These
were four in numberone of them was Dick
Grimstead
,
the blacksmith, who, in addition to a little
farming
,
carried on when the humour took him, did the
horse-shoeing and ironwork for his neighbours of ten
miles round, and was in no small repute among them.
He was something of a woodman too; and hunting,
and perhaps drinking, occupied no small portion of the
time which might, with more profit to himself, have
been given to his farm and smithy. Nichols, the rival
leader of Grayson, was also chosen, with the view
rather to his pacification than with any hope of good
counsel to be got out of him. Granger, the trader,
made the third; and presiding somewhat as chairman,
Grayson the fourth. We may add that the wife of
the trader, who had descended to the lower apartment
in the meantime, and had contrived to busy herself in
one corner with some of the wares of her husband,
was present throughout the debate. We may add, too,
that at frequent periods of the deliberation, Granger
found it necessary to leave the consultations of the
council for that of his wife.
What are we to do? was the general question.
Let us send out a spy, and see what they are
about, was the speech of one.
Let us discharge a few pieces, to let them know
that the servants of the people watch for them, said
Nichols, who loved a noise.
No, dn 'em, said the burly blacksmith, don't
waste, after that fashion, the powder for which a buck
would say, thank you. If we are to shoot, let's put it
to the red-skins themselves. What do you say,
Master Grayson?
I say, keep quiet, and make ready.
Wouldn't a spy be of service? suggested
Granger
,
with great humility, recurring to his first
proposition
.
Will you go? was the blunt speech of the
blacksmith
.
I don't see any good a spy can do us.
To see into their force.
That won't strengthen ours. No! I hold, Wat
Grayson, to my mind. We must give the dogs powder
and shot when we see 'em. There's no other way
for here we are, and there they are. They're for fight,
and will have our scalps, if we are not for fight too.
We can't run, for there's no place to go to; and besides
that, I'm not used to running, and won't try to run
from a red-skin. He shall chaw my bullet first.
To be sure, roared Nichols, growing remarkably
valorous. Battle, say I. Victory or death.
Well, Nichols, don't waste your breath nowyou
may want it before all's over growled the smith, with
a most imperturbable composure of countenance,
if it's only to beg quarter.
I beg quarternever! cried the doctor, fiercely.
It's agreed, then, that we are to fightis that what
we are to understand? inquired Grayson, desirous to
bring the debate to a close, and to hush the little
acerbities
going on between the doctor and the smith.
Ay, to be surewhat else? said Grimstead.
What say you, Granger?
I say so too, sirif they attack ussurely.
And you, Nichols?
Ay, fight, I say. Battle to the last drop of blood
to the last moment of existence. Victory or death,
ay, that's my word.
Blast me, Nicholswhat a bellows, shouted the
smith.
Mind your own bellows, Grimsteadit will be the
14
better for you. Don't trouble yourself to meddle with
mineyou may burn your fingers, retorted the
demagogue
,
angrily.
Why, yes, if your breath holds hot long enough,
was the sneering response of the smith, who seemed
to enjoy the sport of teasing his windy comrade.
Come, come, men, no words, soothingly said the
commander. Let us look to the enemy. You are all
agreed that we are to fight; and, to say truth, we didn't
want much thinking for that; but how, is the question
how are we to do the fighting? Can we send out a
party for scoutscan we spare the men?
I think not, said the smith, soberly. It will
require
all the men we have, and some of the women
too, to keep watch at all the loop-holes. Besides, we
have not arms enough, have we?
Not muskets, but other arms in abundance. What
say you, Nicholscan we send out scouts?
Impossible! we cannot spare them, and it will
only expose them to be cut up by a superior enemy.
No, sir, it will be the nobler spectacle to perish, like
men, breast to breast. I, for one, am willing to die for
the people. I will not survive my country.
Brave man! cried the smithbut I'm not
willing to die at all, and therefore I would keep snug
and stand 'em here. I can't skulk in the bush, like
Granger; I'm quite too fat for that. Though I'm sure,
if I were such a skeleton sort of fellow as Nichols
there, I'd volunteer as a scout, and stand the Indian
arrows all day.
I won't volunteer, cried Nichols, hastily. It will
set a bad example, and my absence might be fatal.
But what if all volunteer? inquired the smith,
scornfully.
I stand or fall with the people, responded the
demagogue, proudly. At that moment, a shrill scream
of the whip-poor-will smote upon the senses of the
council.
It is the Indiansthat is a favourite cry of the
Yemassees, said the wife of Granger. The
company
started to their feet, and seized their weapons.
As they were about to descend to the lower story, the
woman seized upon the arm of Grayson, and craved his
attendance in the adjoining apartment. He followed;
and leading him to the only window in the room,
without
disturbing any around her, she pointed out a fallen
pine-tree, evidently thrown down within the night,
which barely rested upon the side of the log house,
with all its branches, and but a few feet below the
aperture through which they looked. The tree must
have been cut previously, and so contrived as to fall
gradually upon the dwelling. It was a small one, and
by resting in its descent upon other intervening trees,
its approach and contact with the dwelling had been
unheard. This had probably taken place while the
garrison had been squabbling below, with all the
women and children listening and looking on. The
apartment in which they stood, and against which the
tree now depended, had been made, for greater security,
without any loop-holes, the musketry being calculated
for use in that adjoining and below. The danger
arising from this new situation was perceptible at a
glance.
The window must be defended. Two stout men
will answer. But they must have muskets, spoke the
woman.
They shall have them, said Grayson, in reply to
the fearless and thoughtful person who spoke. I will
send Mason and your husband.
DoI will keep it till they come.
You? with some surprise, inquired Grayson.
Yes, Master Graysonis there any thing strange
in that? I have no fears. Gosend your men.
But you will close the shutter.
Nobetter, if they should comebetter it should
be open. If shut, we might be too apt to rest satisfied.
Exposure compels watchfulness, and men make the
best fortresses.
Full of his new command, and sufficiently impressed
with its importance, Grayson descended to the
arrangement
of his forces; and, true to his promise, despatched
Granger and Mason with muskets to the defence of
the window, as had been agreed upon with the wife
of the trader. They prepared to do so; but, to their
great consternation, Mason, who was a bulky man, had
scarcely reached midway up the ladder leading to
the apartment, when, snapping off in the middle, down
it came; in its destruction, breaking off all
communication
between the upper and lower stories of the house
until it could be repaired. To furnish a substitute
was a difficult task, about which several of the men
were set immediately. This accident deeply
impressed
the wife of the trader, even more than the
defenders of the house below, with the dangers of
their situation; and in much anxiety, watchful and sad,
she paced the room in which they were now virtually
confined, in momentary expectation of the enemy.
CHAPTER XX.
The deep woods saw their battle, and the night
Gave it a genial horror. Blood is there;
The path of battle is traced out in blood.
Hugh Grayson
, with all his faults, and they were
many, was in reality a noble fellow. Full of a high
ambitiona craving for the unknown and the vast,
which spread itself vaguely and perhaps unattainably
before his imaginationhis disappointments very
naturally
vexed him something beyond prudence, and
now and then beyond the restraint of a right reason.
He usually came to a knowledge of his error, and his
repentance was not less ready than his wrong. So in
the present instance. The stern severity of those
rebukes
which had fallen from the lips of Bess Matthews,
had the effect upon him which she had anticipated.
They brought out the serious determination of his
manhood, and with due effort he discarded those
feeble and querulous fancies which had been
productive
of so much annoyance to her and others, and so
much unhappiness to himself. He strove to forget the
feelings of the jealous and disappointed lover, in the
lately recollected duties of the man and citizen.
With the good steed of Harrison, which, in the
present
service, he did not scruple to employ, he set off on
the lower route, in order to beat up recruits for the
perilous strife which he now began to believe, the
more he thought of it, was in reality at hand. The
foresters were ready, for one condition of security in
border life was the willingness to volunteer in defence
of one another; and a five mile ride gave him as
many followers. But his farther progress was stopped
short by an unlooked-for circumstance. The tread of
a body of horse reached the ears of his party, and they
slunk into cover. Indistinctly, in the imperfect light,
they discovered a mounted force of twenty or thirty
men. Another survey made them out to be friends.
Who goes there? cried the leader, as Grayson
emerged from the bush.
Friendswell met. There is still time, was the
reply.
I hope soI have pushed for it, said the
commander
,
as soon as Sir Edmund gave the orders.
Ha! you were advised then of this, and come
from
Beaufort, cried the officer, with a detachment of
twenty-eight for the upper Block House. Is all well
there?
Ay, when I left, but things are thought to look
squally, and I have just been beating up volunteers for
preparation.
'Tis wellfall in, gentlemen, and good speed
but this cursed road is continually throwing me out.
Will you undertake to guide us, so that no time may
be lost?
Ayfollowwe are now seven miles from the
Block, and I am as familiar with the road, dark and
light, as with my own hands.
Away then, menawayand, led by the younger
Grayson, now fully aroused by the spirit of the scene,
they hurried away at full speed, through the narrow
trace leading to the Block House. They had ridden
something like two thirds of the distance, when a
distant
shot, then a shout, reached their ears, and
compelled
a pause for counsel, in order to avoid rushing
into ambuscade.
A mile farther, cried Graysona mile farther,
and we must hide our horses in the woods, and take
the bush on foot. Horse won't do here; we shall make
too good a mark; and besides, riding ourselves, we
should not be able to hear the approach of an enemy.
A few moments after and they descended, each
fastening his horse to a tree in the shelter of a little
bay; and, hurriedly organizing under Grayson's
direction
,
they proceeded, alive with expectation, in the
direction of the fray.
It is high time that we now return to our fugitive,
whose escape from his Indian prison has already been
recorded. Paddling his canoe with difficulty,
Harrison
drew a long breath as it struck the opposite bank
in safety. He had escaped one danger, but how
many more, equally serious, had he not reason to
anticipate
in his farther progress. He knew too well
the character of Indian warfare, and the mode of
assault
proposed by them at present, not to feel that all
the woods around him were alive with his enemies.
That they ran along in the shadow of the trees, and
lay in waiting for the steps of the flyer, alongside of
the fallen tree. He knew his danger, but he had a
soul well calculated for its trials.
He leaped to the shore, and at the very first step
which he took, a bright column of flame rose above the
forests in the direction of the Grayson's cottage. It
lay, not directly in his path, but it reminded him of his
duties, and he came to all the full decision marking
his character as he pushed forward in that quarter,
He was not long in reaching it, and the prospect realized
many of his fears. The Indians had left their traces,
and the dwelling was wrapped in flame, illuminating
with a deep glare the surrounding foliage. He looked
for other signs of their progress, but in vain. There
was no blood, no mark of struggle, and his conclusion
was, therefore, that the family had been able to effect
its escape from the dwelling before the arrival of the
enemy. This conviction was instantaneous, and he
gave no idle time in surveying a scene, only full of a
terrible warning. The thought of the whole frontier,
and more than all, to his heart, the thought of Bess
Matthews, and of the obstinate old father, drove him
onwardthe blazing ruins lighting his way some
distance
through the woods. The rush of the wind, as
he went forward, brought to his ears, at each moment
and in various quarters, the whoops of the savage,
reduced
to faintness by distance or cross currents of the
breeze, that came here and there, through dense
clusters
of foliage. Now on one side and now on the other,
they ascended to his hearing, compelling him
capriciously
to veer from point to point in the hope of
avoiding
them. He had not gone far when a second and
sudden
volume of fire rushed up on one hand above the
trees, and he could hear the crackling of the timber.
Almost at the same instant, in an opposite direction,
another burst of flame attested the mode of warfare
adopted by the cunning savages, who, breaking into
small parties of five or six in number, thus dispersed
themselves over the country, making their attacks
simultaneous
.
This was the mode of assault best adapted
to their enterprise; and, but for the precautions taken
in warning the more remote of the borderers to the
protection of the Block House, their irruption,
throughout
its whole progress, had been marked in blood.
But few of the settlers could possibly have escaped
their knives. Defrauded however of their prey, the
Indians were thus compelled to wreak their fury upon
the unoccupied dwellings.
Dreading to make new and more painful discoveries,
but with a spirit nerved for any event, Harrison kept
on his course with unrelaxing effort, till he came to
the dwelling of an old German, an honest but poor
settler, named Van Holten. The old man lay on his
threshold insensible. His face was prone to the
ground, and he was partially stripped of his clothing.
Harrison turned him over, and discovered a deep wound
upon his breast, made seemingly with a knifea
hatchet stroke appeared upon his forehead, and the
scalp was gonea red and dreadfully lacerated scull
presented itself to his sight, and marked another of
those features of war so terribly peculiar to the
American
border struggles. The man was quite dead; but
the brand thrown into his cabin had failed, and the
dwelling was unhurt by the fire. On he went, roused
into new exertion by this sight, yet doubly
apprehensive
of his discoveries in future. The cries of the
savages grew more distinct as he proceeded, and his
caution was necessarily redoubled. They now stood
between him and the white settlements, and the
probability
of coming upon his enemies was increased at
every step in his progress. Apart from this, he knew
but little of their precise positionnow they were on
one, and now on the other side of himtheir whoops
sounding with the multiplied echoes of the wood in
every direction, and inspiring a hesitating dread, at
every moment, that he should find himself suddenly
among them. The anxiety thus stimulated was more
decidedly painful than would have been the
hand-to-hand
encounter. It was so to the fearless heart of
Harrison. Still, however, he kept his way, until,
at length, emerging from the brush and foliage, a
small lake lay before him, which he knew to be
not more than three miles from the dwelling of
Bess Matthews. He immediately prepared to take
the path he had usually taken, to the left, which
carried him upon the banks of the river. At that
moment his eye caught the motion of a small body
of the savages in that very quarter. One third of
the whole circuit of the lake lay between them and
himself, and he now changed his course to the right,
in the hope to avoid them. But they had been no
less watchful than himself. They had seen, and
prepared
to intercept him. They divided for this
purpose
,
and while with shouts and fierce halloos one
party retraced their steps and came directly after him,
another, in perfect silence, advanced on their course
to the opposite quarter of the lake, in the hope to waylay
him in front. Of this arrangement Harrison was
perfectly
unaware, and upon this he did not calculate.
Having the start considerably of those who came
behind, he did not feel so deeply the risk of his
situation
;
but, fearless and swift of foot, he cheerily went
forward, hoping to fall in with some of the whites, or
at least to shelter himself in a close cover of the woods
before they could possibly come up with him. Through
brake and bush, heath and water, he went forward,
now running, now walking, as the cries behind him of
his pursuers influenced his feelings. At length the
circuit of the lake was made, and he dashed again into
the deeper forest, more secure, as he was less obvious
to the sight than when in the glare of the now high
ascending
moon. The woods thickened into copse around
him, and he began to feel something more of hope.
He could hear more distinctly the cries of war, and he
now fancied that many of the shouts that met his ears
were those of the English. In this thought he plunged
forward, and as one fierce halloo went up which he
clearly felt to be from his friends, he could not avoid
the impulse which prompted him to shout forth in
response. At that moment, bounding over a fallen tree,
he felt his course arrested. His feet were caught by
one who lay alongside of it, and he came heavily to
the ground. The Indian who had lain in ambush was
soon above him, and he had but time to ward with one
arm a blow aimed at his head, when another savage
advanced upon him. These two formed the
detachment
which had been sent forward in front, for this very
purpose, by the party in his rear. The prospect was
desperate, and feeling it so, the efforts of Harrison
were Herculean. His only weapon was the knife of
Matiwan, but he was a man of great muscular power
and exceedingly active. His faculties availed him
now. With a sudden evolution, he shook one of his
assailants from his breast, and opposed himself to the
other while recovering his feet. They drove against
him with their united force, and one hatchet grazed his
cheek. The savage who threw it was borne forward
by the blow, and received the knife of Harrison in his
side, but not sufficiently deep to disable him. They
came to it again with renewed and increased ferocity,
one assailing him from behind, while the other employed
him in front. He would have gained a tree, but they
watched and kept him too busily employed to allow of
his design. A blow from a club for a moment paralyzed
his arm, and he dropped his knife. Stooping to
recover
it they pressed him to the ground, and so
distributed
themselves upon him, that further effort was
unavailing. He saw the uplifted hand, and felt that his
senses swam with delirious thoughthis eyes were
hazy, and he muttered a confused language. At that
momentdid he dream or not!it was the deep bay of
his own favourite hound that reached his ears. The
assailants
heard it toohe felt assured of that, as, half
starting from their hold upon him, they looked anxiously
around. Another moment, and he had no farther doubt;
the cry of thirst and angerthe mixed moan and roar
of the well-known and evidently much-aroused animal,
was closely at hand. One of the Indians sprang
immediately to his feetthe other was about to strike,
when, with a last effort, he grasped the uplifted arm
and shouted Dugdale! aloud. Nor did he shout in
vain. The favourite, with a howl of delight, bounded
at the well-known voice, and in another instant
Harrison
felt the long hair and thick body pass directly
over his face, then a single deep cry rung above him,
and then he felt the struggle. He now strove, again,
to take part in the fray, though one arm hung movelessly
beside him. He partially succeeded in freeing himself
from the mass that had weighed him down; and
looking
up, saw the entire mouth and chin of the Indian
in the jaws of the ferocious hound. The savage knew
his deadliest enemy, and his struggle was, not to destroy
the dog, but, under the sudden panic, to free himself
from his hold. With this object his hatchet and knife
had been dropped. His hands were vainly
endeavouring
to loosen the huge, steely jaws of his rough
assailant from his own. The other Indian had fled with
the first bay of the animalprobably the more willing
to do so, as the momentary fainting of Harrison had
led them to suppose him beyond further opposition.
But he recovered, and with recovering consciousness
resuming the firm grasp of his knife which had fallen
beside him, seconded the efforts of Dugdale by driving
it into the breast of their remaining enemy, who fell
dead, with his chin still between the teeth of the hound.
Staggering as much with the excitement of such a
conflict
,
as with the blow he had received, Harrison with
difficulty regained his feet. Dugdale held on to his prey,
and before he would forego his hold, completely cut the
throat which he had taken in his teeth. A single
embrace
of his master attested the deep gratitude which
he felt for the good service of his favourite. But there
was no time for delay. The division which pursued
him was at hand. He heard their shout from a
neighbouring
copse, and he bent his steps forward. They
were soon apprized of the movement. Joined by the
fugitive, and having heard his detail, what was their
surprise to find their own warrior a victim, bloody and
perfectly dead upon the grass, where they had looked
to have taken a scalp! Their rage knew no bounds,
and they were now doubly earnest in pursuit. Feeble
from the late struggle, Harrison had not his previous
vigourbesides, he had run far through the woods, and
though as hardy as any of the Indians, he was not so well
calculated to endure a race of this nature. But though
they gained on him, he knew that he had a faithful ally
at hand on whom he felt he might safely depend.
The hound too, trained as was the custom, was
formidable
to the fears of the Indians. Like the elephant
of old, he inspired a degree of terror, among the
American
aborigines, which took from them courage and
conduct, in great degree; and had there been less
inequality
of force, the dog of Harrison alone would have
been sufficient to have decided his present pursuers to
choose a more guarded course, if not to a complete
discontinuance of pursuit. But they heard the shouts
of their own warriors all around them, and trusting that
flying from one, he must necessarily fall into the hands
of some other party, they were stimulated still farther
in the chase. They had not miscalculated. The wild
whoop of warthe
Sangarrah-me, Yemassee
, rose
directly in the path before him, and, wearied with flight,
the fugitive prepared himself for the worst. He leaned
against a tree in exhaustion, while the dog took his place
beside him, obedient to his master's command, though
impatient to bound forward. Harrison kept him for a
more concentrated struggle, and wreathing his hands
in the thick collar about his neck, he held him back for
individual assailants. In the meantime his pursuers
approached, though with caution. His dog was
concealed
by the brush, on the skirts of which he had
studiously placed him. They heard at intervals his
long, deep bay, and it had an effect upon them not
unlike that of their own war-whoop upon the whites.
They paused, as if in council. Just then their party
in front set up another shout, and the confusion of a
skirmish was evident to the senses as well of Harrison
as of his pursuers. This, to him, was a favourable
sign. It indicated the presence of friends. He heard
at length one shot, then another, and another, and at
the same time the huzzas of the Carolinians. They
inspired him with new courage, and with an impulse
which is sometimes, and, in desperate cases, may be
almost always considered wisdom, he plunged forward
through the brush which separated him from the unseen
combatants, loudly cheering in the English manner,
and prompting the hound to set up a succession of cries,
sufficiently imposing to inspire panic in the savages.
His movement was the signal to move also on the part
of those who pursued him. But a few steps changed
entirely the scene. He had rushed upon the rear of a
band of the Yemassees, who, lying behind brush and
logs, were skirmishing at advantage with the corps of
foresters which we have seen led on by the younger
Grayson. A single glance sufficed to put Harrison in
possession of the true facts of the case, and though
hazarding every chance of life, he bounded directly
among and through the ambushed Indians. Never was
desperation more fortunate in its consequences. Not
knowing the cause of such a movement, the Yemassees
conceived themselves beset front and rear. They rose
screaming from their hiding-places, and yielding on
each side of the fugitive. With an unhesitating hand
he struck with his knife one of the chiefs who stood
in his path. The hound, leaping among them like a
hungry panther, farther stimulated the panic, and for a
moment all were paralyzed. The fierce and forward
advance of that portion of their own allies which had
been pursuing Harrison, still further contributed to
impress them with the idea of an enemy in the rear;
and before they could recover so as to arrest his
progress
and discover the true state of things, he had passed
them, followed by the obedient dog. In another instant,
almost fainting with fatigue, to the astonishment but
satisfaction of all, he threw himself with a laugh of
mingled triumph and exhaustion into the ranks of his
sturdy band of foresters. Without a pause he
commanded
their attention. Fully conscious of the
confusion
among the ambushers, he ordered an advance, and
charged resolutely through the brush. The contest
was now hand to hand, and the foresters took their tree
when necessary, as well as their enemies. The
presence
of their captain gave them new courage, and the
desperate manner in which he had charged through
the party with which they fought, led them to despise
their foes. This feeling imparted to the Carolinians a
degree of fearlessness, which, new to them in such
warfare, was not less new to the Indians. Half
frightened
before, they needed but such an attack to
determine
them upon retreat. They faltered, and at length
Vol. II.H 15
fleda few fought on alone, but wounded and without
encouragement, they too gave way, sullenly and slowly,
and at length were brought up with their less resolute
companions in the cover of a neighbouring and denser
wood.
Harrison did not think it advisable to pursue them.
Calling off his men, therefore, he led them on the
route towards the Block House, which he relied upon
as the chief rallying point of the settlers in that quarter.
His anxieties, however, at that moment, had in them
something selfish, and he proceeded hurriedly to the
house of old Matthews. It was emptyits inmates
were gone, and the marks of savage devastation were
all around them. The building had been plundered,
and a hasty attempt made to burn it by torches, but
without success, the floors being only slightly scorched.
He rushed through the apartments in despair, calling
the family by name. What had been their fateand
where was she? The silence of every thing around
spoke to him too loudly, and with the faintest possible
hope that they had been sufficiently apprized of the
approach of the Indians to have taken the shelter of the
Block House, he proceeded to lead his men to that
designated point.
CHAPTER XXI.
A sudden trial, and the danger comes,
Noiseless and nameless.
Let
us go back once more to the Block House, and
look into the condition of its defenders. We
remember
the breaking of the ladder, the only one in their
possession, which led to the upper story of the
building
.
This accident left them in an ugly predicament,
since some time must necessarily be taken up in its
repair, and in the meanwhile, the forces of the
garrison
were divided in the different apartments, above
and below. In the section devoted to the women and
children, and somewhat endangered, as we have seen,
from the exposed window and the fallen tree, they
were its exclusive occupants. The opposite chamber
held a few of the more sturdy and common sense
defenders
,
while in the great hall below a miscellaneous
group of fifteen or twentythe inferior spiritswere
assembled. Two or three of these were busied in
patching up the broken ladder, which was to renew
the communication between the several parties, thus,
of necessity, thrown asunder.
The watchers of the fortress, from their several
loop-holes, looked forth, east and west, yet saw no
enemy. All was soft in the picture, all was silent in
the deep repose of the forest. The night was clear
and lovely, and the vague and dim beauty with which,
in the imperfect moonlight, the foliage of the woods
spread away in distant shadows, or clung and clustered
together as in groups, shrinking for concealment from
her glances, touched the spirits even of those rude
foresters
.
With them, its poetry was a matter of feeling
with the refined, it is an instrument of art. Hence it
is, indeed, that the poetry of the early ages speaks in the
simplest language, while that of civilization, becoming
only the agent for artificial enjoyment, is ornate in its
dress, and complex in its form and structure. Far away
in the distance, like glimpses of a spirit, little sweeps
of the river, in its crooked windings, flashed upon the
eye, streaking, with a sweet relief, the sombre foliage
of the swampy forest through which it stole. A single
notethe melancholy murmur of the
chuck-will's-widow
the
Carolina whippoorwill, broke fitfully upon
the silence, to which it gave an added solemnity. That
single note indicated to the keepers of the fortress a
watchfulness, corresponding with their own, of another
living creature. Whether it were human or not
whether it were the deceptive lure and signal of the
savage, or, in reality, the complaining cry of the
H 2
solitary and sad bird which it so resembled, was,
however
,
matter of nice question with those who listened
to the strain.
They are therethey are there, cried Grayson
I'll swear it. I've heard them quite too often not to
know their cunning now. Hector was right, after all,
boys.
What! where?asked Nichols.
There, in the bush to the left of the blasted oak
now, down to the bluffand now, by the bay on the
right. They are all round us.
By what do you know, Wat?
The whippoorwillthat is their crytheir signal.
It is the whippoorwill, said Nichols,there is
but one of them; you never hear more than one at a
time.
It is the Indian, responded Graysonfor though
there is but one note, it comes, as you perceive, from
three different quarters. Now it is to the Chief's Bluff
and nowit comes immediately from the old grove
of scrubby oak. A few shot there would get an
answer.
Good! that is just my thoughtlet us give them
a broadside, and disperse the scoundrels, cried
Nichols.
Not so fast, Nicholsyou swallow your enemy
without asking leave of your teeth. Have you
inquired
first whether we have powder and shot to throw
away upon bushes that may be empty? now exclaimed
the blacksmith, joining in the question.
A prudent thought, that, Grimstead, said Grayson
we have no ammunition to spare in that way. But
I have a notion that may prove of profit. Where is the
captain's straw manhere, Granger, bring out
Dugdale's
trainer.
The stuffed figure already described was brought
forward, the window looking in the direction of the
grove supposed to shelter the savages thrown open,
and the perfectly indifferent head of the automaton
thrust incontinently through the opening. The
ruse
was completely successful. The foe could not well
resist this temptation, and a flight of arrows,
penetrating
the figure in every portion of its breast and face,
attested the presence of the enemy and the truth of his
aim. A wild and shivering cry rung through the
forest at the same instantthat cry, well known as the
fearful war-whoop, the sound of which made the
marrow
curdle in the bones of the frontier settler, and
prompted the mother with a nameless terror to hug
closer to her bosom the form of her unconscious infant.
It was at once answered from side to side, wherever
their several parties had been stationed, and it struck
terror even into the sheltered garrison which heard it
such terror as the traveller feels by night, when the
shrill rattle of the lurking serpent, with that ubiquity
of sound which is one of its fearful features, vibrates
all around him, leaving him at a loss to say in what
quarter his enemy lies in waiting, and teaching him to
dread that the very next step which he takes may
place him within that coil which is death.
Ay, there they are, sure enoughfifty of them at
least, and we shall have them upon us, after this,
monstrous
quick, in some way or other, was the speech
of Grayson, while a brief pause in all the party marked
the deep influence upon them of the summons which
they had heard.
Trueand we must be up and doing, said the
smith; we can now give them a shot, Hugh
Grayson
,
for they will dance out from the cover now,
thinking
they have killed one of us. The savagesthey
have thrown away some of their powder at least.
As Grimstead spoke, he drew three arrows with no
small difficulty from the bosom of the figure in which
they were buried.
Better there than in our ribs. But you are right.
Stand back for a moment, and let me have that loop
I shall waste no shot. Ha! I seethere is one
I see his arm and the edge of his hatchetit rests
upon his shoulder, I reckon, but that is concealed by
the brush. He moveshe comes out, and slaps his
hands against his thigh. The red devil, but he shall
have it. Get ready, now, each at his loop, for if I hurt
him they will rush out in a fury.
The sharp click of the cock followed the words of
Grayson, who was an able shot, and the next moment
the full report came burdened with a dozen echoes from
the crowding woods around. A cry of painthen a
shout of fury, and the reiterated whoop followed; and
as one of their leaders reeled and sunk under the
unerring
bullet, the band in that station, as had been
predicted
by Grayson, rushed forth to where he stood,
brandishing their weapons with ineffectual fury, and
lifting their wounded comrade, as is their general
custom, to bear him to a place of concealment, and
preserve him from being scalped, by secret burial, in
the event of his being dead. They paid for their
temerity
.
Following the direction of their leader, whose
decision necessarily commanded their obedience, the
Carolinians took quite as much advantage of the
exposure
of their enemies, as the number of the
loop-holes
in that quarter of the building would admit.
Five muskets told among the group, and a reiterated
shout of fury indicated the good service which the
discharge
had done, and taught the savages a lesson of
prudence, which, in the present instance, they had
been too ready to disregard. They sunk back into
cover, taking care however to remove their hurt
companions
,
so that, save by the peculiar cry which with
them marks a loss, the garrison were unable to
determine
what had been the success of their discharges.
Having driven them back into the brush, however,
without
loss to themselves, the latter were now sanguine,
where, before, their confined and cheerless position
had taught them a feeling of despondency not
calculated
to improve the comforts of their case.
The Indians had made their arrangements on the
other hand with no little precaution. But they had
been deceived and disappointed. Their scouts, who
had previously inspected the fortress, had given a very
different account of the defences and the watchfulness
of their garrison, to what was actually the fact upon
their appearance. The scouts, however, had spoken
truth, and but for the discovery made by Hector, the
probability is that the Block House would have been
surprised with little or no difficulty. Accustomed to
obey Harrison as their only leader, the foresters
present
never dreamed of preparation for conflict unless
under his guidance; and but for the advice of the
trader's wife, and the confident assumption of
command
on the part of Walter Grayson, a confusion of
councils, not less than of tongues, would have
neutralized
all action, and left them an easy prey, without
head or direction, to the knives of their insidious
enemy. Calculating upon surprise and cunning as the
only means by which they could hope to balance the
numerous advantages possessed by European
warfare
over their own, the Indians had relied rather
more in the suddenness of their onset, and the craft
peculiar to their education, than on the force of their
valour. They felt themselves baffled, therefore, in
their main hope, by the sleepless caution of the
garrison
,
and now prepared themselves for other means.
They had made their disposition of force with no little
judgment. Small bodies, at equal distances, under
cover, had been stationed all about the fortress. With
the notes of the whippoorwill they had carried on their
signals, and indicated the several stages of their
preparation
;
while, in addition to this, another banda
sort of forlorn hope, consisting of the more desperate,
who had various motives for signalizing their valour
creeping singly, from cover to cover, now reposing in
the shadow of a log along the ground, now half buried
in a clustering bush, made their way at length so
closely under the walls of the log house as to be
completely
concealed from the garrison, which, unless by
the window, had no mode of looking directly down
upon them. As the windows were well watched by
their comradeshaving once attained their place of
concealmentit followed that their position remained
entirely concealed from those within. They lay in
waiting for the favourable momentsilent as the grave,
and sleeplessready, when the garrison should
determine
upon a sally, to fall upon their rear, and in
the meanwhile quietly preparing dry fuel in quantity,
gathered from time to time, and piling it against the
logs of the fortress, they prepared thus to fire the
defences that shut them out from their prey.
There was yet another mode of finding entrance,
which has been partially glimpsed at already. The
scouts had done their office diligently in more than the
required respects. Finding a slender pine twisted by
a late storm, and scarcely sustained by a fragment of
its shaft, they applied fire to the rich turpentine oozing
from the wounded part of the tree, and carefully
directing
its fall, as it yielded to the fire, they lodged its
extremest
branches, as we have already seen, against the
wall of the Block House and just beneath the window
the only one looking from that quarter of the fortress.
Three of the bravest of their warriors were assigned
for scaling this point and securing their entrance, and
the attack was forborne by the rest of the band, while
their present design, upon which they built greatly, was
in progress.
Let us then turn to this quarter. We have already
seen that the dangers of this position were duly
estimated
by Grayson, under the suggestion of Granger's
wife. Unhappily for its defence, the fate of the
ladder
prevented that due attention to the subject, at first,
which had been imperatively called for; and the
subsequent
excitement following the discovery of the
immediate
proximity of the Indians, had turned the
consideration
of the defenders to the opposite end of the
building, from whence the partial attack of the enemy,
as described, had come. It is true that the workmen
were yet busy with the ladder; but the assault had
suspended
their operations, in the impatient curiosity which
such an event would necessarily induce, even in the
bosom of fear.
The wife of Grayson, fully conscious of the danger,
was alone sleepless in that apartment. The rest of the
women, scarcely apprehensive of attack at all, and
perfectly
ignorant of the present condition of affairs, with
all that heedlessness which marks the unreflecting
character, had sunk to the repose, without an effort at
watchfulness, which previous fatigues had, perhaps,
made absolutely necessary. She alone sat thoughtful
and silent, musing over present prospectsperhaps of
the pastbut still unforgetful of the difficulties and
the dangers before her. With a calm temper she
awaited the relief which, with the repair of the ladder,
she looked for from below. In the meantime, hearing
something of the alarm, together with the distant
war-whoop
,
she had looked around her for some means of
defence, in the event of any attempt being made upon
the window before the aid promised could reach her.
But a solitary weapon met her eye, in the long heavy
hatchet, a clumsy instrument, rather more like the
cleaver
of the butcher than the light and slender
tomahawk
so familiar to the Indians. Having secured
this, with the composure of that courage which had
been in great part taught her by the necessities of
fortune, she prepared to do without other assistance,
and to forego the sentiment of dependance, which is
perhaps one of the most marked characteristics of her
sex. Calmly looking round upon the sleeping and
defenceless crowd about her, she resumed her seat
upon a low bench in a corner of the apartment, from
which she had risen to secure the hatchet, and,
extinguishing
the only light in the room, fixed her eye
upon the accessible window, while every thought of
her mind prepared her for the danger which was at
hand. She had not long been seated when she fancied
that she heard a slight rustling of the branches of the
fallen tree just beneath the window. She could not
doubt her senses, and her heart swelled and throbbed
with the consciousness of approaching danger. But
still she was firmher spirit grew more confirmed
with the coming trial; and coolly throwing the
slippers
from her feet, grasping firmly her hatchet at the
same time, she softly arose, and keeping close in the
H 3
shadow of the wall, she made her way to a recess, a
foot or so from the entrance, to which it was evident
some one was cautiously approaching along the
attenuated
body of the yielding pine. In a few moments
and a shadow darkened the opening. She edged
more closely to the point, and prepared for the
intruder
.
She now beheld the head of the enemya fierce
and foully painted savagethe war-tuft rising up into a
ridge, something like a comb, and his face smeared
with colours in a style the most ferociously grotesque.
Still she could not strike, for, as he had not penetrated
the window, and as its entrance was quite too small
to enable her to strike with any hope of success at
any distance through it, she felt that it would be folly;
and though excited with doubt and determination alike,
she saw the error of any precipitation. But, the next
moment, he laid his hand upon the sill of the window,
the better to raise himself to his level. In that instant
she struck at the broad arm lying across the wood.
The blow was given with all her force, and would
certainly
have separated the hand from the arm had it
taken effect. But the quick eye of the Indian caught
a glimpse of her movement at the very moment in
which it was made, and the hand was withdrawn
before
the hatchet descended. The steel sunk deep into
the soft woodso deeply that she could not
disengage
it. To try at this object would have exposed
her at once to his weapon, and leaving it where it
stuck, she sunk back again into shadow.
What now was she to do? To stay where she was
would be of little avail; but to cry out and to fly, equally
unproductive of good, besides warning the enemy of
the defencelessness of their condition, and thus inviting
a renewal of the attack. The thought came to her with
the danger, and, without a word, she maintained her
position
,
in waiting for the progress of events. As the
Indian had also sunk from sight, and some moments had
now elapsed without his reappearance, she determined
to make another effort for the recovery of the hatchet.
She grasped it by the handle, and in the next moment
the hand of the savage was upon her own. He felt that
it was that of a woman, and in a brief word and
something
of a chuckle, while he still maintained his hold
on it, conveyed intelligence of the fact to those below.
But it was a woman with a man's spirit with whom he
contended, and her endeavour was successful to
disengage
herself. The same success did not attend her
effort to recover the weapon. In the brief struggle with
her enemy it had become disengaged from the wood,
and while both strove to seize it, it slipped from their
mutual hands, and sliding over the sill, in another
instant
was heard rattling through the intervening bushes.
Descending upon the ground below, it became the
spoil of those without, whose murmurs of gratulation
she distinctly heard. But now came the tug of
difficulty
.
The Indian, striving at the entrance,
necessarily
encouraged by the discovery that his opponent
was not a man, and assured, at the same time, by the
forbearance, on the part of those within, to strike him
effectually down from the tree, now resolutely
endeavoured
to effect his entrance. His head was again fully
in sight of the anxious womanthen his shoulders, and
at length, resting his hand upon the sill, he strove to
elevate himself by its muscular strength, so as to
secure
him sufficient purchase for the object at which
he aimed. What could she doweaponless,
hopeless
?
The prospect was startling and terrible enough;
but she was a strong-minded woman, and impulse
served her when reflection would most probably have
taught her to fly. She had but one resource; and as
the Indian gradually thrust one hand forward for the
hold upon the sill, and raised the other up to the side
of the window, she grasped the one nighest to her
own. She grasped it firmly and to advantage, as,
having
lifted himself on tiptoe for the purpose of ascent,
he had necessarily lost much of the control which a
secure hold for his feet must have given him. Her
grasp sufficiently assisted him forward, to lessen still
more greatly the security of his feet, while, at the
same time, though bringing him still farther into the
apartment, placing him in such a position as to defeat
much of the muscular exercise which his limbs would
have possessed in any other situation. Her weapon
now would have been all-important; and the strong
woman mentally deplored the precipitancy with which
she had acted in the first instance, and which had so
unhappily deprived her of its use. But self-reproach
was unavailing now, and she was satisfied if she could
retain her foe in his present position, by which,
keeping
him out, or in and out, as she did, she necessarily
excluded all other foes from the aperture which he so
completely filled up. The intruder, though desirous
enough of entrance before, was rather reluctant to
obtain
it now, under existing circumstances. He strove
desperately to effect a retreat, but had advanced too
far, however, to be easily successful; and, in his
confusion
and disquiet, he spoke to those below in their
own language, explaining his difficulty and directing
their movement to his assistance. A sudden rush along
the tree indicated to the conscious sense of the woman
the new danger, in the approach of additional enemies,
who must not only sustain but push forward the one
with whom she contended. This warned her at once
of the necessity of some sudden procedure, if she hoped
to do any thing for her own and the safety of those
around her, who, amid all the contest, she had never
once alarmed. Putting forth all her strength,
therefore
,
though nothing in comparison with that of him
whom she opposed, had he been in a condition to
exert it, she strove to draw him still farther across
the entrance, so as to exclude, if possible, the approach
of those coming behind him. She hoped to gain time
sufficient time for those preparing the ladder to come
to her relief; and with this hope, for the first time, she
called aloud to Grayson and her husband. The Indian,
in the meanwhile, derived the support for his person as
well from the grasp of the woman, as from his own
hold upon the sill of the window. Her effort
necessarily
drawing him still farther forward, placed him so
completely in the way of his allies that they could do
him little service while things remained in this
situation
;
and, to complete the difficulties of his
predicament
,
while they busied themselves in several efforts
at his extrication, the branches of the little tree,
resting
against the dwelling, yielding suddenly to the
unusual
weight upon ittrembling and sinking away at
lastcracked beneath the burden, and snapping off
from their several holds, fell from under them, dragging
against the building in their progress down, thus
breaking
their fall, and finally settling heavily upon the
ground. Down went the three savages who had so
readily ascended to the assistance of their comrade
bruised and very much hurt;while he, now without
any support but that which he derived from the sill,
and what little his feet could secure from the irregular
crevices between the logs of which the house had been
built, was hung in air, unable to advance except at the
will of his woman opponent, and dreading a far worse
fall from his eminence than that which had already
happened to his allies. Desperate with his situation,
he thrust his arm, as it was still held by the woman,
still farther into the window, and thus enabled her with
both hands to secure and strengthen the grasp which
she had originally taken upon it. This she did with
a new courage, and strength derived from the voices
below, by which she understood a promise of
assistance
.
Excited and nerved, she drew the extended
arm of the Indian, in spite of all his struggles, directly
over the sill, so as to turn the elbow completely down
upon it. With her whole weight employed, bending
down to the floor to strengthen herself to the task,
she pressed the arm across the window until her ears
heard the distinct, clear, crack of the boneuntil she
heard the groan, and felt the awful struggles of the
suffering
wretch, twisting himself round with all his effort
to obtain for it a natural and relaxed position, and, with
this object, leaving his hold upon every thing, only
sustained
,
indeed, by the grasp of his enemy. But the
movement of the woman had been quite too sudden, her
nerves too firm, and her strength too great to suffer him
16
to succeed. The jagged splinters of the broken limb
were thrust up, lacerating and tearing through flesh and
skin, while a howl of the acutest agony attested the
severity
of that suffering which could extort such an
acknowledgment
from the American savage. He fainted
in his pain, and as the weight increased upon her
arm, the nature of her sex began to resume its sway.
With a shudder of every fibre, she released her hold
upon him. The effort of her soul was overa strange
sickness came upon her, and she was just conscious of
a crashing fall of the heavy body among the branches
at the foot of the window, when she staggered back,
fainting, into the arms of her husband, who, just at that
moment, ascended to her relief.
CHAPTER XXII.
He shouts, he strikes, he fallshis fields are o'er;
He dies in triumph, and he asks no more.
These
slight defeats were sufficiently annoying in
themselves to the invadersthey were more so as
they proved not only the inadequacy of their present
mode of assault, but the watchfulness of the
beleaguered
garrison. Their hope had been to take the
borderers by surprise. Failing to succeed in this, they
were now thrown all aback. Their fury was
consequently
more than ever exaggerated by their losses,
and rushing forward in their desperation, through, and
in defiance of, the fire from the Carolinians, the greater
number placed themselves beneath the line of pickets
with so much celerity as to baffle, in most respects, the
aim of the defenders. A few remained to bear away
the wounded and slain to a place of safe shelter in
the thick woods, while the rest lay, either in quiet
under the walls of the Block House, secure there from
the fire of the garrison, or amused themselves in
unavailing
cries of sarcasm to those within, while
impotently
expending blows upon the insensible logs
between
them. The elder Grayson, who directed solely
the movements of the beleaguered, was not unwilling
that the assailants should amuse themselves after this
fashion, as the delay of the Indians was to them the
gain of time, which was all they could expect at such
a period, and perhaps in a predatory warfare like the
present, all they could desire.
But Ishiagaska with his force now came upon the
scene, and somewhat changed the aspect of affairs.
He took the entire command, reinvigorated their efforts,
and considerably altered the mode and direction of
attack. He was a subtle partisan, and the
consequences
of his appearance were soon perceptible in the
development of events. The force immediately
beneath
the walls, and secure from the shot of the
garrison
,
were reinforced, and in so cautious a manner,
that the Carolinians were entirely ignorant of their
increased strength in that quarter. Creeping, as they
did, from bush to bushnow lying prone and silent
to the ground, in utter immobilitynow rushing, as
circumstances prompted, with all rapiditythey put
themselves into cover, crossing the intervening space
without the loss of a man. Having thus gathered in
force beneath the walls of the fortress, the greater
number, while the rest watched, proceeded to gather
up in piles, as they had begun to do before, immense
quantities of the dry pine trash and the gummy
turpentine
wood which the neighbourhood readily afforded.
This they clustered in thick masses around the more
accessible points of the pickets; and the first
intimation
which the garrison had of their proceeding
was a sudden gust of flame, blazing first about the gate
of the area, on one side of the Block House, then
rushing
from point to point with amazing rapidity,
sweeping
and curling widely around the building itself.
The gate, and the pickets all about it, studiously
made as they had been of the rich pine, for its great
durability, was as ready an ally of the destructive
element
as the Indians could have chosen; and, licked
greedily by the fire, were soon ignited. Blazing
impetuously
,
it soon aroused the indwellers to a more
acute consciousness of the danger now at hand. A
fierce shout of their assailants, as they beheld the rapid
progress of the experiment, warned them to greater
exertion
if they hoped to escape the dreadful fate which
threatened to ingulf them. To remain where they
were, was to be consumed in the flames; to rush forth,
was to encounter the tomahawks of an enemy four
times their number.
It was a moment of gloomy necessity, that which
assembled the chief defenders of the fortress to a sort
of war-council. They could only deliberateto fight
was out of the question. Their enemy now was one
to whom they could oppose
Nor subtle wile,
Nor arbitration strong.
The Indians showed no front for assault or aim,
while the flames, rushing from point to point, and
seizing
upon numerous places at once, continued to
advance
with a degree of celerity which left it
impossible
,
in the dry condition of its timber, that the Block
House could possibly, for any length of time, escape.
Upon the building itself the savages could not fix the
fire at first. But two ends of it were directly
accessible
to them, and these were without any entrance, had
been pierced with holes for musketry, and were well
watched by the vigilant eyes within. The two sides
were enclosed by the line of pickets, and had no need
of other guardianship. The condition of affairs was
deplorable. The women wept and prayed, the
children
screamed, and the men, gathering generally in
the long apartment of the lower story, with heavy
hearts and solemn faces, proceeded to ask counsel of
one another in the last resort. Some lay around on the
loose plankhere and there along the floor a bearskin
formed the place of rest for a huge and sullen warrior,
vexed with the possession of strength which he was
not permitted to employ. A few watched at the
musket
holes, and others busied themselves in adjusting
all things for the final necessity, so far as their thoughts
or fancies could possibly divine its shape.
The principal men of the garrison were gathered in
the centre of the hall, sitting with downcast heads and
fronting one another, along two of the uncovered
sleepers
;
their muskets resting idly between their legs,
their attitudes and general expression of
abandon
signifying
clearly the due increase of apprehension in
their minds with the progress of the flames. Broad
flashes of light from the surrounding conflagration
illuminated, but could not enliven, the sombre character
of that grouping. A general pause ensued after their
assemblagenone seeming willing or able to offer
counsel, and Grayson himself, the brave forester in
command, evidently at fault in the farther business
before
them. Nichols was the only man to break the
silence, which he did in his usual manner.
And why, my friends, are we here assembled?
was his sagacious inquiry, looking round as he spoke
upon his inattentive coadjutors. A forced smile on
the faces of several, but not a word, attested their
several estimates of the speaker. He proceeded.
That is the question, my friendswhy are we
here assembled? I answer, for the good of the people.
We are here to protect them if we can, and to perish
for and with them if we must. I cannot forget my
duties to my country, and to those in whose behalf I
stand before the hatchet of the Indian, and the cannon
of the Spaniard. These teach me, and I would teach
it to you, my friendsto fight, to hold out to the last.
We may not think of surrender, my friends, until other
hope is gone. Whatever be the peril, till that
moment
be it mine to encounter itwhatever be the
privation
,
till that moment I am the man to endure it. Be
it for me, at least, though I stand alone in this
particular
,
to do for the people whatever wisdom or valour
may do until the moment comes which shall call on
us for surrender. The question now, my friends, is
simply thishas that moment come or not? I pause
for a reply.
Who talks of surrender? growled the smith, as
he cast a glance of ferocity to the speaker. Who
talks of surrender at all, to these cursed bloodhounds;
the red-skins that hunt for nothing but our blood. We
cannot surrender if we wouldwe must fight, die, do
any thing but surrender!
So say II am ready to fight and die for my
country. I say it now, as I have said it a hundred
times before, but The speech which Nichols had
thus begun, the smith again interrupted with a greater
bull-dog expression than ever.
Ay, so you have, and so will say a hundred times
morewith as little sense in it one time as another.
We are all here to die, if there's any need for it; but
that isn't the trouble. It's how we are to diethat's
the question. Are we to stay here and be burnt to
death like timber-ratsto sally out and be shot, or to
volunteer, as I do now, axe in hand, to go out and cut
down the pickets that immediately join the house?
By that we may put a stop to the fire, and then we
shall have a clear dig at the savages that lie behind
them. I'm for that. If anybody's willing to go along
with me, let him up handsno talkwe have too
much of that already.
I'm readyhere! cried Grayson, and his hands
were thrust up at the instant.
No, Wat, cried the smithnot youyou must
stay and manage here. Your head's the coolest, and
though I'd sooner have your arm alongside of me in the
rough time than any other two that I know of, 'twon't do
to take you from the rest on this risk. Who else is
ready?let him come to the scratch, and no long talk
about it. What do you say, Nichols? that's chance
enough for you, if you really want to die for the
people
.
And as Grimstead spoke, he thrust his head
forward, while his eyes peered into the very bosom of
the little doctor, and his axe descended to the joist
over which he stood with a thundering emphasis that
rung through the apartment.
I can't use the axe, cried Nichols, hurriedly.
It's not my instrument. Sword or pistol for me. In
their exercise I give way to no man, and in their use
I ask for no leader. But I am neither woodman nor
blacksmith.
And this is your way of dying for the good of the
people! said the smith, contemptuously.
I am willing even nowI say it again, as I have
before said, and as now I solemnly repeat it. But I
must die for them after my own fashion, and under
proper circumstances. With sword in hand, crossing
the perilous breachwith weapon befitting the use of
a noble gentleman, I am ready; but I know not any
rule in patriotism that would require of me to perish
for my country with the broad-axe of a wood-chopper,
the cleaver of a butcher, or the sledge of a blacksmith
in my hands.
Well, I'm no soldier, retorted the smith; but I
think a man, to be really willing to die for his country,
shouldn't be too nice as to which way he does it.
Now the sword and the pistol are of monstrous little use
here. The muskets from these holes above and below
will keep off the Indians, while a few of us cut down
the stakes; so, now, men, as time grows short,
Grayson
,
you let the boys keep a sharp look-out with the
ticklers, and I'll for the timber, let him follow who will.
There are boys enough, I take it, to go with Dick
Grimstead, though they may none of them be very
anxious to die for their country.
Thus saying, and having received the sanction of
Grayson to this, the only project from which any thing
could be expected, the blacksmith pushed forward,
throwing open the door leading to the area which the
fire in great part now beleagueredwhile Grayson
made arrangements to command the ground with his
musketry, and to keep the entrance, thus opened for
Grimstead and his party, with his choicest men. The
blacksmith was one of those blunt, burly fellows, who
take with the populace. It was not difficult for him
to procure three men where twenty were ready. They
had listened with much sympathy to the discussion
narrated, and as the pomposity and assumption of
Nicholas had made him an object of vulgar ridicule, a
desire to rebuke him, not less than a willingness to go
with the smith, contributed readily to persuade them
to the adventure. In a few moments the door was
unbarred, and the party sallied forth through the
entrance
,
which was kept ajar for their ingress, and well
watched by half a dozen of the stoutest men in the
garrison, Grayson at their head. Nicholas went above
to direct the musket-men, while his mind busied itself
in conning over the form of a capitulation, which he
thought it not improbable he should have to frame with
the chiefs of the besieging army. In this labour he
had but one cause of vexation, which arose from the
necessity he would be under, in enumerating the
prisoners
,
of putting himself after Grayson, the commander.
In the meanwhile, with sleeves rolled up, jacket
off, and face that seemed not often to have been
entirely free from the begriming blackness of his
profession
,
Grimstead commenced his tremendous blows
upon the contiguous pickets, followed with like zeal,
if not equal power, by the three men who had
volunteered
along with him. Down went the first post
beneath his arm, and as, with resolute spirit, he was
about to assail another, a huge Santee warrior stood in
the gap which he had made, and with a powerful blow
from the mace which he carried, had our blacksmith
been less observant, would have soon finished his
career. But Grimstead was a man of agility as well
as strength and spirit, and leaping aside from the
stroke, as his eye rose to the corresponding glance
from that of his enemy, he gave due warning to his
axe-men, who forbore their strokes under his
command
.
The aperture was yet too small for any
combat
of the parties; and, ignorant of the force against
him, surprised also at their appearance, he despatched
one of his men to Grayson, and gave directions,
which, had they been complied with, had certainly
given them the advantage.
Now, boys, you shall have funI have sent for
some hand-to-hand men to do the fighting, while we do
the chopping,and Nicholas, who loves dying so much,
can't help coming along with them. He's the boy for
sword and pistolhe's no woodcutter. Well, many a
better chap than he's had to chop wood for an honest
living. But we'll see now what he is good for. Let
him come.
Oh, he's all flash in the pan, Grimstead. His
tongue is mustard-seed enough, but it 'taint the shot.
But what's that?
The speaker, who was one of Grimstead's comrades,
might well ask, for first a crackling, then a whirling
crash, announced the fall at length of the huge gate to
the entrance of the court. A volume of flame and
cinders, rising with the gust which it created, rushed
up, obscuring for a moment and blinding all things
around it; but, as it subsided, the Indians lying in wait
on the outside, and whom no smoke could blind, leaped
with uplifted tomahawks through the blazing ruins, and
pushed forward to the half-opened entrance of the
Block House. The brave blacksmith, admirably
supported
,
threw himself in the way, and was singled out
by the huge warrior who had struck at him through
the picket. The savage was brave and strong, but he
had his match in the smith, whose courage was
indomitable
and lively, while his strength was surpassed
by that of few. Wielding his axe with a degree of
ease that, of itself, warned the enemy what he had to
expect, it was but a moment before the Indian gave
way before him. But the smith was not disposed to
allow a mere acknowledgment of his superiority to
pass for a victory. He pressed him back upon his
comrades, while his own three aids, strong and gallant
themselves, following his example, drove the intruders
upon the blaze which flamed voluminously around them.
Already a severe wound, which almost severed the
arm of the Santee warrior from its trunk, had confirmed
the advantage gained by the whites, while severe
hatchet wounds had diminished not a little the courage
of his Indian fellows, when, of a sudden, a new party
came upon the scene of combat, changing entirely its
face and character, and diminishing still more the
chances of the Carolinians. This was Chorley, the
captain of the pirate. Having lodged his captives, as
we have seen, in a little hovel on the river's brink,
under a small guard of his own seamen, he had
proceeded
with all due speed upon the steps of Ishiagaska.
He arrived opportunely for the band which had been
placed along the walls of the Block House, in ambush,
and whose daring had at length carried them into the
outer defences of the fortress. A single shot from one
of his men immediately warned the smith and his
brave comrades of the new enemy before them,
and while stimulating afresh the courage of their
savage assailants, it materially diminished their own.
They gave backthe three surviversone of the
party having fallen in the first discharge. The Indians
rushed upon them, and thus throwing themselves
between
,
for a time defeated the aim of Chorley's
musketeers
.
Fighting like a lion, as he retreated to the
door of the Block House, the brave smith continued
to keep unharmed, making at the same time some
little employment in the shape of ugly wounds to
dress, in the persons of his rash assailants. Once
more they gave back before him, and again the
musketry
of Chorley was enabled to tell upon him. A
discharge from the Block House in the meantime
retorted
with good effect the attack of the sailors, and
taught a lesson of caution to Chorley, of which he soon
availed himself. Three of his men bit the dust in that
single fire; and the Indians, suffering more severely,
fled at the discharge. The brave smith reached the
door with a single unwounded follower, himself unhurt.
His comrades threw open the entrance for his
reception
,
but an instant too late. A parting shot from the
muskets of the seamen was made with a fatal effect.
Grimstead sunk down upon the threshold as the bullet
passed through his bodythe axe fell from his hand
he grasped at it convulsively, and lay extended in part
upon the sill of the door, when Grayson drew him in
safety within, and again securely closed it.
You are not hurt, Dick, my old fellow, exclaimed
Grayson, his voice trembling with the apprehensions
which he felt.
Hurt enough, Watbad enough. No more grist
ground at that mill. But, hold indon't be frightened
you can lick 'em yet. Ah, he groaned, in a mortal
agony.
They composed his limbs, and pouring some spirits
down his throat, he recovered in a few moments, and
convulsively inquired for his axe.
I wouldn't lose itit was dad's own axe, and must
go to brother Tom when I die.
Die indeed, Dickdon't think of such a thing,
said Grayson.
I don't, HughI leave that to Nicholsbut get
the axe--ah! Godit's hereherewhere's Tom?
His brother, a youth of sixteen, came down to him
from the upper apartment where he had been stationed,
and kneeling over him, tried to support his headbut
the blood gushed in a torrent from his mouth. He
strove to speak, but choked in the effort. A single
convulsion, which turned him upon his face, and the
struggle was all over. The battles of the smith were
done.
CHAPTER XXIII.
A last blow for his country, and he dies,
Surviving not the ruin he must see.
The
force brought up by the younger Grayson, and
now led by Harrison, came opportunely to the relief
of the garrison. The flames had continued to rage,
unrestrained, so rapidly around the building, that its
walls were at length greedily seized upon by the furious
element, and the dense smoke, gathering through all its
apartments, alone was sufficient to compel the retreat
of its defenders. Nothing now was left them in their
desperation but to sally forth even upon the knives and
hatchets of their merciless and expecting foe; and for
this last adventure, so full of danger, so utterly wanting
in a fair promise of any successful result, the sturdy
foresters prepared. Fortunately for this movement, it
was just about this period that the approach of
Harrison
,
with his party, compelled the besiegers to change
their position, in order the better to contend with him;
and, however reluctant to suffer the escape of those so
completely in their power, and for whose destruction
they had already made so many sacrifices of time and
life, they were compelled to do so in the reasonable
fear of an assault upon two sidesfrom the garrison
before them, impelled by desperation, and from the foe
in their rear, described by their scouts as in rapid
advance
to the relief of the Block House. The command
was shared jointly between Chorley and Ishiagaska.
The former had fared much worse than his tawny
allies; for, not so well skilled in the artifices of land
and Indian warfare, seven out of the twenty warriors
whom he commanded had fallen victims in the
preceding
conflicts. His discretion had become something
more valuable, therefore, when reminded by the scanty
force remaining under his command, not only of his
loss, but of his present weakness; a matter of no little
concern, as he well knew that his Indian allies, in their
capricious desperation, might not be willing to
discriminate
between the whites who had befriended, and those
who had been their foes.
Thus, counselled by necessity, the assailing chiefs
drew off their forces from the Block House, and sinking
into cover, prepared to encounter their new enemies,
after the fashion of their warfare. Ignorant in the
meantime of the approach of Harrison or the force
under him, Grayson wondered much at this movement
of the besiegers, of which he soon had intelligence,
and instantly prepared to avail himself of the privilege
which it gave to the garrison of flight. He called his
little force together, and having arranged, before leaving
its shelter, the progress and general movement of his
party, he carefully placed the women and children in
the centre of his little troop, sallied boldly forth into
the woods, conscious of all the dangers of the movement,
but strengthened with all those thoughts of lofty cheer
with which the good Providence, at all times, inspires
the spirit of adventure, in the hour of its trying
circumstance
.
There was something of pleasure in their
very release from the confined circuit of the Block
House, though now more immediately exposed to the
tomahawk of the Indian; and with the pure air, and
the absence of restraint, the greater number of the
foresters grew even cheerful and glada change of
mood in which even the women largely partook. Some
few indeed, of the more Puritancial among them,
disposed
to think themselves the especial charge of the
Deity, and holding him not less willing than strong to
save, under any circumstances, even went so far as to
break out into a hymn of exultation and rejoicing,
entirely forgetting the dangers still hanging around
them, and absolutely contending warmly with Grayson
when he undertook to restrain them. Not the least
refractory of these was his own mother, who, in spite
of all he could say, mouthed and muttered continually,
and every now and then burst forth into starts of
irrepressible
psalmody, sufficient to set the entire tribe of
Indians unerringly upon their track. The remonstrance
of Grayson had little effect, except when he reminded
her of his younger brother. The idolized Hugh, and
his will, were her law in most things. Appealing to
his authority, and threatening complaint to him, he
succeeded in making her silent, at least to a certain
extent. Entire silence was scarcely possible with
the old dame, who likened her escape from the flaming
Block House, and, so far, from the hands of the savage,
to every instance of Providential deliverance she had
Vol. II.I 17
ever read of in the sacred volume; and still, under the
stimulus of such a feeling, broke out every now and
then, with sonorous emphasis, into song, from an old
collection of the period, every atom of which she had
familiarly at the end of her tongue. A moment had
not well elapsed after the first suggestion of Grayson,
when, as if unconsciously, she commenced again:
`The Lord hath fought the foe for us,
And smote the heathen down.'
Now, mother, in the name of common sense, can't
you be quiet?
And wherefore should we not send up the hymn of
rejoicing and thanksgiving for all his mercies, to the
Father who has stood beside us in the hour of peril?
Wherefore, I ask of you, Walter Grayson? Oh, my
son, beware of self-conceit and pride of heart; and
because you have here commanded earthly and human
weapons, think not, in the vanity of your spirit, that the
victory comes from such as these. The Saviour of men,
my sonit is he that has fought this fight. It is his
sword that has smitten the savage hip and thigh, and
brought us free out of the land of bondage, even as he
brought his people of old from the bondage of the
Egyptians. He is mighty to save, and therefore should
we rejoice with an exceeding strong voice. And as
if determined to sustain amply the propriety she insisted
on, her lungs were never more tasked than when she
sung:
`The Lord he comes with mighty power,
The army of the saints is there
He speaks'
For Heaven's sake, motherhush your tongueif
it be in you to keep it quiet for a moment. Let it rest
only for a little while, or we shall all be scalped.
Wait till daylight, and you may then sing to your heart's
content. It can't be long till daylight, and you can
then begin, but not till then, or we shall have the
savages
on our track, and nothing can save us.
Oh! thou of little faithI tell thee, Walter, thou
hast read but too little of thy Bible, and dependest too
much upon the powers of earthall of which are
wicked and vain defences. Put thy trust in God; he
is strong to save. Under his hand I fear not the
savage
for,
does he not tell us and she quavered
again:
`Unfold thine eye and see me here,
I do the battle for the just,
My people nothing have to fear'
Mother, in the name of common sense. But she
went on with double fervour, as if vexed with the
interruption
:
`If faithful in my word'
Mother, mother, I say But she was bent
seemingly
to finish the line:
`they trust.'
Was there ever such an obstinate! I say,
mother
Well, my son?
Are you my mother?
Of a certainty, I am. What mean you by that
question, Walter?
Do you want to see my scalp dangling upon the
long pole of a savage?
God forbid, Walter, my son. Did I not bear thee
did I not suffer for thee?
Then, if thou dost not really desire to see me
scalped, put some stop on thy tongue, and move along
as if death lay under every footstep. If the savages
surround us now, we are gone, every mother's son
of usand all the saints, unless they are accustomed
to Indian warfare, can do nothing in our behalf.
Speak not irreverently, son Walter. The saints
are blessed mediators for the sinner, and may move
eternal mercy to save. Have they not fought for us
I 2
already to-nightand are we not saved by their
ministry
from the bloody hands of the savage?
Noit's by our own hands, and our own good
handiwork, mother. I owe the saints no thanks, and
shall owe you still less, unless you stop that howling.
Oh, Father, forgive him, he knows not what he
sayshe is yet in the bondage of sin and she
hymned her prayer from her collection:
`Strike not the sinner in his youth,
But bear him in thy mercy on,
Till in the path of sacred truth,
He sees'
Mother, if thou hush not, I will tell Hugh of thy
obstinacy. He shall know how little thou mindest his
counsel.
Well, well, Walter, my son, I am done. Thou art
too hasty, I'm sure.Oh, bless me
Her speech was cut short by a sudden and fierce
whoop of the Indians, followed by the huzzas of the
whites at a greater distance, and the rapid fire of
musketry
,
scattered widely along the whole extended range
of forest around them.
Down, down, all hands to your kneesone and
all was the cry of Grayson to his party; and,
accustomed
to most of the leading difficulties and dangers
of such a fight, the order was obeyed as if
instinctively
by all except Dame Grayson, who inflexibly
maintained her position, and refused to move, alleging
her objection to any prostration except for the purposes
of prayer. Maddened by her obstinacy, Grayson, with
very little scruple, placing his hand upon her shoulder,
bore her down to the earth, exclaiming,
Then say your prayers, motherdo any thing but
thwart what you cannot amend.
Thus humbled, the party crept along more closely
into cover, until, at a spot where the trees were clustered
along with underwood, into something like a copse, he
ordered a halt, and proceeded to arrange his men and
their weapons for active conflict. The war approached
at intervals, and an occasional shot whistled over the
heads of the party, conclusively proving the necessity
of their position. The Indians seemed to lie betwixt
them and the advancing Carolinians; and perceiving
this to be the case, Grayson threw the non-combatants
under shelter in such a manner as to interpose those
who fought in the way of the coming Indians, in the
event of their being driven back upon them. His
party in the meanwhile, well prepared, lay quietly
under cover, and with their weapons ready to take
advantage of any such event.
Harrison, as we may remember, had taken the
command
of the greater body of the force which had been
brought up through the industrious and prodigious
exertions
of Hugh Grayson. This young man, stung and
mortified as he had been by the rebuke of Bess
Matthews
,
with a degree of mental concentration, rather
indicative of his characterthough hopeless of those
affections, which of all other human hopes he had most
valuedhad determined to do himself justice by doing
his duty. Throwing aside, therefore, as well as he
might, the passionate mood, which was active in his
soul, he had gone forth from the house of the pastor,
resolute to make every exertion in procuring a force
which might protect the family from an attack, which
he had at length learned, as well as Harrison, greatly
to anticipate. His pride suggested to him the
gratification
of saving the life of her who had scorned him,
as an honourable revenge, not less than a fair blotting
out of those errors of which, on her account, he had
suffered himself to be guilty. His efforts, so far, had
been crowned with success; but he had come too late
for his prime object. The dwelling of the pastor had
been sacked before his arrival, and, like Harrison, he
was under the most horrible apprehensions for her
safety. The latter person came upon him opportunely,
in time to keep him from falling into the ambuscade
through which he had himself so singularly passed in
safetyand with more knowledge of Indian strife,
Harrison took the command of a party, confident in his
skill, and, of necessity, with a courage heightened
proportionably
when under his direction.
The cautious yet bold management of Harrison soon
gave him the advantage. The foresters, guided by
him, each took his tree after the manner of the Indians,
and with the advantage of weapons more certain to
kill, and equally, if not more certain, in aim. Apart
from this, the Carolinian woodman knew enough of the
savages to know that they were no opponents,
generally
speaking, to be feared in a trial of respective
muscular
strength. The life of the hunter fits him to
endure
rather than to contend. The white borderer was
taught by his necessities to do both. He could wield
the axe and overthrow the treea labour to which the
Indian is averse. He could delve and dig, and such
employment was a subject of scorn and contempt with
the haughty aboriginal warrior. At the same time he
practised the same wanderings and the same felicity
of aim, and in enduring the toils of the chase, he was
fairly the equal of his tawny but less enterprising
neighbour
.
The consciousness of these truthsa
consciousness
soon acquired from associationwas not less
familiar
to the Indian than to the Carolinian; and the
former
,
in consequence, despaired his charm, when
opposing
the white man hand to hand. His hope was in the
midnight surprisein the sudden onslaughtin the
terror inspired by his fearful whoopand in the awful
scalp-song with which he approached, making the
imagination of his foe an auxiliar to his own, as he
told him how he should rend away the dripping locks
from his scull, while his eyes swam in darkness, and
the pulses were yet flickering at his heart.
From cover to coverfrom tree to treethe
individual
Carolinians rushed on against their retreating
enemies. In this manner the fight became somewhat
pell-mell, and the opponents grew strangely mingled
together. Still, as each was busy with his particular
enemy, no advantage could well be taken of the
circumstance
on either side; and the hatchets of the
individual
combatants clashed under neighbouring trees, and
their knives were uplifted in the death-struggle over
the same stump, without any hope of assistance from
their friends in any form of their difficulty.
In this general state of things, there was one
exception
in the case of Harrison himself. He was
approached
resolutely in the course of the conflict by a
Coosaw warriora man of inferior size, even with his
tribe, the individuals of which were generally
diminutive
.
The dark eye of the swarthy foe, as he advanced
upon Harrison, was lighted up with a malignant
audacity
,
to be understood only by a reference to the
history
of his people. That people were now almost
exterminated
.
He was one of the few surviversa chief
a bold, brave mansubtle, active, and distinguished
for his skill as a warrior and hunter. He recognised
in Harrison the renowned
Coosah-moray-te
the leader
of the force which had uprooted his nation, and had
driven the warriors to the degrading necessity of
merging
their existence as a people with that of a
neighbouring
tribe. The old feeling of his country, and a
former war, was at work in his bosom, and through all
the mazes of the conflict he steadily kept his eye on
the course of Harrison. He alone sought himhe
alone singled him out for the fight. For a long time,
the nature of the struggle had prevented their meeting;
but he now approached the spot where Harrison stood,
holding at bay a tall Chestatee warrior from the
interior
of Georgia. The Chestatee was armed with the
common war-club, and had no other weapon. This
weapon is chiefly useful when confusion has been
introduced by the bowmen into the ranks of an enemy.
It is about two feet in length, and bears at its end, and
sometimes at both ends, a cross-piece of iron, usually
without any distinct form, but sometimes resembling
the blade of a spear, and not unfrequently that of a
hatchet. Harrison was armed with a sword, and had
besides, in his possession, the knifethe same broad,
cimeter-like weaponwhich had been given him by
Matiwan in his flight from Pocota-ligo. His rifle, which
he had not had time to reload, leaned against a tree, at
the foot of which stood Hector, with difficulty
restraining
,
and keeping back, with all his might, the impatient
dog Dugdale, which, by his master's orders, he had
remuzzled
.
This had been done in order to his safety.
It was only in pursuit that his services would have
been of avail; for though he might be of use in the
moment of strife, the chances were that he would have
been shot. Thus reposing, Hector was enabled to see
he approach of the Coosaw, and by an occasional
exhibition
of his own person and that of the dog, to deter him
from the attack which he had long meditated. But the
strife between Harrison and the Chestatee was about
to cease. That warrior, aiming a fierce blow at the
person of his enemy, drove the spear-head of his club
into the tree, and failing at the moment to disengage
it, fell a victim to the quicksightedness of his
opponent
.
Harrison's sword in that instant was sheathed in
the bosom of the Chestatee, who, as he received the
wound, sprung upwards from the ground, snapping the
slender weapon short at the hilt, the blade still
remaining
buried in his body. Harrison drew his knife,
and having for some time seen the purpose of the
Coosaw, he fortunately turned to meet him at the very
instant of his approach. Something surprised at the
fearlessness with which his enemy advanced to the
conflict, he spoke to him as they both paused at a few
paces from each other.
Thou art a Coosaw,exclaimed Harrison,I
know thee.
Chinnabar is the last chief of the Coosaw. He
wants blood for his people.
Thou knowest me, then? said Harrison.
Coosah-moray-te!
was the simple response; and
the dark eye glared, and the teeth of the savage gnashed
like those of the hungered wolf, as the name stirred
up all the associations in his mind of that war of
extermination
which the warrior before him had waged
against his people.
Aythe
Coosah-moray-te
is before thee.Would
Chinnabar follow his people? exclaimed the
Englishman
.
Chinnabar would have much blood for his people.
He would drink blood from the scull of
Coosah-moray-te
he
would show the scalp of the Coosah-moray-te to
the warriors of Coosaw, that wait for him in the Happy
Valley.
Thou shalt have no scalp of mine, friend
Chinnabar
.
I'm sorry to disappoint you, but I mustI can't
spare it. Come! I know you of old for a cunning
snakea snake lying in the dried bush. The foot of
the Coosah-moray-te will trample on thy head.
Harrison spoke fearlessly, for who, contrasting the
appearance of the two, would have thought the contest
doubtful? The Indian was scracely over five feet in
height, slender, and not well set; while his opponent,
fully six feet in height, a fine specimen of symmetrical
manhood, seemed able to crush him with a finger.
The Coosaw simply responded with something like a
smile of scorn,throwing himself at the same moment
like a ball at the feet of his enemy
Good!the snake is in the bush. Look!
Coosah-moray-te
put
the foot on his head.
The Englishman looked down upon him with
something
like surprise mingled in with his contempt, and
made no show of assault; but he was too well
acquainted
with Indian trick and manuvre to be thrown
off his guard by this movement. Curious to see
what would be the next effort of one who had
studiously
singled him out, he watched him carefully, and
the Indian, something balked that the enemy had not
taken him at his word and approached him while
in his prostrate condition, slowly uncoiled him from
his cluster, and had partially regained his feet, when
Harrison, who had been looking for him fully to do
so, was surprised in the next moment to find his
wily enemy directly between his legs. The
suddenness
of such a movement, though it failed to throw
him, as the Coosaw had calculated, yet disordered his
position not a little; and before he could strike a blow,
or do more than thrust one of his feet down upon him,
his active adversary had passed from his reach, having
I 3
made a desperate effort with his knife to hamstring
his adversary, as he leaped aside and turned suddenly
upon him. The rapidity of Harrison's movement alone
saved him, though even then not entirely, since the
knife grazed his leg, inflicting a sharp, though not
dangerous wound. He barely turned in time to meet
the preparation of the Coosaw for a second assault of
similar character; and something more ready at this
novel mode of attack, and vexed at its partial success,
Harrison looked with some impatience for his enemy's
approach, and felt a thrill of fierce delight as he saw
him leave with a bound the spot upon which he stood.
Sinking upon his knee as the savage rolled towards
him, he presented his knife, edge upward, to his
advance
.
What was his surprise to find that in so
stooping
,
he had only evaded a blow upon his bosom, which,
from his position, and the direction which the Indian
pursued, had he stood, the heels of his foe would
certainly
have inflicted. He saw from this that he must
now become the assailant; particularly as he perceived
that his mean were successfully pressing upon the
enemy
in every direction, and that the battle was
progressing
towards the river, and between it and the
Block House. Active as most men, Harrison was also
a man of ready decision; and with the thought came
the execution. With a bound he grappled the
Coosaw
,
who had not looked for an attack so sudden, and
no doubt had been fatigued by previous efforts.
Harrison
drove him back against a tree with all the muscle
of an extended arm, and thus forced the combat upon
him on his own terms. But even then the subtlety of
the savage did not fail him. He evaded the grasp,
and contrived to double once or twice completely under
the body of his opponent, until, exasperated by his
pertinacity
not less than at the agility with which the
Indian
eluded him, without stooping to where he wriggled
like a snake around him, the Englishman leaped upon
him with both feet, striking his heel securely down
upon the narrow of his sinuous back, and in this way
fastening him to the earth. In another instant and the
knife would have finished the combat, when the
conqueror
received a severe blow with a club, upon his
shoulder, from some unseen hand, which completely
staggered him; and before he could recover, he was
confronted by another warrior of the Coosaws, crying
to him in his own language in the exultation of
success
deemed secure, and thus cheering his prostrate
chief, Chinnabar
Coosah-moray-te
,I drink his blood, I tear his
threat, I have his scalpI hear his groanHi-chai!
'tis a dog for Opitchi-Manneyto!
At the cry, his former opponent rose from the
ground, not so much injured but that he could
recommence
the battle. They advanced at the same
moment
upon the Englishman, though from different
quarters. They came upon him with all their subtlety
and caution, for the two together could scarce have
contended with the superior strength of Harrison.
Taking his tree, he prepared for the worst; and with
his left arm so severely paralyzed by the blow that he
could do little more than throw it up in defence, he
yet held a good heart, and while he saw with what
malignity the two Coosaws had singled him out, he
had hope to meet them individually by the exercise of
some of those adroit arts which he too could employ
not less than the savage. But he was spared this trial.
The very instant of their simultaneous approach, a
gun-shot from the rear brought down the second
assailant
.
The surviver, Chinnabar, as if exasperated
beyond reason at the event, now precipitated himself
forward, tomahawk in hand, upon his foe, was foiled
by the ready agility which encountered him, put aside,
and almost in the same instant hurled like a stone to
the ground by the now fully aroused Englishman.
Coosawthou art the last chief of thy people.
The cunning serpent will die by the
Coosah-moray-te
,
like the rest, said Harrison, addressing the
conquered
savage, who lay motionless, but still alive, at
his feet.
The Coosah-moray-te will strike. Chinnabar is
the last chief of the Coosawhis people have gone
they wait for him with the cry of a bird. Let the
pale-face
strike. Ah! ah!
The knife was in his heart. Vainly the eyes rolled
in a fruitless angerthe teeth fixed for ever, while
gnashing in fury, in the death spasm. A short groan
a word, seemingly of songand the race of the
Coosaws was for ever ended.
Harrison rose and looked round for the person whose
timely shot had saved him from the joint attack of the
two warriors. He discovered him advancing in the
person of Hector, who, having fastened Dugdale to a
sapling, had reloaded the musketoon of his master,
and by his intervention at the proper moment, had no
doubt preserved his life. Unaccustomed, however,
to the use of gunpowder, the black had overcharged
the piece, and the recoil had given him a shock which,
at the moment, he was certain could not have been
a jot less severe than that which it inflicted upon the
Coosaw he had slain. His jaws ached, he bitterly
alleged, whenever, years after, he detailed the fight
with the Yemassee on the banks of the Pocota-ligo.
Hectorthou hast saved my life, said Harrison,
as he came up to him.
I berry glad, mossa, was the natural reply.
Where's Dugdale?
In de treeI hook 'em wid rope, when I load for
shoot de Injin.
Bring him, and set him loose.
The black did as he was told, and harking him on
the track of the flying Indians, Harrison seized and
reloaded his rifle, while Hector possessed himself of
a knife and hatchet which he picked up upon the field.
They then proceeded hastily to overtake the
Carolinians
,
who, at a little distance, were pressing upon the
retreating enemy. Harrison came in time to give his
influence and energy where they were most needed.
The flying force were met by the party from the
Block House, under Ishiagaska and the pirate, and the
fight commenced anewa sort of running fight,
however
,
for the Indians grew weary of a contest in which
they had none of those advantages of number or
circumstance
which usually encourage them to war;
and so trifling was the force of whites now remaining
with them under Chorley, that their presence rather
induced despondency than hope. The pirate himself
was much discouraged by the nature of the strife, for
which he did not dream that the Carolinians would
have been so well prepared; and the loss which he had
sustained, so disproportioned to his force, had not a
little exaggerated his discontent. His disquiet was
destined to find still further increase in the new
assault
;
two more of his men, not so well sheltered as
they should have been, or more venturous, having been
shot down near a tree immediately adjoining that
behind
which he stood; and though the Indians still
continued
to fight, he saw that they could not be encouraged
to do so long; as, even if successful in killing, they
had no opportunity of obtaining the scalps of the slain,
the best evidence with them of their triumph. The
Carolinians still pressed on, their numbers greatly
increased
by the presence of several slaves, who,
volunteering
even against the will of their masters, had
armed themselves with knives or clubs, and by their
greater numbers held forth a prospect of ultimately
hemming in the smaller force of their enemy. This
was an ally upon which the Spaniards had largely
calculated. They had no idea of that gentler form of
treatment which, with the Carolinians, won the
affections
of their serviles; and knowing no other
principle
in their own domestic government than that of fear,
and assured of the instability of any confidence built
upon such a relationship between the ruler and the
serf, they had miscalculated greatly when they
addressed
their bribes and promises to the negroes, as
well as to the Indians of Carolina. But few joined
themthe greater number, volunteering for their
owners, were taken actually into the employment of
the colony, and subsequently rewarded in proportion
to their services and merits.
18
The engagement became a flight. From point to
point the Carolinians pursued their enemyChorley
the seaman, and Ishiagaska, alone endeavouring, by
the most ardent effort, to stimulate the courage of
their followers, and maintain the show of fight. But
in vain. The whites pressed closely upon the heels of
the fugitives, who were at length suddenly brought up
by a severe fire directly upon their path from the
concealed
party under Grayson. This completed their
panic; and each darting in the direction given him by
his fears, sought for individual safety. There was no
longer the form of a battle array among them, and the
negroes cleared the woods with their clubs, beating
out the brains of those they overtook, almost without
having any resistance offered them. The day dawned
upon the forest, and every step of the route taken by
the combatants was designated by blood.
CHAPTER XXIV.
Away, away,I hold thee as my spoil,
To bless and cheer meworthy of my toil
Let them pursueI have thee, thou art mine,
With life to keep, and but with life resign.
Day
dawned, and the sun rose clearly and beautifully
over the scattered bands of the forest. The Indians
were fairly defeated, Ishiagaska slain, and Chorley,
the pirate, uninfluenced by any of those feelings of
nationality in the present case, which would have
prompted him to a desperate risk of his own person in
a struggle so utterly unlooked-for, as soon as he saw
the final and complete character of the defeat, silently
withdrew, with his few remaining followers, from
farther
conflict. He had another care upon his hands
beside that of his own safety. There was one reward
one spoilwith which he consoled himself for his
disaster
and
that was Bess Matthews. Filled with a
fierce passion, as he thought of her, he took his way,
unseen by the victorious Carolinians, towards the little
cot on the river's edge, in which he had left his
prisoners
.
Circumstances had materially altered from
what they were at the time when they became so. He
was no longer able to control, with an imposing and
superior force, the progress, either of his Indian allies
or of his Carolinian enemies. He had not foreseen,
any more than the Yemassees, the state of preparation
in which the settlers about the Pocota-ligo had met
the invasion. He had looked to find invasion and
conquest
oneand had never dreamed of opposition, much
less of a defence which would prove so completely
successful. The energies of a single man, his address,
farsightedness, and circumspection, had done all this.
To the perseverance and prudence of Harrisonhis
devotedness to the cause he had undertaken, the
borderers
owed their safety. But of this the pirate chief
knew nothing; and, anticipating no such provident
management, he had fearlessly leagued himself with
the savages, stimulated by passions as sanguinary as
theirs, and without that redeeming sense of national
character and feelingthat genuine love of country,
which not only accounted for, but exculpated the people
of whom he was the unworthy ally. But he had lost all
that he came forall objects but one. His best
followers
had fallen victimshis hope of spoil had in
great part been defeated, and though he had shed blood,
the quantity was as nothing to one with whom such
had been a familiar indulgence. Yet, with a
voluptuous
appetite, he had won a prize which promised him
enjoyment, if it could not compensate his losses. The
beautiful Bess Matthewsthe young, the budding, the
sweet. She was in his powera trembling dove in
the grasp of the fowler. The thought was as so much
fire to his fancy, and he sought the cottage in which
he had secured her with a fierce and feverish thirst
a brutal sense at work in his mind, stimulating him to
an utter disregard of humanity, and prompting the
complete
violation of all ties of kindred, as he meditated
to tear her away from the bosom of her parents.
About a mile from the hovel in which the family of
the pastor was immured lay the guarda-costa. There
was an air of bustle on board of her, in the unreefing
of sails, and the waving and rustling of her ropes.
The tide of battle had alternated from spot to spot
along the banks of the rivernow lost in the density
of the forest, and now finding a full reverberation from
the bosom of the water. The firing had alarmed all
parties, the seamen remaining on board, not less than
the old pastor and his timid wife and trembling
daughter
,
who, only conscious of the struggle, and not of its
results, were filled with a thousand tearful anticipations.
To Bess Matthews, however, the strife brought with
it a promise, since it proved that the Carolinians were
prepared, in part at least, with their invadersand
many were the fluctuations of hope and fear in her
soul, as the gathering clamour now approached and
now receded in the distance. Love taught her that
Harrison was the leader making such bold head against
the enemylove promised her, as the battle dissipated,
that he would come and rescue her from a position in
which she did not well know whether to regard herself
as a captive to the seaman, or as one owing him
gratitude
for her own and the preservation of her family.
She remembered his lustful eye and insolent speech
and gesture, and she trembled as she thought of it.
True, her father knew him in his boyhood, but his
account of him was rather tolerant than favourable;
and the subsequent life and conduct of the licentious
rovernot to speak of the suspicions openly
entertained
of his true character by her lover, all taught her
to fear the protection which he had given, and to dread,
while she seemed to anticipate, the price of it.
She had no long time for doubt, and but little for
deliberation. He camebloody with conflictcovered
with dust, blackened with gunpowderthe fierce flame
of war in his eye, and in his hand the bared weapon,
streaked with fresh stains, only partially covered with
the sand through which it had been drawn. His
manner
was impatient and stern, as, without addressing
either of his captives, he called aside and gave
directions
to his seamen. The pastor craved his attention,
but he waved his hand impatiently, nor turned to him
for an instant, until he had despatched two of his men
to the edge of the stream, where, well concealed by
the shrubbery upon its banks, lay the small boat of the
vessel, which had been carefully placed there by his
orders. They gave him a shrill whistle as they reached
it, which he immediately returnedthen approaching
the pastor, he scrupled not an instant in the
development
of the foul design which he had all along
meditated
.
Hark ye, Matthewsthis is no place for us now
I can't protect ye any longer. I havn't the menthey
are cut upslasheddeadeleven of the finest
fellows
best
men of my vesselby this time, without a
scalp among them. I have done my best to save you,
but it's all over, and there's but one wayyou must go
with us on board.
How, Chorleygo with youand wherefore? I
cannotI will not.
What, will not? Do you think I'll let you stay to
lose your scalps, and this sweet darling here? No,
by my soul, I were no man to suffer it. You shall go.
What mean you, Chorley? Are the savages
successful
have
they defeated our men?And you
wherefore do you flyhow have you foughtwith us
for our people?
The old pastor, half bewildered, urged these
questions
incoherently, but yet with such directness of aim
as almost to bewilder the person he addressed, who
could not well answer them. How, as he argued, if
the Yemassees have defeated the Carolinianshow
was it that Chorley, who had evidently been their ally,
could not exert his power and protect them? and, on
the other hand, if the Carolinians had been the victors,
wherefore should they fly from their own people?
Unable well to meet these propositions, the native
fierce impetuosity of the pirate came to his relief, and
throwing aside entirely the conciliatory manner of his
first address, he proceeded in a style more congenial
with his true character.
Shall I stay all day disputing with you about this
nonsense? I tell you, you shall go, whether you will
or not. Look, I have the powerlook at these men
can you withstand them? In a word, they force you
to the ship, and all your talkingay, and all your
struggling, will help you nothing. Comeaway.
Nevernever! Oh father, let us die first! was
the involuntary exclamation of the maiden, convulsively
clinging to the old man's arm as the ruffian took a
step towards her.
Captain Chorley, I cannot think you mean this
violence! said the old man with dignity.
May I be dd, said he fiercely, but I do! What,
old man, shall I leave you here to be made mincemeat
of by the Indians? No, no! I love you and your pretty
daughter too well for that. Come, sweetheart, don't
be shywhat! do you fear me, then?
Touch me nottouch me not with your bloody
hands. Away! I will not gostrike me dead first
strike me dead, but I will not go.
But you shall! what! think you I am a child to be
put off with words and pretty speeches? What, ho!
there, boysdo as I have told you.
In a moment, the pastor and his child were torn
asunder.
Fatherhelphelp! I lose theemotherfather
Gabriel!
Villain, release megive me back my child. Undo
your holdyou shall suffer for this. Ha! ha! ha!
they comethey come! Hurry, hurry, my people.
Hereherewe are herethey tear away my child.
Where are youoh, Harrison, but come nowcome
now, and she is yoursonly save her from the hands
of this fierce ruffian. They comethey come!
They did comethe broad glare of sunlight on the
edge of the forest was darkened by approaching
shadows
.
A shotanother and another was heardand
the fugitives, who were Indians flying from the
pursuing
Carolinians, rushed forward headlong; but as they
saw the group of whites on the river's brink, thinking
them new enemies, they darted aside, and taking
another
route, buried themselves in the forest out of sight
just as their pursuers came forth upon the scene. A
single glance of Bess Matthews, as the ruffian suddenly
seized upon and bore her to the boat, distinguished the
manly form of her lover darting out of the thicket and
directly upon the path approaching them. That glance
gave her new hopenew couragenew strength! She
shrieked to him in a voice delirious with terror and
hope, as the pirate, steadying himself in the water,
placed her in the boat in which sat two of his seamen.
Come to me, Gabrielsave me, save me, or I
perish. It is Ithy own Bessever thinesave me,
save me.
She fell back fainting with exhaustion and
excitement
,
and lay nerveless and almost senseless in the
arms of her abductor. He sustained her with perfect
ease with one arm upon his bosom, while, standing
erect, for the boat scarce permitted him with his
burden
to do otherwise, he placed his foot upon the
slender rudder and guided its progress, his men
looking
round occasionally and suggesting the course of
the vessel. In this way, he kept his eye upon shore,
and beheld the progress of events in that quarter.
The cries of his betrothed had taught Harrison the
condition of affairs. He saw her precarious situation
at a glance, and rushing down to the beach, followed
by his men, the seamen fled along the banks higher
up the river, and were soon out of sight, leaving the
old pastor and his lady free. The scene before him
was too imposing in the eye of Harrison to permit of
his giving the fugitives a thought. But the pastor, now
free from restraint, with a speechless agony rushed
forward to him, and clasping his arm, pointed with
his finger to the form of his daughter, hanging like a
broken flower, supine, and almost senseless, upon the
shoulder of her Herculean captor. The action of
Harrison was immediate, and in a moment, the
musketoon
was lifted to his shoulder, his eye ranging upon
the sight, and singling out the exposed breast of the
pirate, which lay uncovered, but just alongside of the
drooping head of the maiden. As the seaman saw the
movement, he changed her positionshe saw it too,
and lifting her hand, placed it, with an emphasis not to
be mistaken, upon her heart. The old man rushed
forward, and seizing Harrison, cried to him
convulsively
,
while the tears trickled down his cheeks
Stay thy handstay thy handshoot not; rather
let me lose her, but let her livethou wilt slay her,
thou wilt slay my childmy own, my only child, and
he tottered like an infant in his deep agony.
Away, old manaway! and with the words, with
a terrible strength, Harrison hurled him headlong upon
the sands. Without a pause the fearful instrument
was again upliftedthe aim was taken,his finger
rested on the trigger, but his heart sickenedhis head
swamhis eyes grew blind and dizzy ere he drew it;
and with a shiver of convulsion, he let the weapon
descend heavily to the ground. The weakness was
only momentary. A faint scream came to his ears
over the water, and brought back with it all his
strength. The maiden had watched closely all his
motions, and the last had given her energy somewhat
to direct them. That scream aroused him. He
resumed
his position and aim; and fixing the sight upon
that part of the bosom of his enemy least concealed,
nerved himself to all the hazard, and resolutely drew
the trigger. The effect was instantaneous. The
next instant the maiden was seen released from the
pirate's grasp and sinking down in the bottom of the
boat, while he stood erect. The venerable pastor
fainted, while, on her knees, his aged wife bent over
him in silent prayer. That moment was more than
death to Harrison; but what was his emotion of delight
when, at the next, he beheld the pirate, like some
gigantic tree that has kept itself erect by its own
exceeding
weight, fall, like a tower, headlong over the
side of the boat, stiff and rigid, and without a struggle,
sink deeply and silently down beneath the overclosing
waters. But a new danger awaited the maiden; for in
his fall, destroying the equipoise of the skiff, its entire
contents were at the next instant precipitated into the
stream; and while the two seamen, unhurt, struck off
towards the vessel, the maiden lay in sight, sustained
above the surface only by the buoyancy of her dress,
and without exhibiting any other motion. A dozen
sinewy arms from the shore at once struck the water,
but which of all, nerved as he was by the highest
stimulant of man's nature, could leave the fearless
Harrison behind him. On he dashes, ononnow
he nears her,another moment and she is saved; but
while every eye was fixed as with a spell upon the
prospect
with an anxiety inexpressible, the sullen gushing
waters went over her, and a universal cry of horror
arose from the shore.But she rose again in an
instant, and with a show of consciousness, stretching
out her hand, the name of Gabriel, in a tone of
imploring
love, reached the ears of her lover. That
tone, that word, was enough, and the next moment
found her insensible in his arms. She was a child in
his grasp, for the strength of his fearless and
passionate
spirit, not less than of his native vigour, was active
to save her.
Helphelp, was his cry to the rest, and to the
shore;he sustained her till it came. It was not
long ere she lay in the arms of her parents, whose
mutual tears and congratulations came sweetly, along
with their free consent, to make her preserver happy
with the hand hitherto denied him.
CHAPTER XXV.
Another stroke for triumph. It goes well,
The foe gives backhe yields. Another i
Beholds us on his neck.
Harrison
, thus blessed with happiness, appropriated
but little time, however, to its enjoyment. His mind
was of that active sort, that even the sweets of love
were to be enjoyed by him as a stimulant, rather than
a clog to exertion. Conveying the little family to a
recess in the woods, and out of sight of the craft of
the pirate, he immediately proceeded, having first led
the foresters aside, to explain his further desires to
them in reference to their common duties.
Joy, my brave fellows, and thanks to you, for this
last night's good service. You have done well, and
risked yourselves nobly. Grayson, give me your hand
you are a good soldier. Where's your brother?
Here! was the single word of response given
from the rear by the lips of Hugh Grayson, the
younger. The tone of the monosyllable was
melancholy
,
but not sullen. Harrison advanced to him, and
extended his hand.
Master Grayson, to you we owe most of our
safety to-day. But for you, the sun would have found
few of us with a scalp on. Your activity in bringing
up the men has saved us; for, though otherwise safe
enough, the firing of the Block House must have been
fatal to all within. For myself, I may freely
acknowledge
,
my life, at this moment, is due to your timely
appearance. Your command, too, was excellently
managed for so young a soldier. Accept my thanks,
sir, in behalf of the country not less than of myself.
I shall speak to you again on this subject, and in
regard to other services in which your aid will be
required
,
after a while.
The youth looked upon Harrison with a degree of
surprise, which prevented him from making any
adequate
answer. Whence came that air of conscious
superiority in the speakerthat tone of command
of a power unquestionable, and held as if born with it
in his possession. The manner of Harrison had all
the ease and loftiness of a prince and, scarcely less
than the crowd around him, the proud-spirited youth
felt a degree of respectful awe stealing over him, of
which he began to grow ashamed. But before he
could recover in time to exhibit any of that rash and
imperious rusticity which the lowlier born of strong
native mind is so apt to show in the presence of the
conventional superior, the speaker had again addressed
the crowd.
And you, men, you have all done well for the
country, and it owes you its gratitude.
Ay, that it does, captain, said Nichols, advancing
that it does. We have stood by her in the hour of
her need. We have resisted the approach of the
bloody invader, and with liberty or death for our motto,
we have rushed to the conflict, sir, defying
consequences
.
Ah, Nicholsyou are welcome, both in what you
have done and what you have said. I might have
known that the country was safe in your hands,
knowing
as I do your general sentiments on the subject
of the liberties of the people. Granville county,
Nichols, must make you her representative after this,
and I'm sure she will. The speaker smiled
sarcastically
as he spoke, but Nichols had no sight for such
an expression. He replied earnestly:
Ah, captain'twere an honour;and could my
fellow-countrymen be persuaded to look upon me with
your eyes, proud would I be to stand up for their rights,
and with the thunders of my voice, compel that justice
from the assembly which, in denying representation
to all dissenters, they have most widely departed from.
Ay, captainfellow-citizenspermit me to address
you now upon a few topics most important to your
own liberties, and to the common benefit of humanity.
My voice
Must just at this moment be unheard, interrupted
Harrison; we have need of other thunders now.
Hear me, gentlemen, for this I have called you together.
I want from among you thirty volunteershardy,
whole-souled fellows, who do not count heads in a
scuffle. The enterprise is dangerous, and must be
executedvery dangerous I say, and I beg that none
may offer but those who are perfectly ready at any
momentto use the words of Dr. Nicholsto die for
the country. The doctor himself, however, must not
go, as he is too important to us in his surgical capacity.
Nichols, well pleased with the exception thus made,
was not however willing to appear so, and, glad of the
opportunity, could not forbear making something of
a popular hit.
How, captainthis may not be. I am not one of
those, sir, altogether content to be denied the privilege
of dying for my country when occasion calls for it.
Let me go on this serviceI insist. I am one of the
people, and will forego none of their dangers.
Oh, well, if you insist upon it, of course I can say
nothingwe hold you pledged, therefore. There are
now three of usMaster Hugh Grayson, I presume to
place you, as one with myself and Dr. Nichols,
volunteering
upon this service. I understand you so.
The high compliment, and the delicate manner in
which it was conveyed, totally disarmed young
Grayson
,
who, softened considerably by the proceeding,
bowed his head in assent, approaching by degrees to
where Harrison stood. Nichols, on the other hand,
had not contemplated so easily getting the permission
which he called for, and well knowing his man,
Harrison
barely gave it, as he foresaw it would not be long
before he would assume new ground, which would
bring about a ready evasion of his responsibility. The
elder Grayson meanwhile volunteered also, followed
by several others, and in a little time the required
number was almost complete. But the surgeon now
demanded to know the nature of the service.
What matters it, doctorit is an honourable,
because
a dangerous service. You shall know in time.
That does not suit me, captain. What,shall I
suffer myself to be led blindfold upon a duty, the
propriety
of which may be doubtful, not less than the
policy
?
SirI object upon principle?
Principleindeed, doctor, said Harrison, smiling.
Why, what in the name of pounds and shillings has
principle to do in this business?
Enough, sirthe rights of manof the people of
the country, are all involved. Do I not, sir, in thus
volunteering upon a service of which I know nothing,
put myself under the control of one who may make me
a traitor to my countrya defier of the laws, and
probably
a murderer of my fellow-man? Sir, what
security
have I of the morality and the lawfulness of your
proceeding?
Very trueyou are right, and such being your
opinions, I think you would err greatly to volunteer in
this business, was the grave response of Harrison.
Ah, I knew you would agree with me, captainI
knew it, cried the doctor, triumphantly.
I want another man or twowe are something
short.
As the leader spoke Hector came forward, his head
hanging on one shoulder, as if he feared rebuff for
his presumption, in the unlooked-for proffer of service
which he now made.
Mossayou let Hector go, he glad too much. He
no want stay here wid de doctor and de 'omans.
His reference to the demagogue, accompanied as it
was with an ill-concealed chuckle of contempt,
provoked
the laughter of the crowd; and observing that
the greater number looked favourably upon the
proposal
of the negro, Harrison consented.
You will knock a Spaniard on the head, sir, if I
bid you?
Yes, mossa, and scalp 'em too, jist like dem
Injin
.
You shall go.
Vol. II.K 19
Tankeedat's a good mossa. Hello, da and
perfectly overjoyed, he broke out with a stanza of negro
minstrelsy common, even now, to the slaves of
Carolina
He come rainhe come shine,
Hab a good mossa, who da care?
De black is de white and de white is de black,
Hab a good mossa, who da care?
But look out, nigger, when misses come
Hah! den de wedder will alter some
If she cross,Oh!who for say,
You ebber again see sunshine day?
How long Hector might have gone on with his
uncouth
,
and, so far as the sex is interested, ungallant
minstrelsy
,
may not well be said; but seeing its direction,
his master silenced it in a sufficiently potent manner.
Be still, sirrah, or you shall feed on hickory.
No hab stomach for 'em, mossa. I dumb.
'Tis well. Now, men, see to your weapons
hatchets and knives for allwe shall need little else,
but fearless hearts and strong hands. Our purpose is
to seize upon that pirate vessel in the river.
The men started with one accord.
Ay, no less. It's a perilous service, but not so
perilous as it appears. I happen to know that there
are now not two men on board of the vessel
accustomed
to the management of the gunsnot fifteen on
board in all. Granger has got us boats in plenty, and
I have conceived a plan by which we shall attack her
on all points. Something of our success will depend
upon their consciousness of weakness. They are
without a commander, and their men accustomed to
fighting are in our woods dead or running, and in no
ability to serve them. The show of numbers, and ten
or a dozen boats with stout men approaching them,
will do much with their fears. We shall thus board
them with advantage; and though I hope not to
escape
with all of us unhurt, I am persuaded we shall
be successful without much loss. Master Hugh
Grayson
will command three of the boats, Master Walter
Grayson three others, and the rest will be with me.
You have now heard. If, like the doctor here, any of
you object to proceeding, on principle, against this
pirate
who has sought the destruction of our people,
well and goodthey are at liberty to withdraw, and
we shall look for other men less scrupulous. Who is
ready?
The confident,almost careless manner of the
speaker, was of more effect than his language. The
cry was unanimous:
Lead onwe are ready.
I thank you, my merry men, and old England
for ever! Master Hugh Grayson, and you, friend
Walter,let us counsel here a moment.
He led them aside, and together they matured the
plan of attack. Then leaving them to parcel off the
men, Harrison stole away for a few moments into the
silent grove where the pastor's family was sheltered.
As we have no business there, we can only conjecture
the motive of his visit. A press of the hand from the
beloved one were much to one about to go upon an
adventure of life and death. He returned in a few
moments with increased alacrity, and led the way to
the boats, eleven in number, which Granger in the
meantime had selected from those employed by the
Indians in crossing the preceding night. They were
small, but sufficiently large for the men apportioned to
each. In their diminutiveness, too, lay much of their
safety from the great guns of the vessel.
Leading the way, the boat of Harrison, followed by
those in his charge, shot ahead of the rest, bearing
down full upon the broadside of the pirate. This was
the most dangerous point of approach. The two
Graysons led their separate force, the one to reach the
opposite side, the other at the stern lights, in order
that the attack should be simultaneous at all
vulnerable
places. In this manner the six boats covered the
various assailable points of the vessel; and
necessarily
,
by dividing their force for the protection of each
quarter, weakened the capacity of the seamen to
contend
with them.
K 2
The pirate lay at about a mile and a half below
them upon the riverher form in perfect reposeand
even weaker in her force than Harrison had
conjectured
.
Bewildered with his situation, and
unaccustomed
to command, the inferior officer, left in
temporary
charge of her by Chorley, had done nothing, and
indeed could do nothing towards the defence of his
vessel. The few men left with him had become
refractory
;
and with the reputed recklessness of men in
their way of life, had proceeded, during the absence
of Chorley, whom they feared rather than respected,
to all manner of excess. Liquor, freely distributed
by the commanding officer, with the hope to pacify,
had only the effect of stimulating their violence; and
the approach of the assailing party, magnified by their
fears and excesses, found them without energy to
resist
,
and scarcely ability to fly. The lieutenant did
indeed endeavour to bring them to some order and
show of defence. With his own hand he rigged up a
gun, which he pointed among the approaching boats.
The scattering and whizzing shot would have been
fatal, had the aim been better; but apprehension and
excitement had disturbed too greatly the mental
equilibrium
of officer and men alike; and not anticipating
such a result to their adventure, and having no thought
themselves of being attacked where they had come to
be assailants, they fell into a panic from which they
did not seek to recover. The failure of the shot to
injure their enemies completed their apprehension;
and, as the little squadron of Harrison continued to
approach, without fear and without obstruction, the
refractory seamen let down their own boats in the
direction
of the opposite shore, and, so considerably in
advance of the Carolinians as to defy pursuit, were
seen by them pulling with all industry towards the
Indian
country. A single man, the lieutenant, appeared
on board for a few moments after they had left the
vessel; but whether he remained from choice, or that
they refused to take him with them, was at that time
a mystery to the assailing party. His design may be
guessed at in the sequel.
Despatching the Graysons in pursuit of the flying
pirates, whose number did not exceed ten men,
Harrison
brought his boat alongside the vessel, and
resolutely
leaped on board. But where was the lieutenant
he had seen but a few minutes before? He called
aloud, and traversed the deck in search of him, but in
vain. He was about to descend to the cabin, when
he felt himself suddenly seized upon by Hector, who,
with looks of excited terror, dragged him forward to
the side of the vessel, and with a directing finger and
a single word, developed their full danger to his master.
Mossade ship da burnlook at de smokejump,
mossa, for dear lifejump in de water. It needed
no second wordthey sprang over the side of the
vessel
at the same instant that an immense body of dense
sulphureous vapour ascended from below. The river
received them, for their boat had been pushed off, with
a proper precaution, to a little distance. Ere they
were taken up, the catastrophe was overthe
explosion
had taken place, and the sky was blackened with
the smoke and fragments of the vessel upon which,
but a few moments before, they had stood in perfect
safety. But where was the lieutenant?where? He
had been precipitate in his application of the match,
and his desperation found but a single victim in
himself
!
CHAPTER XXVI.
It is the story's picturewe must group,
So that the eye may see what the quick mind
Has chronicled before. The painter's art
Is twin unto the poet'sboth were born,
That truth might have a tone of melody,
And fancy shape her motion into grace.
A motley
assemblage gathered at the Chief's Bluff,
upon the banks of the Pocota-ligo, at an early hour on
the day so full of incident. A fine day after so foul a
promisethe sun streamed brightly, and the skies
without
a cloud looked down peacefully over the settlement.
But there was little sympathy among the minds of the
borderers with such a prospect. They had suffered
quite too much, and their sufferings were quite too
fresh in their minds, properly to feel it. Worn out
with fatigue, and not yet recovered from their trials
and terrorsnow struggling onward with great effort,
and now borne in the arms of the more able-bodied
among the men, came forward the women and children
who had been sheltered in the Block House. That
structure was now in ashesso indeed, generally
speaking, were all the dwellings between that point
and Pocota-ligo. Below the former point, however,
thanks to the manful courage and ready appearance of
Hugh Grayson with the troop he had brought up, the
horrors of the war had not extended. But in all other
quarters, the insurrection had been successful. Far
and wide, scattering themselves in bands over every
other part of the colony, the Yemassees and their
numerous allies were carrying the terrors of their arms
through the unprepared and unprotected settlement,
down to the very gates of Charlestownthe chief
town and principal rallying point of the Carolinians,
and there the inhabitants were literally walled in,
unable
to escape unless by sea, and then, only from the
country. But this belongs elsewhere. The group
now assembled upon the banks of the Pocota-ligo,
absorbed
as they were in their own grievances, had not
thought of the condition of their neighbours. The
straits and sufferings of the other settlements were
utterly unimagined by them generally. But one
person
of all the group properly conjectured the extent
of the insurrectionthat was Harrison. He had been
a part witness to the leaguehad counted the various
tribes represented in that gloomy dance of deaththe
club and scalp-dancethe rites of demoniac
conception
and origin;and he felt that the very escape of
the people around him only arose from the
concentration
of the greater force of the savages upon the more
populous settlements of the Carolinians. Full of
satisfaction
that so many had been saved, his mind was yet
crowded with the thousand apprehensions that came
with his knowledge of the greater danger to which the
rest of the colony was exposed. He knew the strong
body commanded by Sanutee to be gone in the
direction
of the Ashley river settlement. He knew that a
force of Spaniards was expected to join them from St.
Augustine, but whether by sea or land was yet to be
determined. He felt the uncertainty of his position,
and how doubtful was the condition of the province
under such an array of enemies; but with a mind still
cheerful, he gave his orders for the immediate remove,
by water, to the city; and having completed his
preparations
as well as he might, and while the
subordinates
were busied in procuring boats, he gave himself,
for a brief time, to the family of Bess Matthews.
Long and sweet was the murmuring conversation
carried
on between the lovers. Like a stream relieved
from the pressure of the ice, her affections now poured
themselves freely into his. The consent of her father
had been given, even if his scruples had not been
withdrawn, and that was enough. Her hand rested in
the clasp of his, and the unrebuking eyes of the old
Puritan gave it a sufficient sanction. Matthews may
have sought, in what he then said, to satisfy himself of
the necessity for his consent, if he had failed to satisfy
his conscience.
She is yours, Captain Harrisonshe is yours!
But for you, but for you, God knows, and I dread to
think, what would have been her fate in the hands of
that bad man. Bad from his cradle, for I knew him
from that time, and knew that, mischief then, and
crime when he grew older, were his familiar
play-mates
,
and his most companionable thoughts.
You were slow in discovering it, sir, was the
reply
of Harrisoncertainly slow in acknowledging it
to me.
I had a hope, Master Harrison, that he had grown
a wiser and a better man, and was therefore unwilling
to mortify him with the recollection of the past, or of
making it public to his ill-being. But let us speak of
him no more. There are other topics far more
grateful
in the recollection of our escape from this dreadful
night; and long and fervent should be our prayers to
the benevolent Providence who has had us so
affectionately
in his care. But what now are we to do,
Captain Harrisonwhat is our hope of safety, and
where are we to go?
I have thought of all this, sir. There is but one
course for us, and that is to place the young and feeble
safely in Charlestown. There is no safety short of
that point.
Hownot at Port Royal Island?
No! not even therewe shall be compelled to
hurry past it now as rapidly as possible in our way to
the place of refugethe only place that can now
certainly
be considered such.
Whatshall we go by water?
There is no other way. By this time, scarce a
mile of wood between Pocota-ligo and Charlestown
itself but is filled by savages. I saw the force last
night, and that with which we contended was nothing
to the numbers pledged in this insurrection. They
did not look for resistance here, and hence the
smallness
of their numbers in this quarter.
And to your wise precautions, Master Harrison,
we owe all this. How unjust I have been to you, sir!
Speak not of it, Master Matthewsyou have more
than atoned in the rich possession which I now hold.
Ah, Bess!I see you look for the promised secret.
Well, it shall be told. But stayI have a duty.
Pardon me a while.
He rose as he spoke, and made a signal to Hector,
who now came forward with the dog Dugdale, which
had been wounded with an arrow in the side, not
seriously
,
but painfully, as was evident from the
writhings
and occasional moanings of the animal, while
Hector busied himself plastering the wound with the
resinous gum of the pine-tree.
Hector, said his master, as he approachedgive
me Dugdale. Henceforward I shall take care of him
myself.
Sa! mossa, exclaimed the negro, with an
expression
almost of terrified amazement in his countenance.
Yes, Hector,you are now free.I give you your
freedom, old fellow. Here is money too, and in
Charlestown you shall have a house to live in for
yourself
.
No, mossa.I can't, sirI can't be free, replied
the negro, shaking his head, and endeavouring to
resume
possession of the strong cord which secured the
dog, and which Harrison had taken into his own hand.
Why can't you, Hector? What do you mean?
Am I not your master? Can't I make you free, and
don't I tell you that I do make you free? From this
moment you are your own master.
Wha'-for, mossa? Wha' Hector done, you guine
turn um off dis time o' day?
Done! You have saved my life, old fellowyou
have fought for me like a friend, and I am now your
friend, and not any longer your master.
Ki, mossa! enty you always been frien' to Hector?
Enty you gib um physic when he sick, and come see
K 3
and talk wid um, and do ebbery ting he want you for
do? What more you guine do, now?
Yes, Hector, I have done for you all thisbut I
have done it because you were my slave, and because
I was bound to do it.
Ah, you no want to be boun' any longer. Da's it!
I see. You want Hector for eat acorn wid de hog, and
take de swamp wid de Injin, enty?
Not so, old fellowbut I cannot call you my slave
when I would call you my friend. I shall get another
slave to carry Dugdale, and you shall be free.
I dam to hell, mossa, if I guine to be free! roared
the adhesive black, in a tone of unrestrainable
determination
.
I can't loss you company, and who de
debble Dugdale will let feed him like Hector? 'Tis
unpossible, mossa, and dere's no use to talk 'bout it.
De ting aint right; and enty I know wha' kind of ting
freedom is wid black man? Ha! you make Hector
free, he come wuss more nor poor buckrahhe tief
out of de shophe get drunk and lie in de ditchden,
if sick come, he roll, he toss in de wet grass of de
stable. You come in de morning, Hector deadand,
who knowhe no take physic, he no hab parson
who know, I say, mossa, but de debble fine em 'fore
anybody else? No, mossayou and Dugdale berry
good company for Hector. I tank God he so good
I no want any better.
The negro was positive, and his master, deeply
affected
with this evidence of his attachment, turned
away in silence, offering no further obstruction to the
desperate hold which he again took of the wounded
Dugdale. Approaching the little group from which but
a few moments before he had parted, he stood up in
earnest conversation with the pastor, while the hand
of Bess, in confiding happiness and innocence, was
suffered
to rest passively in his own. It was a moment
of delirious rapture to both parties. But there was
one who stood apart, yet surveying the scene, to whom
it brought a pang little short of agony. This was the
younger Grayson. Tears started to his eyes as he
beheld them, and he turned away from the group in
a suffering anguish, that, for the moment, brought back
those sterner feelings which he had hitherto so well
suppressed. The eye of Harrison caught the
movement
,
and readily divined its cause. Calling Granger
to him, he demanded from him a small packet which
he had intrusted to his care on leaving the Block House
for Pocota-ligo the evening before. The question
disturbed
the trader not a little, who, at length, frankly
contessed he had mislaid it.
Say not so, man! think!that packet is of
value, and holds the last treaty of the colony with the
Queen of St. Helena, and the Cassique of Combahee
not to speak of private despatches, set against which
thy worthless life would have no value! Look, man,
as thou lovest thy quiet!
It is here, sirall in safety, as thou gavest it him,
said the wife of the trader, coming forward. In the
hurry of the fight he gave it me for safe-keeping, though
too much worried to think afterward of the trust.
Thou art a strong-minded womanand 'tis well
for Granger such as thou hast him in charge. Take
my thanks for thy discharge of duties self-assumed,
and not assigned thee. Thou shalt be remembered.
Possessing himself of the packet, he approached
Hugh Grayson, who stood sullenly apart, and drawing
from its folds a broad sheet of parchment, he thus
addressed him:
Master Grayson, the colony owes thee thanks for
thy good service, and would have more from thee. I
know not one in whom, at such a time, its proprietary
lords can better confide, in this contest, than in thee.
Thou hast courage, enterprise, and conductart not
too rash, nor yet too sluggardbut, to my poor mind,
thou combinest happily all the materials which should
make a good captain. Thou hast a little mistaken me
in some things, and, perhaps, thou hast something erred
in estimating thyself. But thou art young, and
responsibility
makes the mannothing like responsibility!
So thinking, and with a frank speech, I beg of thee to
accept this commission. It confers on thee all military
command in this county of Granville, to pursue the
enemies of the colony with fire and swordto control
its people for the purposes of war in dangerous times
like the presentand to do, so long as this insurrection
shall continue, whatever may seem wise to thy mind,
for the proprietors and for the people, as if they had
spoken through thy own mouth. Is the trust agreeable
to thee?
Who art thou? was the surprised response of the
youth, looking a degree of astonishment, corresponding
with that upon the faces of all around, to whom the
speaker had hitherto only been known as Gabriel
Harrison
.
Truelet me answer that question. The reply
belongs to more than one. Bess, dearest, thou shalt
now be satisfied; but in learning my secret, thou losest
thy lover. Know, then, thou hast Gabriel Harrison no
longer! I am Charles Craven, Governor and Lord
Palatine of Carolina!
She sunk with a tearful pleasure into his arms as
he spoke, and the joyful shout of all around attested
the gratification with which the people recognised in
an old acquaintance the most popular governor of the
Carolinas, under the lords-proprietors, which the
Carolinians
ever had.
I take your commission, my lord, replied
Grayson
,
with a degree of firm manliness superseding his
gloomy expression and clearing it awayI take it,
sir, and will proceed at once to the execution of its
duties. Your present suggestions, sir, will be of
value.
You shall have them, Master Grayson, in few
words, was the reply of the palatine. It will be
your plan to move down with your present force along
the river, taking with you, as you proceed, all the
settlers
,
so as to secure their safety. Your point of rest
and defence will be the fort at Port Royal, which now
lacks most of its garrison from the draught made on it
by my orders to Bellinger, and which gave you
command
of the brave men you brought up last night. I
shall be at Port Royal before you, and will do what I
may there, in the meanwhile, towards its preparation,
whether for friend or foe. With your present force,
and what I shall send you on my arrival at Charlestown,
you will be adequate to its defence.
Ahem, ahem!My lord, cried Nichols, awkwardly
approachingMy lord, permit me, with all due
humility
,
to suggest that the duties so assigned Master
Grayson are heavy upon such young hands. Ahem!
my lordit is not now that I have to say that I have
never yet shrunk from the service of the people. I
would
Ay, ay, NicholsI know what you would say, and
duly estimate your public spirit; but, as you are the
only surgeonindeed, the only medical man in the
parishto risk your life unnecessarily, in a command
so full of risk as that assigned Master Grayson, would
be very injudicious. We may spare a soldieror even
an officerbut the loss of a doctor is not so easily
suppliedandhere his voice sunk into a whisper,
as he finished the sentence in the ears of the patriot
the probability is, that your commander, from the
perilous service upon which he goes, will be the very
first to claim your skill.
Well, my lord, if I must, I mustbut you can
understand
,
though it does not become me to say, how
readily I should meet death in behalf of the people.
That I knowthat I know, Nichols. Your
patriotism
is duly estimated. Enough, nowand
farewell
,
gentlemenGod speed, and be your surety.
Granger, let us have boats for the city.
Young missis, whispered Hector, taking Bess
Matthews asidelet me beg you call Hector your
sarbanttell mossa you must hab medat you can't
do widout me, and den, you see, misses, he wun't
bodder
me any more wid he long talk 'bout freedom. Den,
you see, he can't turn me off, no how. She promised
him as he desired, and he went off to the boats
singing
:
20
Go hush you tongue, black nigger,
Wha' for you grumble so?
You hab you own good mossa,
And you hab good misses too:
Che-weet, che-weet,' de little bird cry,
When he put he nose under he wing,
But he hab no song like Hector make,
When de young misses yerry um sing.
Well, good-by, Mossa Doctor, good-by! Dem Ingins
'member you long timedem dat you kill!
What do you mean, you black rascal! cried
Constantine
Maximilian to the retreating negro, who saw
the regretful expression with which the medical man
surveyed the preparation for a departure from the scene
of danger, in the securities of which he was not
permitted
to partake. Three cheers marked the first
plunge of the boats from the banks, bearing off the
gallant palatine with his peerless forest-flower.
CHAPTER XXVII.
Truthe, this is an olde chronycle, ywritte
Ynne a strange lettere, whyche myne eyne have redde
Whenne birchen were a lessonne of the schoole,
Of nighe applyance. I doe note it welle,
'I faithe, evenne by that tokenne; albeit muche,
The type hath worne away to skeleton,
That once, lyke some fatte, pursy aldermanne,
Stoode uppe in twentie stonne.
Our
tale becomes history. The web of fiction is
woventhe romance is nigh over. The old wizard
may not trench upon the territories of truth. He stops
short at her approach with a becoming reverence. It
is for all things, even for the upsoaring fancy, to
worship
and keep to the truth. There is no security
unless
in its restraints. The fancy may play
capriciously
only with the unknown. Where history dare
not go, it is then for poetry, borrowing a wild gleam from
the blear eye of tradition, to couple with her own the
wings of imagination, and overleap the boundaries of
the defined and certain. We have done this in our
written pages. We may do this no longer. The
old chronicle is before us, and the sedate muse of
history
,
from her graven tablets, dictates for the future.
We write at her bidding now.
In safety, and with no long delay, Harrison,or, as
we should now call him,the palatine,reached
Charlestown, the metropolis of Carolina. He found it
in sad dilemma and dismay. As he had feared, the
warlike savages were at its gates. The citizens
were hemmed inconfined to the shelter of the seven
forts which girdled its dwellingshalf-starved, and
kept in constant watchfulness against hourly surprise.
The Indians had ravaged with fire and the tomahawk
all the intervening country. Hundreds of the innocent
and unthinking inhabitants had perished by deaths the
most painful and protracted. The farmer had been
shot down in the furrows where he sowed his corn.
His child had been butchered upon the threshold,
where, hearing the approaching footsteps, it had run
to meet its father. The long hair of his young wife,
grasped in the clutches of the murderer, became an
agent of torture, which had once been an attraction and
a pride. Death and desolation smoked along the wide
stretch of country bordering the coast, and designating
the route of European settlement in the interior. In
the neighbourhood of Pocota-ligo alone, ninety persons
were destroyed. St. Bartholomew's parish was
ravaged
the
settlement of Stono, including the beautiful
little church of that place, was entirely destroyed by fire,
while but few of the inhabitants, even of the
surrounding
plantations, escaped the fury of the invaders. All
the country about Dorchester, then new as a
settlement
,
and forming the nucleus of that once beautiful
and attractive, but thrice-doomed village, shared the
same fate, until the invaders reached Goose Creek,
when the sturdy militia of that parish, led on by
Captain
Chiquang, a gallant young Huguenot, gave them
a repulse, and succeeding in throwing themselves be
tween the savages and the city, reached Charlestown,
in time to assist in the preparations making for its
defence.
The arrival of the palatine gave a new life and fresh
confidence to the people. His course was such as
might have been expected from his decisive character.
He at once proclaimed martial lawlaid an embargo,
preventing the departure of any of the male citizens
and the exportation of clothes, provisions, or any thing
which might be useful to the colonists in their
existing
condition. Waiting for no act of assembly to
authorize
his proceedings, but trusting to their
subsequent
sense of right to acknowledge and ratify what
he had done, as was indeed the case, he proceeded by
draught, levy, and impressment, to raise an army of
eleven hundred men, in addition to those employed in
maintaining the capital. In this proceeding he still
more signally showed his decision of character, by
venturing upon an experiment sufficiently dangerous
to alarm those not acquainted with the condition of the
southern negro. Four hundred of the army so raised,
consisted of slaves, drawn from the parishes according to
assessment. Charlestown gave thirtyChrist Church,
sixteenSt. Thomas and St. Dennis, fifty-fiveSt.
James, Goose Creek, fifty-fiveSt. Andrews, eighty
St. John's, Berkley, sixtySt. Paul's, forty-fiveSt.
James', Santee, thirty-fiveSt. Bartholomew's, sixteen
St. Helena, eightmaking up the required total of
four hundred. To these, add six hundred Carolinians,
and one hundred friendly Indians or allies; these
latter
being Tuscaroras,
[2]
[2]
Apart from his pay in this war, each Tuscarora received, on
returning
home, as a bounty, one gun, one hatchet; and for every slave
which he may have lost, an enemy's slave in return!
from North Carolina, almost the
only Indian nation in the south not in league against
the colony. Other bodies of men were also raised for
stations, keeping possession of the Block Houses at
points most accessible to the foe, and where the
defence
was most important. At the
Savano
town, a
corps of forty men were stationeda similar force at
Rawlin's Bluff on the Edistoh; at Port Royal; on the
Combahee; at the Horseshoeand other places, in
like manner, forming so many certain garrisons to the
end of the war. All other steps taken by the palatine
were equally decisive; and such were the severe and
summary penalties annexed to the non-performance of
the duties requried from the citizen, that there was
no evasion of their execution. Death was the doom,
whether of desertion from duty, or of a neglect to
appear
at the summons to the field. The sinews of war
in another respect were also provided by the palatine.
He issued bills of credit for 30,000
l.
to raise supplies;
the counterfeiting of which, under the decree of the
privy council, was punishable by death without benefit
of clergy. Having thus prepared for the contest, he
placed himself at the head of his rude levies, and with
a word of promise and sweet regret to his young bride,
he marched out to meet the enemy.
War with the American Indians was a matter of far
greater romance than modern European warfare
possibly
can be. There was nothing of regular array in
such confficts as those of the borderers with the
savages
;
and individual combats, such as give interest to
story, were common events in all such issues. The
borderer singled out his foe, and grappled with him in
the full confidence of superior muscle. With him,
too, every ball was fated. He threw away no shot in
line. His eye conducted his finger; and he touched
no trigger, unless he first ranged the white drop at the
muzzle of his piece upon some vital point of his foe's
person. War, really, was an art, and a highly
ingenious
one, in the deep recesses and close swamps of
the southern forests. There was no bull-headed
marching up to the mouth of the cannon. Their pride
was to get around itto come in upon the rearto
insinuateto dodgeto play with the fears or the
false confidence of the foe, so as to effect by surprise
what could not be done by other means. These were
the arts of the savages. It was fortunate for the
Carolinians
that their present leader knew them so well.
Practised as he had been, the palatine proceeded
leisurely, but decisively, to contend with his enemies
on their own ground, and after their own fashion. He
omitted no caution which could ensure against
surprise
,
and at the same time he allowed himself no
delay
.
Gradually advancing, with spies always out, he
foiled all the efforts of his adversary. In vain did
Sanutee
put all his warrior skill in requisition. In vain
did his most cunning braves gather along the sheltered
path in ambuscade. In vain did they show themselves
in small numbers, and invite pursuit by an exhibition
of timidity. The ranks of the Carolinians remained
unbroken. There was no exciting their leader to
precipitation
.
His equanimity was invincible, and he
kept his men steadily upon their waystill advancing
still backing their adversariesand with courage
and confidence in themselves, duly increasing with
every successful step in their progress.
Sanutee did not desire battle, until the force
promised
by the Spaniards should arrive. He was in
momentary expectation of its appearance. Still, he
was reluctant to recede from his ground, so
advantageously
taken; particularly, too, as he knew that the
Indians, only capable of sudden action, are not the
warriors for a patient and protracted watch in the field,
avoiding the conflict for which they have expressly
come out. His anxieties grew with the situation
forced upon him by the army and position of the
palatine; and, gradually giving ground, he was
compelled
,
very reluctantly, to fall back upon the river
of Salke-hatchie, where the Yemassees had a small
town, some twenty miles from Pocota-ligo. Here
he formed his great camp, determined to recede no
farther. His position was good. The river-swamp
run in an irregular sweep, so as partially to form in
front of his array. His men he distributed through a
thick copse running alongside of the river, which lay
directly in his rear. In retreat, the swamps were
secure fastnesses, and they were sufficiently
contiguous
.
The night had set in before he took his position.
The Carolinians were advancing, and but a few miles
divided the two armies. Sanutee felt secure from
attack so long as he maintained his present position;
and sending out scouts, and preparing all things, like
a true warrior, for every event, he threw himself,
gloomy with conflicting thoughts, under the shadow of
an old tree that rose up in front of his array.
While he mused, his ear caught the approach of a
light footstep behind him. He turned, and his eye
rested upon Matiwan. She crept humbly towards him,
and lay at his feet. He did not repulse her; but his
tones, though gentle enough, were gloomily sad.
Would Matiwan strike with a warrior, that she
comes to the camp of the Yemassee? Is there no
lodge in Pocota-ligo for the woman of a chief?
The lodge is not for Matiwan, if the chief be not
there. Shall the woman have no eyeswhat can the
eye of Matiwan behold if Sanutee stand not up before
it. The boy is not
Cha! cha! It is the tongue of a foolish bird that
sings after the season. Let the woman speak of the
thing that is. Would the chief of the Yemassee hear
a song from the woman? It must be of the big club,
and the heavy blow. Blood must be in the song, and
a thick cry.
Matiwan has a song of blood and a thick cry,
like Opitchi-Manneyto makes when he comes from the
black swamps of Edistoh. She saw the black spirit
with the last dark. He stood up before her in the
lodge, and he had a curse for the woman, for Matiwan
took from him his slave. He had a curse for
Matiwan
and
a fire-word, oh, well-beloved, for Sanutee.
Cha, cha! Sanutee has no ear for the talk of a
child.
The Opitchi-Manneyto spoke of Yemassee, said
the woman.
Ha! what said the black spirit to the woman of
Yemassee? was the question of the chief, with more
earnestness.
The scalps of the Yemassee were in his hand
the teeth of the Yemassee were round his neck, and
he carried an arrow that was broken.
Thou liestthou hast a forked tongue, and a
double voice for mine ear. The arrow of Yemassee
is whole.
The chief has a knife for the heart. Let the
well-beloved strike the bosom of Matiwan. Oh, chief
thou wilt see the red blood that is true. Strike, and
tell it to come. Is it not thine? she bared her breast
as she spoke, and her eyes were full upon his with a
look of resignation and of love, which spoke her truth.
The old warrior put his hand tenderly upon the
exposed
bosom,
The blood is good under the hand of Sanutee.
Speak, Matiwan.
The scalps of Yemasseeand the long tuft of a
chief were in the hand of the Opitchi-Manneyto.
What chief? inquired Sanutee.
The great chief, Sanuteethe well-beloved of the
Yemassee, groaned the woman, as she denounced his
own fate in the ears of the old warrior. She sunk
prostrate before him when she had spoken, her face
prone to the ground. The chief was silent for an
instant after hearing the prediction conveyed by her
vision, which the native superstition, and his own
previous
thoughts of gloom, did not permit him to
question
.
Raising her after awhile, he simply exclaimed
It is good!
Shall Matiwan go back to the lodge in
Pocota-ligo
?
she asked, in a tone which plainly enough
craved permission to remain.
Matiwan will stay. The battle-god comes with
the next sun, and the Happy Valley is open for the
chief.
Matiwan is glad. The Happy Valley is for the
woman of the chief, and the boy
Cha! it is good, Matiwan, that thou didst strike
with the keen hatchet into the head of Occonestoga
Good! But the chief would not hear of him. Look
the bush is ready for thy sleep.
He pointed to the copse as he spoke, and his manner
forbid further conversation. Leaving her, he took his
way among the warriors, arranging the disposition of
his camp and of further events.
Meanwhile the palatine approached the enemy,
slowly, but with certainty. Confident, as he advanced,
he nevertheless made his approaches sure. He took
counsel of all matters calculated to affect or concern
the controversies of war. He omitted no precaution
spared no painssuffered nothing to divert him
from the leading object in which his mind was
interested
.
His scouts were ever in motion, and as he
himself knew much of the country through which he
marched, his information was at all times certain.
He pitched his camp within a mile of the position
chosen by the Yemassees, upon ground carefully
selected
so as to prevent surprise. His main force lay
in the hollow of a wood, which spread in the rear of a
small mucky bay, interposed directly between his own
and the strength of the enemy. A thick copse hung
upon either side, and here he scattered a chosen band
of his best sharp shooters. They had their
instructions
;
and as he left as little as possible to chance, he
took care that they fulfilled them. Such were his
arrangements that night, as soon as his ground of
encampment
had been chosen. At a given signal, the
main body of the army retired to their tents. The
blanket of each soldier, suspended from a crotch-stick,
as was the custom of war in that region, formed his
covering from the dews of night. The long grass
constituted
a bed sufficiently warm and soft in a clime,
and at a season, so temperate. The fires were kindled,
the roll of the drum in one direction, and the
mellow
tones of the bugle in another, announced the
sufficient
signal for repose. Weary with the long march
of the day, the greater number were soon lulled into
a slumber, as little restrained by thought as if all were
free from danger and there were no enemy before them.
But the guardian watchers had been carefully
selected
by their provident leader, and they slept not. The
palatine himself was a sufficient eye over that
slumbering
host. He was unwearied and wakeful. He
could not be otherwise; his thought kept busy note of
the hours and of the responsibilities upon him. It is
thus that the leading mind perpetually exhibits proofs
of its immortality, maintaining the physical nature in
its weaknesses, renewing its strength, feeding it with a
fire that elevates its attributes, and almost secures it in
immortality too. He knew his enemy, and suspecting
his wiles, he prepared his own counter-stratagems.
His arrangements were well devised, and he looked
with impatience for the progress of the hours which
were to bring about the result he now contemplated as
certain.
It was early morning, some three hours before the
dawn, and the gray squirrel had already begun to
scatter
the decayed branches from the tree-tops in which
he built his nest, when the palatine roused his officers,
and they in turn the men. They followed his bidding.
In quick movement, and without noise, they were
marshalled
in little groups, leaving their blanket tents
standing precisely as when they lay beneath them.
Under their several leaders they were marched
forward
,
in single or Indian file, through the copse which
ran along on either side of their place of encampment.
They were halted, just as they marched, with their
tents some few hundred yards behind them. Here
they were dispersed through the forest, at given
intervals
,
each warrior having his bush or tree assigned
him. Thus stationed, they were taught to be
watchful
and to await the movements of the enemy.
The palatine had judged rightly. He was satisfied
that the Yemassees would be unwilling to have the battle
forced upon them at Pocota-ligo, exposing their women
and children to the horrors of an indiscriminate fight.
To avoid this, it was necessary that they should
anticipate
his approach to that place. The Salke-hatchie
was the last natural barrier which they could well
oppose
to his progress; and the swamps and thick
fastnesses
which marked the neighbourhood, indicated it
well as the most fitting spot for Indian warfare. This
was in the thought of the palatine not less than of
Sanutee; and in this lay one of the chief merits of the
former as a captain. He thought for his enemy. He
could not narrow his consideration of the game before
him, to his own play; and having determined what
was good policy with his foe, he prepared his own to
encounter it.
Sanutee had been greatly aided in the progress of
this war by the counsels of the celebrated Creek chief,
Chigilli, who led a small band of the lower Creeks and
Euchees in the insurrection. With his advice, he
determined upon attacking the Carolinian army
before
the dawn of the ensuing day. That night arranged
their proceedings, and, undaunted by the
communication
of his fate, revealed to him in the vision of
Matiwan
,
and which, perhapswith the subdued emotions
of one who had survived his most absorbing affections
he was not unwilling to believe, he roused his
warriors
at a sufficiently early hour, and they set forward,
retracing their steps, and well prepared to surprise
their enemy. The voice of the whippoorwill
regulated
their progress through the doubtful and dark
night, and without interruption they went on for a mile
or more, until their scouts brought them word that the
yellow blankets of the whites glimmered through the
shadows of the trees before them. With increased
caution, therefore, advancing, they came to a point
commanding a full view of the place of repose of the
Carolinian army. Here they halted, placing
themselves
carefully in cover, and waiting for the earliest
show of dawn in which to commence the attack by a
deadly and universal fire upon the tents and their
flying
inmates. In taking such a position, they placed
themselves directly between the two divisions of the
palatine's force, which, skirting the copse on either
hand, stood in no less readiness than themselves, with
their movement, to effect its own; and when the
savages advanced upon the unconscious camp, to come
out upon their wings and rear, taking them at a vantage
which must give a fatal defeat to their enterprise.
It came at last, the day so long and patiently looked
for by both parties. A faint gleam of light gushed
through the trees, and a gray streak like a fine thread
stole out upon the horizon. Then rose the cry, the
fierce war-whoop of Yemassee and Creek;
Sangarrah-me
,
Sangarrah-me!
was the shout. Blood for the
Yemassee, blood for the Cherokee, blood for the Creek
were the signals which, at a given moment, carried
forward the thousand fierce and dusky warriors of the
confederate nations upon the tents which they fondly
imagined to contain their sleeping enemies. The
shot penetrated the blankets in every directionthe
arrows hurtled on all sides through the air, and, rapidly
advancing with the first discharge, the Indians rushed
to the tents, tomahawk in hand, to strike down the
fugitives. In that moment, the sudden hurrah of the
Carolinians, in their rear and on their sides, aroused
them to a knowledge of that stratagem which had
anticipated
their own. The shot told fatally on their
exposed persons, and a fearful account of victims
came with the very first discharge of the
sharp-shooting
foresters. Consternation, for a moment, followed
the first consciousness which the Indians had of their
predicament; but desperation took the place of
surprise
.
Sanutee and Chigilli led them in every point,
and wherever the face of the foe could be seen.
Their valour was desperate but cool, and European
warfare has never shown a more determined spirit of
bravery than was then manifested by the wild warriors
of Yemassee, striking the last blow for the glory and
the existence of their once mighty nation. Driven
back on one side and another, they yet returned fiercely
and fearlessly to the conflict, with a new strength and
an exaggerated degree of fury. Chigilli, raging like
one of his own forest panthers, fell, fighting, with his
hand wreathed in the long hair of one of the borderers,
whom he had grappled behind his tree, and for whose
heart his knife was already flashing in the air. A
random shot saved the borderer, by passing directly
through the scull of the Indian. A howl of despairing
vengeance went up from the tribe which he led as
they beheld him fall; and, rushing upon the sheltered
whites, as they sought to reclaim his body, they
experienced
the same fate to a man! For two hours
after this the fight raged recklessly and fierce. The
Indians were superior in number to the Carolinians,
but the surprise of their first assault was productive of
a panic from which they never perfectly recovered.
This was more than an off-set to any disparity of force
originally; and, as the position of the whites had been
well taken, the Yemassees found it impossible in the
end to force it. The rising sun beheld them broken
without concerthopeless of all further effortflying
in every direction; shot down as they ran into the
open grounds, and crushed by the servile auxiliaries
of the whites as they sought for shelter in the cover
of the woods, assigned, for this purpose, to the negroes.
A brief distance apart from the meleefree from the
flying crowd, as the point was more exposed to
danger
one
spot of the field of battle rose into a slight
elevation. A little group rested upon it, consisting of
four persons. Two of them were Yemassee
subordinates
.
One of them was already deadfrom the
bosom of the other in thick currents, freezing fast, the
life was rapidly ebbing. He looked up as he expired,
and his last broken words, in his own language, were
those of homage and affection to the well-beloved of his
peoplethe great chief, Sanutee. It was the face of
the well-beloved upon whom his glazed eyes were
fixed, with an expression of admiration, indicative of the
feeling of his whole people, and truly signifying that
of the dying Indian to the last. The old chief looked
down on him encouragingly, as the warrior broke out
into a start of songthe awful song of his dying.
The spirit parted with the effort, and Sanutee turned
his eyes from the contemplation of the melancholy
spectacle to the only living person beside him.
That person was Matiwan. She hung over the
well-beloved with an affection as purely true, as
warmly strong, as the grief of her soul was speechless
and tearless. Her hand pressed closely upon his
side, from which the vital torrent was streaming fast;
and between them, in a low moaning strain, in the
Yemassee
Vol. II.L 21
tongue, they bewailed the fortunes of their
nation.
The eye of Matiwan looked on, when the
tomahawk
was redwhen the knife had a wing. She saw
Chigilli, the brave of the Creeksshe saw him strike?
inquired the chief of the woman.
Matiwan saw.
Let the woman say of Sanutee, the well-beloved
of Yemassee. Did Chigilli go before him? Was
Sanutee a dog that runs? Was the hatchet of a chief
slow? Did the well-beloved strike at the pale-face
as if the red eye of Opitchi-Manneyto had looked on
him for a slave?
The well-beloved is the great brave of Yemassee.
The other chiefs came after. Matiwan saw him
strike like a chief, when the battle was thick with a
rush, and the hatchet was deep in the head of a pale
warrior. Look, oh, well-belovedis not this the
bullet of the white man? The big knife is in the
bosom of a chief, and the blood is like a rope on the
fingers of Matiwan.
It is from the heart of Sanutee!
Ah-cheray-meah-cheray-me! groaned the
woman
,
in savage lamentation, as she sunk down beside
the old warrior, one arm now inclasping his already
immoveable person.
It is good, Matiwan. The well-beloved has no
people. The Yemassee has bones in the thick woods,
and there are no young braves to sing the song of his
glory. The
Coosah-moray-te
is on the bosom of the
Yemassee, with the foot of the great bear of Apalatchie.
He makes his bed in the old home of Pocota-ligo, like
a fox that burrows in the hill-side. We may not drive
him away. It is good for Sanutee to die with his
people
.
Let the song of his dying be sung.
Ah-cheray-meah-cheray-me! was the only
response
of the woman, as, but partially equal to the
effort
,
the chief began his song of many victories.
But the pursuers were at hand, in the negroes, now
scouring the field of battle with their huge clubs and
hatchets, knocking upon the head all of the Indians
who yet exhibited any signs of life. As wild almost as
the savages, they luxuriated in a pursuit to them so
very novelthey hurried over the forests with a step as
fleet, and a ferocity as dreadfulsparing none,
whether
they fought or plead, and frequently inflicting the
most unnecessary blows, even upon the dying and the
dead. The eye of Matiwan, while watching the
expiring
blaze in that of the old warrior, discovered the
approach of one of these sable enemies. She threw
up her hand to arrest or impede the blow, exclaiming,
as she did so, the name of the chief she defended. He
himself feebly strove to grasp the hatchet, which had
sunk from his hands, to defend himself, or at least to
strike the assailant; but life had only clustered, that
moment, in strength about his heart. The arm was
palsied; but the half-unclosing eye, which glowed
wildly upon the black, and arrested his blow much
more completely than the effort of Matiwan, attested
the yet reluctant consciousness. Life went with the last
effort, when, thinking only of the strife for his country,
his lips parted feebly with the cry of battle
Sangarrah-me
,
YemasseeSangarrah-meSangarrah-me!
The eye was dim for ever. Looking no longer to the
danger of the stroke from the club of the negro, Matiwan
threw herself at length over the body, now doubly
sacred
to that childless woman. At that moment the
lord palatine came up, in time to arrest the brutal blow
of the servile which threatened her.
Matiwan, said the palatine, stooping to raise her
from the bodyMatiwan, it is the chief?
Ah-cheray-me, ah-cheray-me, Sanutee
Ah-cheray-me
,
ah-cheray-me, Yemassee!
She was unconscious of all things, as they bore her
tenderly away, save that the Yemassee was no longer
the great nation. She only felt that the well-beloved,
as well of herself as of her people, looked forth,
with Occonestoga, wondering that she came not, from
the Blessed Valley of the Good Manneyto.
THE END.